Google 



This is a digital copy of a book lhal w;ls preserved for general ions on library shelves before il was carefully scanned by Google as pari of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

Il has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one thai was never subject 

to copy right or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often dillicull lo discover. 

Marks, notations and other marginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher lo a library and linally lo you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud lo partner with libraries lo digili/e public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order lo keep providing this resource, we have taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial panics, including placing Icchnical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make n on -commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request thai you use these files for 
personal, non -commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain from automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort lo Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attribution The Google "watermark" you see on each lile is essential for informing people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use. remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 

countries. Whether a book is slill in copyright varies from country lo country, and we can'l offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liability can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through I lie lull lexl of 1 1 us book on I lie web 
al |_-.:. :.-.-:: / / books . qooqle . com/| 



PHILOSOPHICAL STUDIES 



International Library of Psychology 
Philosophy and Scientific Method 

General Editor : C. K. Ogden, m.a. 

(Magdalene College, Cambridge) 

VOLUMES ALREADY ARRANGED: 

THE MISUSE OF MIND 
by Kakin Stephen 

Prefatory note by Henri Bergson. 

CONFLICT AND DREAM 

by W. H. R. Rivers, F.R.S. 

THE MEASUREMENT OF EMOTION 
by W. Whately Smith 

Introduction by William Brown. 

THE ANALYSIS OF MATTER 
by Bert rand Russell, F.R.S. 

MATHEMATICS FOR PHILOSOPHERS 
by G. H. Hardy, F.R.S. 

THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE UNCONSCIOUS 
by E. von Hartmann 

PSYCHOLOGICAL TYPES 

by C G. Jung, M.D., LL.D. 

ELEMENTS OF PSYCHOTHERAPY 
by William Brown, M.D., D.Sc 

THE FOUNDATIONS OF MUSICAL AESTHETICS 
by W. Pole, F.R.S. 

Edited by Edward J. Dent. 

THE PSYCHOLOGY OF MUSIC 
by Edward J. Dent 

SOME CONCEPTS OF SCIENTIFIC THOUGHT 
by C. D. Broad, Litt.D. 

PHILOSOPHICAL LOGIC 
by L. Wittgenstein 

Introduction by Bertrand Russell. 

THE MEANING OF MEANING 

by C. K. Ogden and I. A. Richards 

THE PSYCHOLOGY OF REASONING 
by Eugbnio Rignano 

THE PHILOSOPHY OF «AS IF' 
by H. Vaihingbr 

THE LAWS OF FEELING 
by F. Paulhan 

THE HISTORY OF MATERIALISM 
by F. A. Lange 

THE STATISTICAL METHOD IN ECONOMICS 

AND POLITICS 
by P. Sargant Florence 

THE PRINCIPLES OF CRITICISM 
by I. A. Richards 



Philosophical Studies 



By 
G. E. MOORE, LittD. 

Hon. LL.D. (St. Andrew's), F.B.A. 

Lttturtr in Moral Science in the University of Cambridge 

Anther of "Princifii* Ethic*" 




NEW YORK 
HARCOURT, BRACE & CO. INC 

LONDON: KXGAN PAUL. TRENCH, TRUBNER ft CO., LTD 

1923 



assay 11 ** 



^7/.3j< 



\ '"1 . 'v •. 






CONTENTS 



CHAP. 



I. The Refutation of Idealism . 
II. The Nature and Reality of Objects of 

CEPTION 



III. William James' "Pragmatism" 



IV. Hume's Philosophy 



V. The Status of Sense-Data 

VI. The Conception of Reality . 

VII. Some Judgments of Perception 

VIII. The Conception of Intrinsic Value 

IX. External and Internal Relations 

X. The Nature of Moral Philosophy 



Per- 



PACK. 
I 



31 

97 

*47 
168 

197 

220 

*53 
276 

310 



Those of the papers in this volume, which have been previously 
published, originally appeared as follows : — 

I. "The Refutation of Idealism " in Mind, N.S. Vol. xii, 1903. 

II. "The Nature and Reality of Objects of Perception" in Pro- 
ceedings of the Aristotelian Society, 1905-6. 

III. " Professor James* ' Pragmatism ' w in Proceedings of the Aris- 

totelian Society, 1907-8. 

IV. "Hume's Philosophy" in The New Quarterly, November, 

1909. 

V. " The Status of Sense-Data ° in Proceedings of the Aristotelian 

Society, 191 3- 14. 

VI. " The Conception of Reality " in Proceedings of the Aristotelian 
Society, 1917-18. 

VII. " Some Judgments of Perception * in Proceedings of the Aris- 
totelian Society, 191 8- 19. 

IX. "External and Internal Relations" in Proceedings of the 
Aristotelian Society, 1919-20. 



PREFACE 

All the papers contained in this volume, except the two 
ethical ones (VIII and X), have been previously published; 
and of those which have been previously published all, 
except that on "External and Internal Relations " (IX), 
are here re-printed without change. They were written at 
various dates between 1903 and 1921, and all are here 
printed in the order in which they were written, except 
that VIII on "The Conception of Intrinsic Value," which 
was written earlier than VI and VII, has been moved out 
of its proper place in order to bring it nearer to IX and X, 
to both of which it is closely related in subject. 

All, except IV and X, were primarily intended for an 
audience familiar with the writings of philosophers ; but I 
hope that they may nevertheless prove intelligible even to 
those who have read little or no philosophy, since I make 
little use of technical terms, and, where I have done so, have 
done my best to explain in ordinary language exactly what 
I mean by them. The tone of X is somewhat different 
from that of the rest, because it was written as a lecture for 
the Leicester Philosophical Society \ with regard to which I 
was informed that I must not assume any previous 
acquaintance with philosophy in most of the audience. 
It accordingly bears marks throughout of the kind of 
audience for which it was intended. 

An attentive reader will easily discover that some of the 
views expressed in some of the papers are inconsistent 
with views expressed in others. The fact is that some of 
the views expressed in some of the earlier ones are views 
with which I no longer agree ; and I feel that some apology 
is needed for nevertheless republishing them exactly as 
they stood. In all cases, except one, my excuse is that 
the mistaken views in question are so embedded in the 
form and substance of the papers in which they occur, that 
it would have been impossible to correct them without 
practically substituting new papers for the old ones ; and 
that, in spite of these mistakes, the old papers, as they 
stand, still seem to me, on the whole, to say things which 
are worth saying in a form which, however defective it may 



viii Preface 

be, I doubt my own ability to improve upon. The only 
case in which I doubt whether this excuse applies is that of 
the first paper — " The Refutation of Idealism." This paper 
now appears to me to be very confused, as well as to 
embody a good many down-right mistakes ; so I am 
doubtful whether I ought to have included it. But in this case 
I have another excuse : namely that it is a paper to which 
a good many allusions have been made by contemporary 
writers on philosophy ; and I was told that, for some 
readers at all events, it would be a convenience that it 
should be reprinted along with the rest, if only for the 
sake of reference. 

I said above that the only one of the previously published 
papers, in which changes have been made, is IX on 
"External and Internal Relations." In this case the 
changes are not due to any change in my views, but to the 
fact that, in that part of the paper in which symbols are 
used, I tried, when it was first published in the Proceedings 
of the Aristotelian Society ', to use the symbols adopted by 
Whitehead and Russell in Principia Mathematics and used 
them also without giving an explanation of their meaning 
which would be sufficient for readers not acquainted with 
that work. The symbols in question are symbols which 
it is difficult for printers to reproduce; and I have, there- 
fore, thought it better, on this occasion, to use another set 
of symbols, which seem to me to be adequate for the 
limited purpose I had in view. I have tried to give an 
explanation of their meaning, which will enable anyone 
to understand them ; and I have taken the opportunity of 
rewriting some of the parts of the paper in which they 
occur in a way which will, I hope, make some points 
clearer than they originally were. 

I have to thank the Committee of the Aristotelian 
Society for permission to reprint the large number of 
papers (viz., II, III, V, VI, VII and IX), which 
originally appeared in the Proceedings of that Society ; 
and the Editor of the New Quarterly for permission to re- 
print the article on Hume's Philosophy (IV), which 
appeared in that Journal in November, 1909. 



G. E. MOORE. 



Cambridge, 

January \ 1922. 



Philosophical Studies 



THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 



Modern Idealism, if it asserts any general con- 
clusion about the universe at all, asserts that it is 
*K*spirituaL There are two points about this assertion 
to which I wish to call attention. These points are 
that, whatever be its exact meaning, it is certainly 
meant to assert (i) that the universe is very 
different indeed from what it seems, and (2) that 
It has quite a large number of properties which it 
does not seem to have. Chairs and tables and 
mountains seem to be very different from us; but, 
when the whole universe is declared to be spiritual, 
it is certainly meant to assert that they are far 
more like us than we think. The idealist means 
to assert that they are in some sense neither lifeless 
nor unconscious, as they certainly seem to be ; and 
I do not think his language is so grossly deceptive, 
but that we may assume him to believe that they 
really are very different indeed from what they 
seem. And secondly when he declares that they 
are spiritual, he means to include in that term quite 
a large number of different properties. When the 
whole universe is declared to be spiritual, it is 
meant not only that it is in some sense conscious, 
but that it has what we recognise in ourselves as 
the higher forms of consciousness. That it is 
intelligent; that it is purposeful; that it is not 



2 THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 

mechanical ; all these different things are commonly 
asserted of it In general, it may be said, this 
phrase 'reality is spiritual' excites and expresses 
the belief that the whole universe possesses all the 
qualities the possession of which is held to make 
us so superior to things which seem to be inani- 
mate : at least, if it does not possess exactly those 
which we possess, it possesses not one only, but 
several others, which, by the same ethical standard, 
would be judged equal to or better than our own. 
When we say it is spiritual we mean to say that it 
has quite a number of excellent qualities, different 
from any which we commonly attribute either to 
stars or planets or to cups and saucers. 

Now why I mention these two points is that 
when engaged in the intricacies of philosophic 
discussion, we are apt to overlook the vastness 
of the difference between this idealistic view and 
the ordinary view of the world, and to overlook the 
number of different propositions which the idealist 
must prove. It is, I think, owing to the vastness 
of this difference and owing to the number of 
different excellences which Idealists attribute to 
the universe, that it seems such an interesting and 
important question whether Idealism be true or not. 
But, when we begin to argue about it, I think we 
are apt to forget what a vast number of arguments 
this interesting question must involve : we are apt 
to assume, that if one or two points be made on 
either side, the whole case is won. I say this lest 
it should be thought that any of the arguments 
which will be advanced in this paper would be 
sufficient to disprove, or any refutation of them 
sufficient to prove, the truly interesting and im- 
portant proposition that reality is spiritual. For 
my own part I wish it to be clearly understood that 
I do not suppose that anything I shall say has 
t he smallest tendency to prove that reality is not 



THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 3 

spiritual: I do not believe it possible to refute a 
single one of the many important propositions 
contained in the assertion that it is so. Reality 
may be spiritual, for all I know; and I devoutly 
hope it is. But I take ' Idealism ' to be a wide 
term and to include not only this interesting 
conclusion but a number of arguments which are 
supposed to be, if not sufficient, at least necessary, 
to prove it. Indeed I take it that modern Idealists 
are chiefly distinguished by certain arguments which 
they have in common. That reality is spiritual 
has, I believe, been the tenet of many theologians ; 
and yet, for believing that alone, they should hardly 
be called Idealists. There are besides, I believe, 
many persons, not improperly called Idealists, who 
hold certain characteristic propositions, without 
venturing to think them quite sufficient to prove so 
grand a conclusion. It is, therefore, only with 
j^- Idealistic arguments that I am concerned ; and if 
any Idealist holds that no argument is necessary to 
prove that reality is spiritual, I shall certainly not 
have refuted him. I shall, however, attack at least 
one argument, which, to the best of my belief, is 
considered necessary to their position by all 
Idealists. And I wish to point out a certain 
advantage which this procedure gives me — an 
advantage which justifies the assertion that, if my 
arguments are sound, they will have refuted 
Idealism. If I can refute a single proposition 
which is a necessary and essential step in all 
Idealistic arguments, then, no matter how good 
the rest of these arguments may be, I shall have 
proved that Idealists have no reason whatever for 
their conclusion. 

Suppose we have a chain of argument which 
takes the form : Since A is B, and B is C, and C is 
D, it follows A is D. In such an argument, though 
4 B is C 9 and ' C is D ' may both be perfectly true, 



4 THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 

yet if ' A is B ' be false, we have no more reason for 
asserting A is D than if all three were false. It 
does not, indeed, follow that A is D is false ; nor 
does it follow that no other arguments would prove 
it to be true. But it does follow that, so far as this 
argument goes, it is the barest supposition, without 
the least bit of evidence. I propose to attack a 
proposition which seems to me to stand in this 
relation to the conclusion ' Reality is spiritual.' I 
do not propose to dispute that ' Reality is spiritual ; ' 
I do not deny that there may be reasons for thinking 
that it is : but I do propose to show that one reason 
upon which, to the best of my judgment, all other 
arguments ever used by Idealists depend is false. 
These other arguments may, for all I shall say, 
be eminently ingenious and true ; they are very 
many and various, and different Idealists use the 
most different arguments to prove the same most 
important conclusions. Some of these may be 
sufficient to prove that B is C and C is D ; but if, 
as I shall try to show, their ' A is B ' is false the 
conclusion A is D remains a pleasant supposition. 
I do not deny that to suggest pleasant and plaus- 
ible suppositions may be the proper function of 
philosophy : but I am assuming that the name 
Idealism can only be properly applied where there 
is a certain amount of argument, intended to be 
cogent. 

The subject of this paper is, therefore, quite 
uninteresting. Even if I prove my point, I shall 
have proved nothing &bout the Universe in general. 
Upon the important question whether Reality is or 
is not spiritual my argument will not have the 
remotest bearing. I shall only attempt to arrive at 
the truth about a matter, which is in itself quite 
trivial and insignificant, and from which, so far as I 
can see and certainly so far as I shall say, no con- 
clusions can be drawn about any of the subjects 



THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 5 

about which we most want to know. The only 
importance I can claim for the subject I shall in- 
vestigate is that it seems to me to be a matter upon 
which not Idealists only, but all philosophers and 
psychologists also, have been in error, and from 
their erroneous view of which they have inferred 
(validly or invalidly) their most striking and inter- 
esting conclusions. And that it has even this 
importance I cannot hope to prove. If it has this 
importance, it will indeed follow that all the most 
striking results of philosophy — Sensationalism. 
Agnosticism and Idealism alike — have, for all that 
has hitherto been urged in their favour, no more 
foundation than the supposition that a chimera lives 
in the moon. It will follow that, unless new reasons 
never urged hitherto can be found, all the most im- 
portant philosophic doctrines have as little claim to 
assent as the most superstitious beliefs of the lowest 
savages. Upon the question what we have reason 
to believe in the most interesting matters, I do 
therefore think that my results will have an import-* 
ant bearing; but I cannot too clearly insist that 
upon the question whether these beliefs are true 
tney will have none whatever. 

The trivial proposition which I propose to dispute \ 
is this : that esse \%percipi. This is a very ambiguous \ 
proposition, but, in some sense or other, it has been 
very widely held. That it is, in some sense, essential 
to Idealism, I must for the present merely assume. \ 
What I propose to show is that, in all the senses 
ever given to it, it is false. 

But, first of all, it may be useful to point out 
briefly in what relation I conceive it to stand to 
Idealistic arguments. That wherever you can truly 
predicate esse you can truly predicate percifri y in 
some sense or other, is, I take it, a necessary step 
In all arguments, properly to be called Idealistic, 
and, what is more, in all arguments hitherto offered 



6 THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 

for the Idealistic conclusion. If esse is percipi, this 
is at once equivalent to saying that whatever is, is 
experienced ; and this, again, is equivalent, in a 
sense, to saying that whatever is, is something 
mental. But this is not the sense in which the 
Idealist conclusion must maintain that Reality is 
mental. The Idealist conclusion is that esse is 
percipere ; and hence, whether esse be percipi or not, 
a further and different discussion is needed to show 
whether or not it is also percipere. And again, 
even if esse be percipere, we need a vast quantity of 
further argument to show that what has esse has 
also those higher mental qualities which are denoted 
by spiritual. This is why I said that the question I 
should discuss, namely, whether or not esse \s percipi, 
must be utterly insufficient either to prove or to 
disprove that reality is spiritual. But, on the other 
hand, I believe that every argument ever used to 
show that reality is spiritual has inferred this (validly 
or in validly) from • esse is percipere ' as one of its 
premisses ; and that this again has never been 
pretended to be proved except by use of the premiss 
that esse is percipi. The type of argument used for 
the latter purpose is familiar enough. It is said 
that since whatever is, is experienced, and since 
some things are which are not experienced by the 
individual, these must at least form part of some 
experience. Or again that, since ah object neces- 
sarily implies a subject, and since the whole world 
must be an object, we must conceive it to belong to 
some subject or subjects, in the same sense in which 
whatever is the object of our experience belongs to 
us. Or again, that, since thought enters into the 
essence of all reality, we must conceive behind it, in 
it, or as its essence, a spirit akin to ours, who think : 
that 'spirit greets spirit* in its object. Into the 
validity of these inferences I do not propose to enter: 
they obviously require a great deal of discussion. I 



THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 7 

only desire to point out that, however correct they 
may be, yet if esse is not percipi t they leave us as 
far from a proof that reality is spiritual, as if they 
were all false too. 

But now : Is esse percipi? There are three very 
ambiguous terms in this proposition, and I must 
begin by distinguishing the different things that 
may be meant by some of them . 

And first with regard to percipi. This term 
need not trouble us long at present. It was, 
perhaps, originally used to mean ' sensation ' only ; 
but I am not going to be so unfair to modern 
Idealists — the only Idealists to whom the term 
should now be applied without qualification — as to 
hold that, if they say esse is percipi, they mean by 
percipi sensation only. On the contrary I quite 
agree with them that, if esse be percipi at all, percipi 
must be understood to include not sensation only, 
but that other type of mental fact, which is called 
* thought ' ; and, whether esse be percipi or not, I 
consider it to be the main service of the philosophic 
school, to which modern Idealists belong, that they 
have insisted on distinguishing 'sensation' and 
'thought' and on emphasising the importance of 
the latter. Against Sensationalism and Empiricism 
they have maintained the true view. But the dis- 
tinction between sensation and thought need not 
detain us here. For, in whatever respects they 
differ, they have at least this in common, that they 
are both forms of consciousness or, to use a term 
that seems to be more in fashion just now, they 
are both ways of experiencing. Accordingly, 
whatever esse is percipi may mean, it does at least 
assert that whatever is, is experienced. And since 
what I wish to maintain is, that even this is untrue, 
the question whether it be experienced by way of 
sensation or thought or both is for my purpose 
quite irrelevant If it be not experienced at all, it 



8 THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 

cannot be either an object of thought or an object 
of sense. It is only if being involves 'experience' 
that the question, whether it involves sensation or 
thought or both, becomes important. I beg, 
therefore, that percipi may be understood, in what 
follows, to refer merely to what is common to 
sensation and thought A very recent article 
states the meaning of esse is percipi with all de- 
sirable clearness in so far as percipi is concerned 
' 1 will undertake to show,' says Mr. Taylor, * 'that 
what makes [any piece of fact] real can be nothing 
but its presence as an inseparable aspect of a 
sentient experience? I am glad to think that Mr. 
Taylor has been in time to supply me with so 
definite a statement that this is the ultimate premiss 
of Idealism. My paper will at least refute Mr. 
Taylors Idealism, if it refutes anything at all: for I 
shall undertake to show that what makes a thing 
real cannot possibly be its presence as an inseparable 
aspect of a senient experience. 

But Mr. Taylor's statement though clear, I think, 
with regard to the meaning of percipi is highly 
ambiguous in other respects. I will leave it for 
the present to consider the next ambiguity in the 
statement : Esse is percipi. What does the copula 
mean ? What can be meant by saying that Esse 
is percipi ? There are just three meanings, one or 
other of which such a statement must have, if it 
is to be true ; and of these there is only one which 
it can have, if it is to be important (i) The 
statement may be meant to assert that tne word 
* esse ' is used to signify nothing either more or less 
than the word 'percipi': that the two words are 
precise synonyms : that they are merely different 
names for one and the same thing: that what Is 
meant by esse is absolutely identical with what is 

1 International Journal of Ethtcs % October, 190a. 



THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 9 

meant by percipi. I think I need not prove that 
the principle esse is percipi is not thus intended 
merely to define a word ; nor yet that, if it were, it 
would be an extremely bad definition. But if it 
does not mean this, only two alternatives remain. 
The second is (2) that what is meant by esse, 
though not absolutely identical with what is meant 
by pereipit yet includes the latter as a part of its 
meaning. If this were the meaning of 'esse is 
percipi/ then to say that a thing was real would not 
be the same thing as to say that it was experienced* 
That it was real would mean that it was experienced 
and something else besides: 'being experienced 9 
would be analytically essential to reality, but would 
not be the whole meaning of the term. From the 
fact that a thing was real we should be able to 
infer, by the law of contradiction, that it was 
experienced ; since the latter would be part of what 
is meant by the former. But, on the other hand, 
from the fact a thing was experienced we should 
not be able to infer that it was real ; since it would 
not follow from the fact that it had one of the 
attributes essential to reality, that it also had the 
other or others. Now, if we understand esse is 
percipi in this second sense, we must distinguish 
three different things which it asserts. First of all, 
It gives a definition of the word ' reality/ asserting 
that word stands for a complex whole, of which 
what is meant by 'percipi' forms a part. And 
secondly it asserts that 'being experienced 1 forms 
a part of a certain whole. Both these pro- 
positions may be true, and at all events I do not 
wish to dispute them. I do not, indeed, think that 
the word 'reality' is commonly used to include 
' percipi ' : but I do not wish to argue about the 
meaning of words. And that many things which 
are experienced are also something else — that to be 
experienced forms part of certain wholes, is, of 



io THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 

course, indisputable. But what I wish to point out 
is, that neither of these propositions is of any 
importance, unless we add to them a third. That 
1 real ' is a convenient name for a union of attributes 
which sometimes occurs, it could not be worth any 
one's while to assert : no inferences of any im- 
portance could be drawn from such an assertion. 
Our principle could only mean that when a thing 
happens to have percipi as well as the other 
qualities included under esse, it has percipi: and we 
should never be able to infer that it was experienced, 
except from a proposition which already asserted 
that it was both experienced and something else. 
Accordingly, if the assertion that percipi forms 
part of tne whole meant by reality is to have any 
importance, it must mean that the whole is organic, 
at least in this sense, that the other constituent or 
constituents of it cannot occur without percipi, even 
if percipi can occur without them. Let us call these 
other constituents x. The proposition that esse 
includes percipi, and that therefore from esse percipi 
can be inferred, can only be important if it is meant 
to assert that percipi can be inferred from x. 
The only importance of the question whether the 
whole esse includes the part percipi rests therefore 
on the question whether the part x is necessarily 
connected with the part percipi. And this is (3) the 
third possible meaning of the assertion esse is 
percipi: and, as we now see, the only important 
one. Esse is percipi asserts that wherever you 
have x you also have percipi that whatever has 
the property x also has the property that it is 
experienced. And this being so, it will be con- 
venient if, for the future, I may be allowed to use 
the term ' esse ' to denote x alone. I do not wish 
thereby to beg the question whether what we 
commonly mean by the word 'real' does or does 
not include percipi as well as x. I am quite content 



THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM u 

that my definition of ' esse ' to denote x, should be 
regarded merely as an arbitrary verbal definition. 
Whether it is so or not, the only question of interest 
is whether from x pet dpi can be inferred, and I 
should prefer to be able to express this in the form : 
can percipi be inferred from esse ? Only let it be 
understood that when I say esse, that term will not 
for the future include percipi : it denotes only that x % 
which Idealists, perhaps rightly, include along with 
petcipi under their term esse. That there is such 
an x they must admit on pain of making the 
proposition an absolute tautology ; and that from 
this x percipi can be inferred they must admit, on 
pain of making it a perfectly barren analytic pro- 
position. Whether x alone should or should not be 
called esse is not worth a dispute: what is worth 
dispute is whether percipi is necessarily connected 
with x. 

We have therefore discovered the ambiguity of 
the copula in esse is percipi, so far as to see that 
this principle asserts two distinct terms to be so 
related, that whatever has the one, which I call esse, 
has also the property that it is experienced. It 
asserts a necessary connexion between esse on the 
one hand and percipi on the other ; these two words 
denoting each a distinct term, and esse denoting a 
term in which that denoted by percipi is not in- 
cluded. We have, then in esse is percipi, a necessary 
synthetic proposition which I have undertaken to 
refute. And I may say at once that, understood as 
such, it cannot be refuted. If the Idealist chooses 
to assert that it is merely a self-evident truth, I 
have only to say that it does not appear to me to be 
so. But I believe that no Idealist ever has main- 
tained it to be so. Although this — that two 
distinct terms are necessarily related — is the only 
sense which ' esse is percipi ' can have if it is to be 
true and important, it can have another sense, if it 



la THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 

is to be an important falsehood. I believe that 
Idealists all hold this important falsehood. They 
do not perceive that Esse Xspercipi must, if true, be 
merely a self-evident synthetic truth : they either 
identify with it or give as a reason for it another 
proposition which must be false because it is self- 
contradictory. Unless they did so, they would 
have to admit that it was a perfectly unfounded 
assumption ; and if they recognised that it was 
unfounded^ I do not think they would maintain its 
truth to be evident Esse is percipi, in the sense 
I have found for it, may indeed be true ; I cannot 
refute it : but if this sense were clearly apprehended, 
no one, I think, would believe that it was true. 

Idealists, we have seen, must assert that what- 
ever is experienced, is necessarily so. And this 
doctrine they commonly express by saying that 
' the object of experience is inconceivable apart 
frQpi the siihjpyt.' I have hitherto been concerned 
with pointing out what meaning this assertion must 
have, if it is to be an important truth. I now 
propose to show that it may have an important 
meaning, which must be false, because it is self- 
contradictory. 

It is a well-known fact in the history of philosophy 
that necessary truths in general, but especially those 
of which it is said that the opposite is inconceivable, 
have been commonly supposed to be analytic. In 
the sense that the proposition denying them was 
self-contradictory. It was in this way, c&nmonly 
supposed, before Kant, that many truths could be 
proved by the law of contradiction alone. This is, 
therefore, a mistake which it is plainly easy for the 
best philosophers to make. Even since Kant many 
have continued to assert it ; but I am aware that 
among those Idealists, who most properly deserve 
the name, it has become more fashionable to assert 
that truths are both analytic and synthetic. Now 



THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 13 

with many of their reasons for asserting this I am 
not concerned : it is possible that in some con- 
nexions the assertion may bear a useful and true 
sense. But if we understand 'analytic' in the 
sense just defined, namely, what is proved by the 
law of contradiction alone, it is plain that, if 
' synthetic ' means what is not proved by this alone, 
no truth can be both analytic and synthetic. Now 
it seems to me that those who do maintain truths 
to be both, do nevertheless maintain that they are 
so in this as well as in other senses. It is, indeed, 
extremely unlikely that so essential a part of the 
historical meaning of 'analytic' and 'synthetic 9 
should have been entirely discarded, especially 
since we find no express recognition that it is dis- 
carded. In that case it is fair to suppose that 
modern Idealists have bee n influenced by the vie w 
th^t ce r tain truths can be proved by the_la w^of 
<3£ntiadictiQa_dloael I admit they also expressly 

declare that they can not : but this is by no means 
sufficient to prove that they do not also think they 
are; since it is very easy to hold two mutually 
contradictory opinions. What I suggest then is 
that Idealists hold the particular doctrine in 
question, concerning the relation of subject and 
object in experience, because they think it is an 
analytic truth in this restricted sense that it is 
proved by the law of contradictifen alone. 

I am suggesting that the Idealist maintains that 
object aim subject are necessarily connected, mainly 
because he fails to see that they are distinct, that 
they are two, at all . When he thinks of ' yellow ' 
and when he thinks of the 'sensation of yellow, 1 
he fails to see that there is anything whatever in 
the latter which is not in the former. This being 
so, to deny that yellow can ever be apart from the 
sensation of yellow is merely to deny that yellow 
can ever be other than it is ; since yellow and the 



i 4 THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 

sensation of yellow are absolutely identical. To 
assert that yellow is necessarily an object of ex- 
perience is to assert that yellow is necessarily 
yellow — a purely identical proposition, and therefore 
proved by the law of contradiction alone. Of 
course, the proposition also implies that experience 
is, after all, something distinct from yellow — else 
there would be no reason for insisting that yellow 
is a sensation : and that the argument thus both 
affirms and denies that yellow and sensation of 
yellow are distinct, is what sufficiently refutes it 
But this contradiction can easily be overlooked, 
because though we are convinced, in other con- 
nexions, that 'experience' does mean something 
and something most important, yet we are never 
distinctly aware what it means, and thus in every 
particular case we do not notice its presence. The 
facts present themselves as a kind of antinomy : 
(i) Experience is something unique and different 
trom anything else ; (2) Experience of green is 
entirely indistinguishable from green; two pro- 
positions which cannot both be true. Idealists, 
holding both, can only take refuge in arguing from 
the one in some connexions and from the other in 
others. 

But I am well aware that there are many Idealists 
who would repel it as an utterly unfounded charge 
that they fail to distinguish between a sensation or 
idea and what I will call its object And there are, 
I admit, many who not only imply, as we all do, 
that green is distinct from the sensation of green, 
but expressly insist upon the distinction as an 
important part of their system. * They would 
perhaps only assert that the two form an insepar- 
able unity. But I wish to point out that many, 
who use this phrase, and who do admit the distinc- 
tion, are not thereby absolved from the charge that 
they deny it For there is a certain doctrine, very 



THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 15 

prevalent among philosophers nowadays, which by 
a very simple reduction may be seen to assert that 
two distinct things both are and are not distinct 
A distinction is asserted ; but it is also asserted that 
the things distinguished form an 'organic unity/ 
But, forming such a unity, it is held, each would 
not be what it is apart from its relation to the other. 
Hence to consider either by itself is to make an 
illegitimate abstraction. The recognition that there 
are ' organic unities ' and ' illegitimate abstractions ' 
in this sense is regarded as one of the chief con- 
quests of modern philosophy. But what is the 
sense attached to these terms? An abstraction is 
illegitimate, when and only when we attempt to 
assert of a part — of something abstracted — that 
which is true only of the whole to which it belongs : 
and it may perhaps be useful to point out that this 
should not be done. But the application actually 
made of this principle, and what perhaps would be 
expressly acknowledged as its meaning, is some- 
thing much the reverse of useful. The principle is 
used to assert that certain abstractions are in all 
cases illegitimate ; that whenever you try to assert 
anything whatever of that which is part of an 
organic whole, what you assert can only be true of 
the whole. And this principle, so far from being a 
useful truth, is necessarily false. For if the whole 
can, nay must, be substituted for the part in all 
propositions and for all purposes, this can only be 
because the whole is absolutely identical with the 
part. When, therefore, we are told that green and 
the sensation of green are certainly distinct but 
yet are not separable, or that it is an illegitimate 
abstraction to consider the one apart from the other, 
what these provisos are used to assert is, that 
though the two things are distinct yet you not only 
can but must treat them as if they were not. Many 
philosophers, therefore, when they admit a dis- 



1 6 THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 

tinction, yet (following the lead of Hegel) boldly 
assert their right, in a slightly more obscure form 
of words, also to deny it The principle of organic 
unities, like that of combined analysis and synthesis, 
is mainly used to defend the practice of holding 
both of two contradictory propositions, wherever 
this may seem convenient. In this, as in other 
matters, Hegel's main service to philosophy has 
consisted in giving a name to and erecting into a 
principle, a type of fallacy to which experience had 
shown philosophers, along with the rest of mankind, 
to be addicted. No wonder that he has followers 
and admirers. 

I have shown then, so far, that when the Idealist 
asserts the important principle ' Esse is percipi ' he 
must, if it is to be true, mean by this that : What- 
ever is experienced also must be experienced. And 
I have also shown that he may identify with, or 
give as a reason for, this proposition, one which 
must be false, because it is self-contradictory. But 
at this point I propose to make a complete break in 
my argument 'Esse is percipi? we have seen, 
asserts of two terms, as distinct from one another 
as * green' and 'sweet,' that whatever has the one 
has also the other: it asserts that 'being' and 
• being experienced ' are necessarily connected : 
that whatever is is also experienced. And this, I 
admit, cannot be directly refuted But 1 believe It 
to be false ; and I have asserted that anybody who 
saw that 'esse and percipi 1 were as distinct as 
•green* and 'sweet' would be no more ready to 
believe that whatever is is also experienced, than to 
believe that whatever is green is also sweet. I 
have asserted that no one would believe that ( esse 
is percipi* if they saw how different esse is from 
percipi: but this I shall not try to prove. I have 
asserted that all who do believe that 'esse is percipi 9 
identify with it or take as a reason for it a self- 



THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 17 

contradictory proposition: but this I shall not try 
to prove. I shall only try to show that certain 
propositions which I assert to be believed, are false. 
That they are believed, and that without this belief 
'esse is percipV would not be believed either, I 
must leave without a proof. 

I pass, then, from the uninteresting question ' Is 
1 esse percipi ? ' to the still more uninteresting and 
apparently irrelevant question ' What is a sensation 
or idea?' 

We all know that the sensation of blue differs 
from that of green. But it is plain that if both are 
sensations they also have some point in common. 
What is it that they have in common ? And how 
Is this common element related to the points in 
which they differ ? 

I will call the common element * consciousness ' 
without yet attempting to say what the thing I so 
call is. We have then in every sensation two 
distinct terms, {1) ■ consciousness, ' in respect of 
which all sensations are alike; and (2) something 
else, in respect of which one sensation differs from 
another. It will be convenient if I may be allowed 
to call this second term the ' object ' of a sensation : 
this also without yet attempting to say what I mean 
by the word. 

We have then in every sensation two distinct 
elements, one which I call consciousness, and 
another which I call the object of consciousness. 
This must be so if the sensation of blue and the 
sensation of green, though different in one respect, 
are alike in another : blue is one object of sensation 
and green is another, and consciousness, which both 
sensations have in common, is different from either. 

But, further, sometimes the sensation of blue 
exists in my mind and sometimes it does not ; and 
knowing, as we now do, that the sensation of blue 
includes two different elements, namely conscious- 

B 



18 THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 

ness and blue, the question arises whether, when 
the sensation of blue exists, it is the consciousness 
which exists, or the blue which exists, or both. 
And one point at least is plain : namely that these 
three alternatives are all different from one another. 
So that, if any one tells us that to say ' Blue exists ' 
is the same thing as to say that ' Both blue and 
consciousness exist,' he makes a mistake and a self- 
contradictory mistake. 

But another point is also plain, namely, that when 
the sensation, exists, the consciousness, at least, 
certainly does exist ; for when I say that the 
sensations of blue and of green both exist, I 
certainly mean that what is common to both and in 
virtue of which both are called sensations, exists in 
each case. The only alternative left, then, is that 
either both exist or the consciousness exists alone. 
If, therefore, any one tells us that the existence of 
blue is the same thing as the existence of the 
sensation of blue he makes a mistake and a self- 
contradictory mistake, for he asserts either that blue 
is the same thing as blue together with conscious- 
ness, or that it is the same thing as consciousness 
alone. 

Accordingly to identify either " blue " or any other 
of what I have called "objects " of sensation, with the 
corresponding sensation is in every case, a self- 
contradictory error. It is to identify a part either 
with the whole of which it is a part or else with the 
other part of the same whole. If we are told that 
the assertion " Blue exists " is meaningless unless we 
mean by it that "The sensation of blue exists,'* we 
are told what is certainly false and self-contradictory. 
If we are told that the existence of blue is 
inconceivable apart from the existence of the 
sensation, the speaker probably means to convey to 
us, by this ambiguous expression, what is a self- 
contradictory error. For we can and must conceive 



THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 19 

the existence of blue as something quite distinct 
from the existence of the sensation. We can and 
must conceive that blue might exist and yet the 
sensation of blue not exist. For my own part I not 
only conceive this, but conceive it to be true. 
Either therefore this terrific assertion of 
inconceivability means what is false and self- 
contradictory or else it means only that as a matter 
of fact blue never can exist unless the sensation of 
it exists also. 

And at this point I need not conceal my opinion 
that no philosopher has ever yet succeeded in 
avoiding this self-contradictory error : that the 
most striking results both of Idealism and of 
Agnosticism are only obtained by identifying blue 
with the sensation of blue : that esse is held to be 
percipi* solely because what is experienced is held to 
be identical with the experience of it. That 
Berkeley and Mill committed this error will, 
perhaps, be granted : that modern Idealists make it 
will, I hope, appear more probable later. But that 
my opinion is plausible, I will now offer two pieces 
of evidence. The first is that language offers us no 
means of referring to such objects as " blue " and 
M green " and "sweet," except by calling them 
sensations : it is an obvious violation of language to 
call them "things " or "objects " or " terms." And 
similarly we have no natural means of referring 
to such objects as " causality " or " likeness " or 
identity," except by calling them "ideas" or 
notions" or "conceptions." But it is hardly 
likely that if philosophers had clearly distinguished 
in the past between a sensation or idea and what I 
have called its object, there should have been no 
separate name for the latter. They have always 
used the same name for these two different " things n 
(if I may call them so) : and hence there is some 
probability that they have supposed these " things " 



«l 
If 



20 THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 

not to be two and different, but one and the same. 
And, secondly, there is a very good reason why 
they should have supposed so, in the fact that when 
we refer to introspection and try to discover what 
the sensation of blue is, it is very easy to suppose 
that we have before us only a single term. The 
term " blue " is easy enough to distinguish, but the 
other element which I have called " consciousness " 
— that which sensation of blue has in common with 
sensation of green — is extremely difficult to fix. 
That many people fail to distinguish it at all is 
sufficiently shown by the fact that there are 
materialists. And, in general, that which makes 
the sensation of blue a mental fact seems to escape 
us: it seems, if I may use a metaphor, to be 
transparent — we look through it and see no thin 
but the blue ; we may be convinced that there 
something but what it is no philosopher, I think, has 
yet clearly recognised. 

But this was a digression. The point I had 
established so far was that in every sensation or idea 
we must distinguish two elements, (i) the "object," 
or that in which one differs from another; and 
(2) "consciousness," or that which all have in 
common — that which makes them sensations or 
mental facts. This being so, it followed that when 
a sensation or idea exists, we have to choose 
between the alternatives that either object alone, or 
consciousness alone, or both, exist ; and I showed 
that of these alternatives one, namely that the 
object only exists, is excluded by the fact that what 
we mean to assert is certainly the existence of a 
mental fact. There remains the question : Do both 
exist ? Or does the consciousness alone ? And to 
this question one answer has hitherto been given 
universally : That both exist. 

This answer follows from the analysis hitherto 
accepted of the relation of what I have called 



THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 21 

"object" to "consciousness" in any sensation or 
idea. It is held that what I call the object is 
merely the " content " of a sensation or idea. It is 
held that in each case we can distinguish two 
elements and two only, (1) the fact that there is 
feeling or experience, ana (2) what is felt or 
experienced ; the sensation or idea, it is said, forms 
a whole, in which we must distinguish two 
11 inseparable aspects," " content " and "existence/* 
I shall try to show that this analysis is false ; and 
for that purpose I must ask what may seem an 
extraordinary question : namely what is meant by 
saying that one thing is " content " of another ? It 
is not usual to ask this question ; the term is used 
as if everybody must understand it But since I am 
going to maintain that " blue " is not the content of 
the sensation of blue, and what is more important, 
that, even if it were this analysis would leave out 
the most important element in the sensation of blue, 
it is necessary that I should try to explain precisely 
what it is that I shall deny. 

What then is meant by saying that one thing is 
the " content " of another ? First of all I wish to 
point out that M blue " is rightly and properly said 
to be part of the content of a blue flower. If, therefore, 
we also assert that it is part of the content of the 
sensation of blue, we assert that it has to the 
other parts (if any) of this whole the same relation 
which it has to the other parts of a blue flower — and 
we assert only this : we cannot mean to assert that 
it has to the sensation of blue any relation which it 
does not have to the blue flower. And we have 
seen that the sensation of blue contains at least one 
other element beside blue — namely, what I call 
•'consciousness," which makes it a sensation. So 
far then as we assert that blue is the content of the 
sensation, we assert that it has to this " conscious- 
ness " the same relation which it has to the other 



22 THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 

parts of a blue flower : we do assert this, and we 
assert no more than this. Into the question what 
exactly the relation is between blue and a blue 
flower in virtue of which we call the former part of 
its " content" I do not propose to enter. It is 
sufficient for my purpose to point out that it is the 
general relation most commonly meant when we 
talk of a thing and its qualities ; and that this 
relation is such that to say the thing exists implies 
that the qualities also exist. The content of the 
thing is what we assert to exist, when we assert that 
the thing exists. 

When, therefore, blue is said to be part of the 
content of the " sensation of blue," the latter is 
treated as if it were a whole constituted in exactly 
the same way as any other " thing." The " sensation 
of blue," on this view, differs from a blue bead or a 
blue beard, in exactly the same way in which the 
two latter differ from one another : the blue bead 
differs from the blue beard, in that while the former 
contains glass, the latter contains hair; and the 
" sensation of blue " differs from both in that, 
instead of glass or hair, it contains consciousness. 
The relation of the blue to the consciousness is 
conceived to be exactly the same as that of the 
blue to the glass or hair : it is in all three cases the 
quality of a thing. 

But I said just now that the sensation of blue was 
analysed into "content" and "existence," and that 
blue was said to be the content of the idea of blue. 
There is an ambiguity in this and a possible error, 
which I must note in passing. The term " content " 
may be used in two senses. If we use "content" 
as equivalent to what Mr. Bradley calls the " what " — 
if we mean by it the whole of what is said to exist, 
when the thing is said to exist, then blue is 
certainly not the content of the sensation of blue : 
part of the content of the sensation is, in this sense 



THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 23 

of the term, that other element which I have called 
consciousness. The analysis of this sensation into 
the "content" "blue," on the one hand, and mere 
existence on the other, is therefore certainly false ; 
in it we have again the self-contradictory 
identification of " Blue exists " with " The sensation 
of blue exists," But there is another sense in which 
" blue " might properly be said to be the content of 
the sensation — namely, the sense in which " content," 
like eSJoy, is opposed to "substance" or "matter.' 
For the element " consciousness/' being common to 
all sensations, may be and certainly is regarded as 
in some sense their "substance," and by the 
" content " of each is only meant that in respect of 
which one differs from another. In this sense then 
" blue " might be said to be the content of the 
sensation ; but, in that case, the analysis into 
" content " and " existence " is, at least, misleading, 
since under "existence" must be included "what 
exists " in the sensation other than blue. 

We have it, then, as a universally received 
opinion that blue is related to the sensation or 
idea of blue, as its content, and that this view, if it is 
to be true, must mean that blue is part of what is 
said to exist when we say that the sensation exists. 
To say that the sensation exists is to say both that 
blue exists and that "consciousness," whether we 
call it the substance of which blue is the content or 
call it another part of the content, exists too. Any 
sensation or idea is a "thing" and what I have 
called its object is the quality of this thing. Such a 
"thing" is what we think of when we think of a 
mental image. A mental image is conceived as if it 
were related to that of which it is the image (if there 
be any such thing) in exactly the same way as the 
image in a looking-glass is related to that of which 
it is the reflection ; in both cases there is identity of 
content, and the image in the looking-glass differs 



24 THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 

from that in the mind solely in respect of the fact 
that in the one case the other constituent of the 
image is "glass" and in the other case it is 
consciousness. If the image is oi blue, it is not 
conceived that this "content" has any relation to 
the consciousness but what it has to the glass : it is 
conceived merely to be its content. And owing to 
the fact that sensations and ideas are all considered 
to be wholes of this description— things in the mind— 
the question : What do we know ? is considered to 
be identical with the question : What reason have 
we for supposing that there are things outside the 
mind corrseponding to these that are inside it ? 

What I wish to point out is ( i ) that we have no 
reason for supposing that there are such things as 
mental images at all — for supposing that blue is 
part of the content of the sensation of blue, and (2) 
that even if there are mental images, no mental image 
and no sensation or idea is merely a thing of this 
kind: that 'blue/ even if it is part of the content of 
the image or sensation or idea of blue, is always 
also related to it in quite another way, and that this 
other relation, omitted in the traditional analysis, is 
the only one which makes the sensation of blue a 
mental fact at all. 

The true analysis of a sensation or idea is as 
follows. The element that is common to them all, 
and which I have called 'consciousness," really is 
consciousness. A sensation is, in reality, a case of 
'knowing' or 'being aware of or 'experiencing* 
something. When we know that the sensation of 
blue exists, the fact we know is that there exists an 
awareness of blue. And this awareness is not 
merely, as we have hitherto seen it must be, itself 
something distinct and unique, utterly different from 
blue : it also has a perfectly distinct and unique 
relation to blue, a relation which is not that of thing 
or substance to content, nor of one part of content 



THE REFUTATION OP IDEALISM %$ 

to another part of content. This relation is just 
that which we mean in every case by 'knowing.' 
To have in your mind • knowledge ' of blue, is not 
to have in your mind a ' thing ' or ' image ' of which 
blue is the content. To be aware of the sensation 
of blue is not to be aware of a mental image— of a 
" thing," of which ' blue ' and some other element 
are constituent parts in the same sense in which 
blue and glass are constituents of a blue bead. It 
is to be aware of an awareness of blue ; awareness 
being used, in both cases, in exactly the same sense. 
This element, we have seen, is certainly neglected 
by the ' content ' theory : that theory entirely fails to 
express the fact that there is, in the sensation of 
blue, this unique relation between blue and the 
other constituent. And what I contend is that this 
omission is not mere negligence of expression, but 
is due to the fact that though philosophers have 
recognised that something distinct is meant by 
consciousness, they have never yet had a clear 
conception of what that something is. They have 
not been able to hold it and blue before their minds 
and to compare them, in the same way in which 
they can compare blue and green. And this for the 
reason I gave above : namely that the moment we 
try to fix our attention upon consciousness and to 
see what, distinctly, it is, it seems to vanish : it 
seems as if we had before us a mere emptiness. 
When we try to introspect the sensation of blue, all 
we can see is the blue : the other element is as if it 
were diaphanous. Yet it can be distinguished if we 
look attentively enough, and if we know that there 
is something to look for. My main object in this 
paragraph has been to try to make the reader see 
it; but I fear I shall have succeeded very ill. 

It being the case, then, that the sensation of blue 
includes in its analysis, beside blue, both a unique 
element * awareness ' and a unique relation of this 



26 THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 

element to blue, I can make plain what I meant by 
asserting, as two distinct propositions, (i) that blue 
is probably not part of the content of the sensation 
at all, and (2) that, even it were, the sensation 
would nevertheless not be the sensation of blue, if 
blue had only this relation to it The first hypo- 
thesis may now be expressed by saying that, if it 
were true, then, when the sensation of blue exists, 
there exists a blue awareness : offence may be taken 
at the expression, but yet it expresses just what 
should be and is meant by saying that blue is, in 
this case, a content of consciousness or experience. 
Whether or not, when I have the sensation of blue, 
my consciousness or awareness is thus blue, my 
introspection does not enable me to decide with 
certainty : I only see no reason for thinking that it 
is. But whether it is or not, the point is un- 
important, for introspection does enable me to decide 
that something else is also true : namely that I am 
aware of blue, and by this I mean, that my aware- 
ness has to blue a quite different and distinct 
relation. It is possible, I admit, that my awareness 
is blue as well as being of blue : but what I am 
quite sure of is that it is of blue ; that it has to blue 
the simple and unique relation the existence of which 
alone justifies us in distinguishing knowledge of a 
thing from the thing known, indeed in distinguishing 
mind from matter. And this result I may express 
by saying that what is called the content of a 
sensation is in very truth what I originally called it 
— the sensation's object. 

But, if all this be true, what follows ? 

Idealists admit that some things really exist of 
which they are not aware : there are some things, 
they hold, which are not inseparable aspects of 
their experience, even if they be inseparable aspects 
of some experience. They further hold that some 
of the things of which they are sometimes aware do 



THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 27 

really exist, even when they are not aware of them : 
they hold for instance that they are sometimes 
aware of other minds, which continue to exist even 
when they are not aware of them. They are, 
therefore, sometimes aware of something which is 
not an inseparable aspect of their own experience. 
They do know some things which are not a mere 
part or content of their experience. And what my 
analysis of sensation has been designed to show is, 
that whenever I have a mere sensation or idea, the 
fact is that I am then aware of something which is 
equally and in the same sense not an inseparable 
aspect of my experience. The awareness which I 
have maintained to be included in sensation is the 
very same unique fact which constitutes every kind 
of knowledge : " blue " is as much an object, and 
as little a mere content, of my experience, when I 
experience it, as the most exalted and independent 
real thing of which I am ever aware. There 
is, therefore, no question of how we are to "get 
outside the circle of our own ideas and sensations." 
Merely to have a sensation is already to be outside 
that circle. It is to know something which is as 
truly and really not a part of my experience, as 
anything which I can ever know. 

Now I think I am not mistaken in asserting that 
the reason why Idealists suppose that everything 
which is must be an inseparable aspect of some 
experience, is that they suppose some things, at 
least, to be inseparable aspects of their experience. 
And there is certainly nothing which they are so 
firmly convinced to be an inseparable aspect of 
their experience as what they call the content of 
their ideas and sensations. If, therefore, this turns 
out in every case, whether it be also the content 
or not, to be at least not an inseparable aspect of 
the experience of it, it will be readily admitted that 
nothing else which we experience ever is such an 



28 THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 

inseparable aspect But if we never experience 
anything but what is not an inseparable aspect of 
that experience, how can we infer that anything 
whatever, let alone everything, is an inseparable 
aspect of any experience ? How utterly unfounded 
is the assumption that " esse is percipi " appears in 
the clearest light. 

But further I think it may be seen that if the 
object of an Idealist's sensation were, as he sup- 
poses, not the object but merely the content of 
that sensation, if, that is to say, it really were an 
inseparable aspect of his experience, each Idealist 
could never be aware either of himself or of any 
other real thing. For the relation of a sensation 
to its object is certainly the same as that of any 
other instance of experience to its object ; and this, 
I think, is generally admitted even by Idealists : 
they state as readily that what is judged or thought 
or perceived is the content of that judgment or 
thought or perception, as that blue is the content 
of the sensation of blue. But, if so, then when any 
Idealist thinks he is aware of himself or of any one 
else, this cannot really be the case. The fact is, on his 
own theory, that himself and that other person are 
in reality mere contents of an awareness, which is 
aware of nothing whatever. All that can be said 
is that there is an awareness in him, with a certain 
content : it can never be true that there is in him 
a consciousness of anything. And similarly he is 
never aware either of the fact that he exists or that 
reality is spiritual. The real fact, which he 
describes in those terms, is that his existence and 
the spirituality of reality are contents of an aware- 
ness, which is aware of nothing — certainly not, then, 
of it own content. 

And further if everything, of which he thinks he 
is aware, is in reality merely a content of his own 
experience he has certainly no reason for holding 



THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 29 

that anything does exist except himself : it will, of 
course, be possible that other persons do exist; 
solipsism will not be necessarily true ; but he can- 
not possibly infer from anything he holds that it 
is not true. That he himself exists will of course 
follow from his premiss that many things are 
contents of his experience. But since everything, 
of which he thinks himself aware, is in reality 
merely an inseparable aspect of that awareness ; 
this premiss allows no inference that any of these 
contents, far less any other consciousness, exists at 
all except as an inseparable aspect of his awareness, 
that is, as part of himself. 

Such, and not those which he takes to follow 
from it, are the consequences which do follow from 
the Idealist's supposition that the object of an 
experience is in reality merely a content or in- 
separable aspect of that experience. If, on the 
other hand, we clearly recognise the nature of that 
peculiar relation which I have called "awareness 
of anything"; if we see that this is involved 
equally in the analysis of every experience — from 
the merest sensation to the most developed per- 
ception or reflexion, and that this is in fact the only 
essential element in an experience — the only thing 
that is both common and peculiar to all experiences— 
the only thing which gives us reason to call any 
fact mental ; if, further, we recognise that this 
awareness is and must be in all cases of such a 
nature that its object, when we are aware of it, is 
precisely what it would ba, if we were not aware : 
then it becomes plain that the existence of a table 
in space is related to my experience of it in pre- 
cisely the same way as the existence of my own 
experience is related to my experience of that. Of 
both we are merely aware : if we are aware that 
the one exists, we are aware in precisely the same 
sense that the other exists ; and if it is true that my 



3 o THE REFUTATION OF IDEALISM 

experience can exist, even when I do not happen 
to be aware of its existence, we have exactly the 
same reason for supposing that the table can do so 
also. When, therefore, Berkeley, supposed that 
the only thing of which I am directly aware is my 
own sensations and ideas, he supposed what was 
false ; and when Kant supposed that the objectivity 
of things in space consisted in the fact that they 
were " Vorstellungen " having to one another 
different relations from those which the same 
_^" Vorstellungen " have to one another in subjective 
• experience, he supposed what was equally false. I 
am as directly aware of the existence of material 
things in space as of my own sensations ; and what 
I am aware of with regard to each is exactly the 
same — namely that in one case the material thing, 
and in the other case my sensation does really 
exist. The question requiring to be asked about 
material things is thus not : What reason have we 
for supposing that anything exists corresponding 
to our sensations ? but : What reason have we for 
supposing that material things do not exist, since 
their existence has precisely the same evidence as 
that of our sensations ? That either exist may be 
false ; but if it is a reason for doubting the existence 
of matter, that it is an inseparable aspect of our 
experience, the same reasoning will prove con- 
clusively that our experience does not exist either, 
since that must also be an inseparable aspect of our 
£ experience of it. The only reasonable alternative 
~to the admission that matter exists as well as spirit, 
is absolute Scepticism — that, as likely as not nothing 
exists at all. All other suppositions — the Agnostic's, 
that something, at all events, does exist, as much 
as the Idealist's, that spirit does — are, if we have 
no reason for believing in matter, as baseless as the 
grossest superstitions. 



THE NATURE AND REALITY OF 
OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 



There are two beliefs in which almost all phil- 
osophers, and almost all ordinary people are agreed. 
Almost everyone believes that he himself and what 
he directly perceives do not constitute the whole of 
reality : ne believes that something other than 
himself and what he directly perceives exists or 
is real. I do not mean to say that almost everyone 
believes that what he directly perceives is real : I 
only mean that he does believe that, whether what 
he directly perceives is real or not, something other 
than it and other than himself certainly is so. And 
not only does each of us thus agree in believing 
that something other than himself and what he 
directly perceives is real : almost everyone also 
believes that among the real things, other than 
himself and what he directly perceives, are other 
persons who have thoughts and perceptions in some 
respects similar to his own. That most people 
believe this I think I need scarcely try to show. 
But since a good many philosophers may appear to 
have held views contradictory of this one, I will 
briefly point out my reason for asserting that most 
philosophers, even among those (if any) who have 
believed the contradictory of this, have yet held this 
as well. Almost all philosophers tell us something 
about the nature of human knowledge and human 
perception. They tell us that we perceive so and 



32 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

so ; that the nature or origin of our perceptions is 
such and such ; or (as I have just been telling you) 
that men in general have such and such beliefs. It 
might, indeed, be said that we are not to interpret 
such language too strictly : that, though a phil- 
osopher talks about human knowledge and our 
perceptions, he only means to talk about his own. 
But in many cases a philosopher will leave no doubt 
upon this point, by expressly assuming that there 
are other perceptions, which differ in some respect9 
from his own : such, for instance, is the case when 
(as is so common nowadays) a philosopher introduces 
psycho-genetic considerations into his arguments 
—considerations concerning the nature of the 
perceptions of men who existed before and at a 
much lower stage of culture than himself. Any 
philosopher, who uses such arguments, obviously 
assumes that perceptions other than his own have 
existed or been real. And even those philosophers 
who think themselves justified in the conclusion 
that neither their own perceptions nor any percep- 
tions like theirs are ultimately real, would, I think 
admit, that phenomenally, at least, they are real, and 
are certainly more real than some other things. 

Almost everyone, then, does believe that some 
perceptions other than his own, and which he 
nimself does not directly perceive, are real ; and 
believing this, he believes that something other 
than himself and what he directly perceives is real. 
But how do we know that anything exists except 
our own perceptions, and what we directly perceive ? 
How do we know that there are any other people, 
who have perceptions in some respects similar to 
our own ? 

I believe that these two questions express very 
exactly the nature of the problem which it is my 
chief object, in this paper, to discuss. When I say 
these words to you, they will at once suggest to 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 33 

your minds the very question, to which I desire to 
find an answer ; they will convey to you the very 
same meaning which I have before my mind, when 
I use the words. You will understand at once what 
question it is that I mean to ask. But, for all that, 
the words which I have used are highly ambiguous. 
If you begin to ask yourselves what I do mean by 
them, you will find that there are several quite 
different things which I might mean. And there is, 
I think, great danger of confusing these different 
meanings with one another. I think that philoso- 
phers, when they have asked this question in one 
sense, have often answered it in quite a different 
sense; and yet have supposed that the answer 
which they have given is an answer to the very 
same question which they originally asked. It is 
precisely because there is this ambiguity — this 
danger of confusion, in the words which I have 
used, that I have chosen to use them. I wish to 
point out as clearly as I can, not only what I do 
mean by them, but also some things which I do not 
mean ; and I wish to make it clear that the questions 
which I do not mean to ask, are different questions 
from that which I do mean to ask. 

I will take the second of my two questions, since 
there is in the other an additional ambiguity to 
which I do not now wish to call attention. My 
second question was : How do we know that there 
exist any other people who have perceptions in 
some respects similar to our own ? What does this 
question mean ? 

Now I think you may have noticed that when 
you make a statement to another person, and he 
answers "How do you know that that is so ? " he 
very often means to suggest that you do not know 
it And yet, though he means to suggest that you 
do not know it, he may not for a moment wish to 
suggest that you do not believe it, nor even that you 
c 



34 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

have not that degree or kind of conviction, which 
goes beyond mere belief, and which may be taken 
to be essential to anything which can properly be 
called knowledge. He does not mean to suggest 
for a moment that you are saying something which 
you do not believe to be true, or even that you are 
not thoroughly convinced of its truth. What he 
does mean to suggest is that what you asserted was 
not true, even though you may not only have 
believed it but felt sure that it was true. He 
suggests that you don't know it, in the sense that 
what you believe or feel sure of is not true. 

Now I point this out, not because I myself mean 
to suggest that we don't know the existence of other 
persons, but merely in order to show that the word 
'' know " is sometimes used in a sense in which it is 
not merely equivalent to "believe" or "feel sure 
of." When the question "How do you know that?" 
is asked, the questioner does not merely mean to 
ask "how do you come to believe that, or to be 
convinced of it?" He sometimes, and I think 
generally, means to ask a question with regard to 
the truth, and not with regard to the existence of 
your belief. And similarly when I ask the question 
"How do we know that other people exist ? " I 
do not mean to ask " How do we come to believe 
in or be convinced of their existence ? " I do not 
intend to discuss this question at alL I shall not 
ask what suggests to us our belief in the existence of 
other persons or of an external world ; I shall not 
ask whether we arrive at it by inference or by 
" instinct " or in any other manner, which ever has 
been or may be suggested: I shall discuss no 
question of any kind whatever with regard to its 
origin, or cause, or the way in which it arises. These 
psychological questions are not what I propose to 
discuss. When I ask the question " How do we 
know that other people exist ? " I do not mean : 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 35 

" How does our belief in their existence 
arise? 

But if I do not mean this what do I mean ? I 
have said that I mean to ask a question with regard 
to the truth of that belief; and the particular 
question which I mean to ask might be expressed 
in the words : What reason have we for our belief 
in the existence of other persons ? But these are 
words which themselves need some explanation, and 
I will try to give it. 

In the first place, then, when I talk of "a reason/* 
I mean only a good reason and not a bad one. A 
bad reason is, no doubt, a reason, in one sense of 
the word ; but I mean to use the word " reason " 
exclusively in the sense in which it is equivalent to 
"good reason." But what, then, is meant by a 
good reason for a belief? I think I can express 
sufficiently accurately what I mean by it in this 
connection, as follows : — A good reason for a belief 
is a proposition which is true, and which would not 
be true unless the belief were also true. We should, 

I think, commonly say that when a man knows such 
a proposition, he has a good reason for his belief; 
and, when he knows no such proposition, we should 
say that he has no reason for it. When he knows 
such a proposition, we should say he knows some- 
thing which is a reason for thinking his belief to be 
true — something from which it could be validly 
inferred. And if, in answer to the question " How 
do you know so and so ? " he were to state such a 
proposition, we should, I think, feel that he had 
answered the question which we meant to ask. 
Suppose, for instance, in answer to the question 

II How do you know that ? " he were to say " I saw 
it in the Times" Then, if we believed that he had 
seen it in the Times, and also believed that it would 
not have been in the Times, unless it had been true, 
we should admit that he had answered our question. 



36 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

We should no longer doubt that he did know what 
he asserted, we should no longer doubt that his 
belief was true. But if, on the other hand, we 
believed that he had not seen it in the Times — if, 
for instance, we had reason to believe that what he 
saw was not the statement which he made, but some 
other statement which he mistook for it ; or if we 
believed that the kind of statement in question was 
one with regard to which there was no presumption 
that, being in the Times, it would be true : in either 
of these cases we should, I think, feel that he had 
not answered our question. We should still doubt 
whether what he had said was true. We should 
still doubt whether he knew what he asserted ; and 
since a man cannot tell you how he knows a thing 
unless he does know that thing, we should think 
that, though he might have told us truly how he 
came to believe it, he had certainly not told us how 
he knew it But though we should thus hold that 
he had not told us how he knew what he had asserted, 
and that he had given us no reason for believing it 
to be true ; we must yet admit that he had given us 
a reason in a sense — a bad reason, a reason which 
was no reason because it had no tendency to show 
that what he believed was true ; and we might 
also be perfectly convinced that he had given us the 
reason why he believed it — the proposition by 
believing which he was induced also to believe his 
original assertion. 

I mean, then, by my question, " How do we know 
that other people exist?" what, I believe, is 
ordinarily meant, namely, "What reason have we 
for believing that they exist ? " and by this again I 
mean, what I also believe is ordinarily meant, 
namely, " What proposition do we believe, which is 
both true itself and is also such that it would not be 
true, unless other people existed ? " And I hope it 
is plain that this question, thus explained, is quite a 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 37 

different question from the psychological question, 
which I said I did not mean to ask — from the 
question, " How does our belief in the existence of 
other people arise ? " My illustration, I hope, has 
made this plain. For I have pointed out that we 
may quite well hold that a man has told us how a 
belief of his arises, and even what was the reason 
which made him adopt that belief, and yet may have 
failed to give us any good reason for his belief — any 
proposition which is both true itself, and also such 
that the truth of his belief follows from it And, 
indeed, it is plain that if any one ever believes what 
is false, he is believing something for which there is 
no good reason, in the sense which I have explained, 
and for which, therefore, he cannot possibly have a 
[ood reason ; and yet it plainly does not follow that 
lis belief did not arise in anyway whatever, nor 
even that he had no reason for it — no bad reason. 
It is plain that false beliefs do arise in some way or 
other — they have origins and causes : and many 
people who hold them have bad reasons for holding 
them — their belief does arise (by inference or other- 
wise) from their belief in some other proposition, 
which is not itself true, or else is not a good reason 
for holding that, which they infer from it, or which, 
in some other way, it induces them to believe. I 
submit, therefore, that the question, "What good 
reason have we for believing in the existence of 
other people ? " is different from the question, " How 
does that belief arise ? " But when I say this, I 
must not be misunderstood ; I must not be under- 
stood to affirm that the* answer to both questions 
may not, in a sense, be the same. I fully admit 
that the very same fact, which suggests to us the 
belief in the existence of other people, may also be 
a good reason for believing that they do exist. All 
that I maintain is that the question whether it is a 
good reason for that belief is a different question 



38 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

from the question whether it suggests that belief: 
if we assert that a certain fact both suggests our 
belief in the existence of other persons and is also 
a good reason for holding that belief, we are 
asserting two different things and not one only. 
And hence, when I assert, as I shall assert, that we 
have a good reason for our belief in the existence of 
other persons, I must not be understood also to assert 
either that we infer the existence of other persons 
from this good reason, or that our belief in that good 
reason suggests our belief in the existence of other 
persons in any other way. It is plain, I think, that 
a man may believe two true propositions, of which 
the one would not be true, unless the other were 
true too, without, in any sense whatever, having 
arrived at his belief in the ovit from his belief in the 
other ; and it * is plain, at all events, that the 
question whether his belief in the one did arise from 
his belief in the other, is a different question from 
the question whether the truth of the one belief 
follows from the truth of the other. 

I hope, then, that I have made it a little clearer 
what I mean by the question : " What reason have 
we for believing in the existence of other people ? " 
and that what I mean by it is at all events different 
from what is meant by the question : " How does 
our belief in the existence of other people arise ? " 

But I am sorry to say that I have not yet reached 
the end of my explanations as to what my meaning 
is. I am afraid that the subject may seem very 
tedious. I can assure you that I have found it 
excessively tedious to try to make my meaning 
clear to myself. I have constantly found that I was 
confusing one question with another, and that, 
where I had thought I had a good reason for some 
assertion, I had in reality no good reason. But I 
may perhaps remind you that this question, " How 
do we know so and so ? " " What reason have we 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 39 

for believing it ? " is one of which philosophy is full ; 
and one to which the most various answers have 
been given. Philosophy largely consists in giving 
reasons; and the question what are good reasons 
for a particular conclusion and what are bad, is one 
upon which philosophers have disagreed as much as 
on any other question. For one and the same 
conclusion different philosophers have given not 
only different, but incompatible, reasons; and 
conversely different philosophers have maintained 
that one and the same fact is a reason for incom- 
patible conclusions. We are apt, I think, sometimes 
to pay too little attention to this fact. When we 
have taken, perhaps, no little pains to assure our- 
selves that our own reasoning is correct, and 
especially when we know that a great many other 
philosophers agree with us, we are apt to assume 
that the arguments of those philosophers, who have 
come to a contradictory conclusion, are scarcely 
worthy of serious consideration. And yet, I think, 
there is scarcely a single reasoned conclusion in 
philosophy, as to which we shall not find that some 
other philosopher, who has, so far as we know, 
bestowed equal pains on his reasoning, and with 
equal ability, has reached a conclusion incompatible 
with ours. We may be satisfied that we are right, 
and we may, in fact, be so; but it is certain that 
both cannot be right : either our opponent or we 
must have mistaken bad reasons for good. And 
this being so, however satisfied we may be that it is 
not we who have done so, I think we should at 
least draw the conclusion that it is by no means 
easy to avoid mistaking bad reasons for good ; and 
that no process, however laborious, which is in the 
least likely to help us in avoiding this should be 
evaded. But it is at least possible that one source 
of error lies in mistaking one kind of reason for 
another — in supposing that, because there is, in one 



4 o OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

sense, a reason for a given conclusion, there is also 
a reason in another, or that because there is, in one 
sense, no reason for a given conclusion, there is, 
therefore, no reason at all. I believe myself that 
this is a very frequent source of error : but it is at 
least a possible one. And where, as disagreements 
show, there certainly is error on one side or the 
other, and reason, too, to suppose that the error is 
not easy to detect, I think we should spare no pains 
in investigating any source, from which it is even 
possible that the error may arise. For these reasons 
I think I am perhaps doing right in trying to explain 
as clearly as possible not only what reasons we have 
for believing in an external world, but also in what 
sense I take them to be reasons. 

I proceed, then with my explanation. And there 
is one thing, which, I think my illustration has 
shown that I do not mean. I have defined a reason 
for a belief as a true proposition, which would not 
be true unless the belief itself — what is believed — 
were also true ; and I have used, as synonymous 
with this form of words, the expressions : A reason 
for a belief is a true proposition from which the 
truth of the belief follows from which it could be 
validly inferred. Now these expressions might 
suggest the idea that I mean to restrict the word 
14 reason," to what, in the strictest sense, might be 
called a logical reason — to propositions from which 
the belief in question follows, according to the rules 
of inference accepted by Formal Logic But I am 
not using the words " follow," " validly inferred," in 
this narrow sense ; I do not mean to restrict the 
words "reason for a belief" to propositions from 
which the laws of Formal Logic state that the 
belief could be deduced. The illustration which I 
gave is inconsistent with this restricted meaning. 
I said that the fact that a statement appeared in the 
Times might be a good reason for believing that 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 41 

that statement was true. And I am using the word 
" reason " in the wide and popular sense, in which 
it really might be. If, for instance, the Times 
stated that the King was dead, we should think 
that was a good reason for believing that the King 
was dead ; we should think that the Times would 
not have made such a statement as that unless the 
King really were dead. We should, indeed, not 
think that the statement in the Times rendered it 
absolutely certain that the King was dead. But it 
is extremely unlikely that the Times would make a 
statement of this kind unless it were true ; and, in 
that sense, the fact of the statement appearing in 
the Times would render it highly probable — much 
more likely than not — that the King was dead. 
And I wish it to be understood that I am using the 
words " reason for a belief" in this extremely wide 
sense. When I look for a good reason for our 
belief in the existence of other people, I shall not 
reject any proposition merely on the ground that it 
only renders their existence probable — only shows 
it to be more likely than not that they exist 
Provided that the proposition in question does 
render it positively probable that they exist, then, if 
it also conforms to the conditions which I am about 
to mention, I shall call it a " good reason. 19 

But it is not every proposition which renders it 
probable that other people exist, whjch I shall 
consider to be a good answer to my question. I 
have just explained that my meaning is wide in one 
direction — in admitting some propositions which 
render a belief merely probable ; but I have now to 
explain that it is restricted in two other directions. 
I do mean to exclude certain propositions which do 
render that belief probable. When I ask: What 
reason have we for believing in the existence of 
other people ? a certain ambiguity is introduced by 
the use of the plural "we." If each of several 



42 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

different persons has a reason for believing that he 
himself exists, then it is not merely probable, but 
certain, according to the rules of Formal Logic, that, 
in a sense, they " have a reason for believing " that 
several people exist ; each has a reason for believing* 
that he himself exists ; and, therefore, all of them, 
taken together, have reasons for supposing that 
several persons exist. If, therefore, I were asking 
the question : What reason have we for believing 
in the existence of other persons ? in this sense, it 
would follow that if each of us has a reason for 
believing in his own existence, these reasons, taken 
together, would be a reason for believing in the 
existence of all of us. But I am not asking the 
question in this sense : it is plain that this is not its 
natural sense. What I do mean to ask is : Does 
each single one of us know any proposition, which is 
a reason for believing that others exist? I am 
using " we," that is to say, in the sense of " each of 
us." But again I do mean each of us: I am not 
merely asking whether some one man knows a 
proposition which is a reason for believing that 
other men exist. It would be possible that some 
one man, or some few men, should know such a 
proposition, and yet the rest know no such pro- 
position. But I am not asking whether this is the 
case. I am asking whether among propositions of 
the kind which (as we commonly suppose) all or 
almost all men know, there is any which is a reason 
for supposing that other men exist And in asking 
this question I am not begging the question by 
supposing that all men do exist. My question 
might, I think, be put quite accurately as follows. 
There are certain kinds of belief which, as we 
commonly suppose, all or almost all men share. I 
describe this kind of belief as "our " beliefs, simply 
as an easy way of pointing out which kind of belief 
I mean, but without assuming that all men do share 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 43 

them. And I then ask : Supposing a single man to 
have beliefs of this kind, which among them would 
be a good reason for supposing that other men 
existed having like beliefs ? 

This, then, is the first restriction which I put 
upon the meaning of my question. And it is, I 
think, a restriction which, in their natural meaning, 
the words suggest When we ask : What reason 
have we for believing that other people exist ? we 
naturally understand that question to be equivalent 
to: What reason has each of us for that belief? 
And this question again is naturally equivalent to 
the question : Which among the propositions that a 
single man believes, but which are of the kind 
which (rightly or wrongly) we assume all men to 
believe, are such that they would not be true unless 
some other person than that man existed? But 
there is another restriction which, I think, the words 
of my question also naturally suggest. If we were 
to ask anyone the question : How do you know that 
you did see that statement in the Times! and he 
were to answer " Because I did see it in the Times 
and in the Standard too," we should not think that 
he had given us a reason for the belief that he saw 
it in the Times. We should not think his answer a 
reason, because it asserts the very thing for which 
we require a reason. And similarly when I ask: 
How do we know that any thing or person exists, 
other than ourselves and what we directly perceive ?. 
What reason have we for believing this ? I must 
naturally be understood to mean : What proposition, 
other than one which itself asserts or presupposes 
the existence of something beyond ourselves and 
our own perceptions, is a reason for supposing that 
such a thing exists ? And this restriction obviously 
excludes an immense number of propositions of a 
kind which all of us do believe. We all of us 
believe an immense number of different propositions 



44 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

about the existence of things which we do not 
directly perceive, and many of these propositions 
are, in my sense, good reasons for believing in the 
existence of still other things. The belief in the 
existence of a statement in the Times, when we 
have not seen that statement, may, as I implied, be 
a good reason for believing that someone is dead. 
But no such proposition can be a good answer to 
my question, because it asserts the very kind of 
thing for which I require a reason : it asserts the 
existence of something other than myself and what 
I directly perceive. When I am asking: What 
reason have I for believing in the existence of 
anything but myself, my own perceptions, and what 
I do directly perceive ? you would naturally under- 
stand me to mean : What reason, other than the 
existence of such a thing, have I for this belief? 

Each of us, then, we commonly assume, believes 
some true propositions, which do not themselves 
assert the existence of anything other than himself, 
his own perceptions, or what he directly perceives. 
Each of us, for instance, believes that he himself 
has and has had certain particular perceptions : and 
these propositions are propositions of the kind I 
mean — propositions which do not themselves assert 
the existence of anything other than himself, his 
own perceptions, and what he directly perceives: they 
are, I think, by no means the only propositions of 
this kind, which most of us believe : but they are 
propositions of this kind. But, as I say, I am not 
assuming that each of us — each of several different 
people — does believe propositions of this kind.. All 
that I assume is that at least one man does believe 
some such propositions. And then I ask: Which 
among those true propositions, which one man 
believes, are such that they would probably not be 
true, unless some other man existed and had certain 
particular perceptions? Which among them are 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 45 

such that it follows (in the wide sense, which I have 
explained) from their truth, that it is more likely 
than not that some other man has perceptions? 
This is the meaning of my question, so far as I 
have hitherto explained it : and I hope this meaning 
is quite clear. It is in this sense that I am asking : 
What reason have we for believing that other 
people exist ? How do we know that they >xist ? 
This, indeed, is not all that I mean by that question: 
there is one other point — the most important one — 
which remains to be explained. But this is pat t of 
what I mean to ask ; and before I go on to explain 
what else I mean, I wish first to stop and enquire 
what is the answer to this part of my question. 
What is the answer to the question : Which among 
the true propositions, of a kind which (as we 
commonly assume) each of us believes, and which 
do not themselves assert the existence of anything 
other than that person himself, his own perceptions, 
or what he directly perceives, are such that they 
would probably not be true unless some other 
person existed, who had perceptions in some re- 
spects similar to his own ? 

Now to this question the answer is very obvious. 
It is very obvious that in this sense we have reasons 
for believing in the existence of other persons, and 
also what some of those reasons are. But I wish to 
make it quite plain that this is so : that in this sense 
one man has a reason for believing that another has 
certain perceptions. All that I am asking you to 

frant, is, you see, that some of you would not be 
aving just those perceptions which you now have, 
unless I, as I read this paper, were perceiving more 
or less black marks on a more or less white ground ; 
or that I on the other hand, should not be having 
just those perceptions which I now have, unless 
some other persons than myself were hearing the 
sounds of my voice. And I am not asking you 



46 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

even to grant that this is certain — only that it is 
positively probable — more likely than not. Surely 
it is very obvious that this proposition is true. But 
I wish to make it quite clear what would be the 
consequences of denying that any such propositions 
are true — propositions which assert that the exist- 
ence of certain perceptions in one man are a reason 
for believing in the existence of certain perceptions 
in another man — which assert that one man would 
probably not have had just those perceptions which 
he did have, unless some other man had had 
certain particular perceptions. It is plain, I think, 
that, unless some such propositions are true, we 
have no more reason for supposing that Alexander 
the Great ever saw an elephant, than for supposing 
that Sindbad the Sailor saw a Roc ; we have no 
more reason for supposing that anybody saw Julius 
Caesar murdered in the Senate House at Rome, 
than for supposing that somebody saw him carried 
up to Heaven in a fiery chariot. It is plain, I think, 
that if we have any reason at all for supposing that 
in all probability Alexander the Great did see an 
elephant, and that in all probability no such person 
as Sindbad the Sailor ever saw a Roc, part of that 
reason consists in the assumption that some other 
person would probably not have had just those 
perceptions which he did have, unless Alexander 
the Great had seen an elephant, and unless Sindbad 
the Sailor had not seen a Roc. And most philoso- 
phers, I think, are willing to admit that we have 
some reason, in some sense or other, for such pro- 
positions as these. They are willing to admit not 
only that some persons probably did see Julius 
Caesar murdered in the Senate House ; but also 
that some persons, other than those who saw it, 
had and have some reason for supposing that some 
one else probably saw it. Some sceptical philoso- 
phers might, indeed, deny both propositions; and 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 47 

to refute their views, I admit, other arguments are 
needed than any which I shall bring forward in this 
paper. But most philosophers will, I think, admit 
not only that facts, for which there is, as we say, 
good historical evidence, are probably true; but 
also that what we call good historical evidence really 
is in some sense a good reason for thinking them 
true. Accordingly I am going to assume that many 
propositions of the following kind are true. Pro- 
positions, namely, which assert that one man would 
Erobably not have certain perceptions which he does 
ave, unless some other man had certain particular 
perceptions. That some of you, for instance, would 
probably not be having precisely the perceptions 
which you are having, unless I were having the 
perception of more or less black marks on a more or 
less white ground. And, in this sense, I say, we 
certainly have reasons for supposing that other 
people have perceptions similar, in some respects, to 
those which we sometimes have. 

But when I said I was going to ask the question : 
What reason have we for supposing that other 
people exist? you will certainly not have thought 
that I merely meant to ask the question which I 
have just answered. My words will have suggested 
to you something much more important than merely 
this. When, for instance, I said that to the question 
" How do you know that ? " the answer " I saw it 
in the Times " would be a satisfactory answer, you 
may have felt, as I felt, that it would not in all 
circumstances be regarded as such. The person 
who asked the question might, in some cases, fairly 
reply : " That is no answer : how do you know that, 
because you saw a thing in the Times, it is therefore 
true?" In other words he might ask for a reason 
for supposing that the occurrence of a particular 
statement in the Times was a reason for supposing 
that statement true. And this is a question to 



48 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

which we all believe that there may be an answer. 
We believe that, with some kinds of statements 
which the Times makes — some kinds of statements 
with regard to Fiscal Policy for example — the fact 
that the Times makes them is no reason for supposing 
them to be true : whereas with regard to other kinds 
of statements, which it makes, such a statement, for 
instance, as that the King was dead, the fact that 
it makes them is a reason for supposing them true. 
We believe that there are some kinds of statements, 
which it is very unlikely the Times would make, 
unless they were true ; and others which it is not 
at all unlikely that the Times might make, although 
they were not true. And we believe that a reason 
might be given for distinguishing, in this way, 
between the two different kinds of statement : for 
thinking that, in some cases (on points, for instance, 
which, as we should say, are not simple questions of 
fact) the Times is fallible, whereas in other cases, it 
is, though not absolutely infallible, very unlikely to 
state what is not true. 

Now it is precisely in this further sense that I 
wish to consider : what reason have we for believing 
that certain particular things, other than ourselves, 
our own perceptions, and what we directly perceive, 
are real? I have asserted that I do have certain 
perceptions, which it is very unlikely I should have, 
unless some other person had certain particular 
perceptions ; that, for instance, it is very unlikely I 
should be having precisely those perceptions which 
I am now having unless someone else were hearing the 
sound of my voice. And I now wish to ask : What 
reason have I for supposing that this is unlikely? 
What reason has any of us for supposing that any such 
proposition is true? And I mean by "having a reason" 
precisely what I formerly meant I mean : What 
other proposition do I know, which would not be 
true, unless my perception were connected with 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 49 

someone else's perception, in the manner in which I 
asserted them to be connected? Here again I am 
asking for a good reason ; and am not asking a 
psychological question with regard to origin. Here 
again I am not asking for a reason, in the 
strict sense of Formal Logic ; I am merely asking 
for a proposition which would probably not be true, 
unless what I asserted were true. Here again I 
am asking for some proposition of a kind which 
each of us believes ; I am asking : What reason 
has each of us for believing that some of his 
perceptions are connected with particular per- 
ceptions of other people in the manner I asserted ? 
— for believing that he would not have certain 
perceptions that he does have, unless some 
other person had certain particular perceptions? 
And here again I am asking for a reason — I am 
asking for some proposition other than one which 
itself asserts : When one man has a perception of 
such and such a particular kind, it is probable that 
another man has a perception or thought of this or 
that other kind. 

But what kind of reason can be given for 
believing a proposition of this sort ? For believing 
a proposition which asserts that, since one particular 
thing exists, it is probable that another particular 
thing also exists ? One thing I think is plain, namely 
that we can have no good reason for believing such 
a proposition, unless we have good reason for 
believing some generalisation. It is commonly 
believed, for instance, that certain so-called flint 
arrow-heads, which have been discovered, -were 
probably made by prehistoric men ; and I think it 
is plain that we have no reason for believing this 
unless we have reason to suppose that objects 
which resemble these in certain particular respects 
are generally made by men — are more often made 
by men than by any other agency. Unless certain 

D 



50 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

particular characteristics which those arrow-heads 
have were characteristics which belonged at least 
more frequently to articles of human manufacture 
than to any articles not made by men, it would 
surely be just as likely as not that these arrow- 
heads were not made by men — that they were, in 
fact not arrow-heads. That is to say, unless we 
have reason to assert a generalisation — the general- 
isation that objects of a certain kind are generally 
made by men, we have no reason to suppose that 
these particular objects, which are of the kind in 
question, were made by men. And the same, so far 
as I can see, is true universally. If we ever have 
any reason for asserting that, since one particular 
thing exists, another probably exists or existed or 
will exist also, part of our reason, at least, must 
consist in reasons for asserting some generalisation 
—for asserting that the existence of things of a 
particular kind is, more often than not, accompanied 
or preceded or followed by the existence of things 
of another particular kind. It is, I think, some- 
times assumed that an alternative to this theory 
may be found in the theory that the existence of 
one kind of thing "intrinsically points to," or is 
"intrinsically a sign or symbol of" the existence of 
another thing. It is suggested that when a thing 
which thus points to the existence of another thing 
exists, then it is at least probable that the thing 
" pointed to " exists also. But this theory, I think, 
offers no real alternative. For, in the first place, when 
we say that the existence of one thing A Is a "sign of 
or " points to " the existence of another thing B, we 
very commonly actually mean to say that when a 
thing like A exists, a thing like B generally exists 
too. We may, no doubt, mean something else too \ 
but this we do mean. We say, for instance, that 
certain particular words, which we hear or read, are 
a "sign" that somebody has thought of the 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 51 

particular things which we call the meaning of 
those words. But we should certainly hesitate to 
admit that the hearing or reading of certain words 
could be called a "sign" of the existence of 
certain thoughts, unless it were true that when 
those words are heard or read, the thoughts in 
question generally have existed. If when those 
words were heard or read, the thoughts had 
generally not existed, we should say that, in one sense 
of the word at all events, the hearing of the words was 
not a sign of the existence of the thoughts. In this 
sense, therefore, to say that the existence of A 
"points to" or "is a sign of" the existence of B 
is actually to say that when A exists, B generally 
exists also. But, no doubt, the words "points to" 
" is a sign of " may be used in some other sense : 
they may, for instance, mean only that the existence 
of A suggests in some way the belief that B exists. 
And in such a case we certainly might know that the 
existence of A pointed to the existence of B, with* 
out knowing that when A existed B generally 
existed also. Let us suppose, then, that in some 
such sense A does "point to" the existence of B ; 
can this fact give us a reason for supposing it even 
probable that B exists ? Certainly it can, provided 
it is true that when A does point to the existence of 
B, B generally exists. But surely it can do so, 
only on this condition. If when A points to the 
existence of B, B, nevertheless, does not generally 
exist, then surely the fact that A points to the 
existence of B can constitute no probability that B 
does not exist : on the contrary it will then be 
probable that, even though A "points to" the 
existence of B, B does not exist. We have, in fact, 
only substituted the generalisation that A's pointing 
to B is generally accompanied by the existence of 
B, for the generalisation that A's existence is 
generally accompanied by the existence of B. If 



52 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

we are to have any reason for asserting that, when 
A points to or is a sign of the existence of B, B 
probably exists, we must still have a reason for 
some generalisation — for a generalisation which 
asserts that when one thing points to the existence 
of another, that other generally exists. 

It is plain, then, I think, that if we are to find a 
reason for the assertion that some particular percep- 
tion of mine would probably not exist, unless some- 
one else were having or had had a perception of a 
kind which I can name, we must find a reason for 
some generalisation. And it is also plain, I think, 
that in many cases of this kind the generalisation 
must consist in an assertion that when one man 
has a certain kind of perception, some other man 
generally has had some other perception or belief. 
We assume, for instance, that when we hear or 
read certain words, somebody besides ourselves 
has thought the thoughts, which constitute the 
meaning of those words ; and it is plain, I think, 
that we have no reason for this assumption except 
one which is also a reason for the assumption that 
when certain words are heard or read, somebody 
generally has had certain thoughts. And my 
enquiry, therefore, at least includes the enquiry : 
What reasons have we for such generalisations as 
these ? for generalisations which assert a connection 
between the existence of a certain kind of perception 
in one man, and that of a certain kind of perception 
or belief in another man ? 

And to this question, I think, but one answer 
can be given. If we have any reason for such 
generalisations at all, some reason must be given, 
in one way or another, by observation — by observa- 
tion, understood in the wide sense in which it 
includes "experiment." No philosopher, I think, 
has ever failed to assume that observation does 
give a reason for some generalisations — for some 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 53 

propositions which assert that when one kind of 
thing exists, another generally exists or has existed 
in a certain relation to it Even those who, like 
Hume, imply that observation cannot give a reason 
for anything, yet constantly appeal to observation 
in support of generalisations of their own. And 
even those who hold that observation can give no 
reason for any generalisation about the relation of 
one man's perceptions to another's, yet hold that it 
can give a reason for generalisations about the 
relation of some to others among a man's own 
perceptions. It is, indeed, by no means agreed 
how observation can give a reason for any generali- 
sation. Nobody knows what reason we have, if 
we have any, for supposing that it can. But that 
it can, everyone, I think, assumes. I think, there- 
fore, most philosophers will agree, that if we can 
find any reason at all for generalisations of the kind 
in which I am interested, a reason for some of them 
at all events must be found in observation. And 
what I propose to ask is : What reason can be found 
in observation for even a single proposition of the 
kind I have described? for a proposition which asserts 
that when one man has one kind of perception, 
another man generally has or has had another. 

But, when it is said that observation gives us a 
reason for generalisations, two things may be meant 
neither of which I mean. In the first place, we 
popularly use " observation " in a sense in which 
we can be said to observe the perceptions, feelings 
and thoughts of other people : in which, therefore, 
we can be said to observe the very things with 
regard to which I am asking what reason we have 
for believing in their existence. But it is universally 1 
agreed that there is a sense in which no man can 
observe the perceptions, feelings or thoughts of any 
other man. And it is to this strict sense that I 

1 Not now in 1921. 



54 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

propose to confine the word. I shall use it in a 
sense, in which we can certainly be said to observe 
nothing but ourselves, our own perceptions, thoughts 
and feelings, and what we directly perceive. And 
in the second place, it may be said that observations 
made by another person may give me a reason for 
believing some generalisation. And it is certainly 
the case that for many of the generalisations in 
which we all believe, if we have a reason in observa- 
tion at all, it is not in our own observation that we 
have it : part of our reason, at all events, lies in 
things which other people have observed but which 
we ourselves have not observed. But in asking 
this particular question, I am not asking for reasons 
of this sort. The very question that I am asking 
is : What reason has any one of us for supposing 
that any other person whatever has ever made any 
observations? And just as, in the first meaning 
which I gave to this question, it meant : What 
thing, that any single man observes is such that it 
would probably not have existed, unless some other 
man had made a particular observation? So now 
I am asking : Which among the things, which one 
single man observes, are such that they would 
probably not have existed, unless it were true that 
some of them generally stood in certain relations 
to observations of some other person ? I am 
asking : Which among my own observations give 
me a reason for supposing that some of them are 
of a kind which are generally preceded or accom- 
panied by observations of other people? Which, 
for instance, among my own observations give a 
good reason for the generalisation that when I hear 
certain words, somebody else has generally had 
certain particular thoughts, or that whenever anyone 
hears certain words, somebody else has generally 
had the thoughts which constitute what we call the 
meaning of those words? I am asking: Which 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 55 

among the vast series of observations, which any 
one individual makes during his lifetime, give a 
good reason for any generalisation whatever of this 
kind — a generalisation which asserts that some of 
them are generally preceded by certain thoughts, 
perceptions or feelings in other persons? I quite 
admit that there are some generalisations of this 
kind for which the observations of some particular 
men will not give a reason. All that I ask is : Is 
there even one generalisation of this kind, for which 
the kind of observations, which (as we commonly 
assume) each man, or nearly every man does make, 
do give a reason ? Among observations of the 
kind which (as we commonly assume) are common 
to you and to me, do yours, by themselves, give any 
reason for even one such generalisation? And do 
mine, by themselves, give any reason for even one 
such generalisation ? And if they do, which, among 
these observations, is it which do so ? 

My question is, then : What reason do my own 
observations give me, for supposing that any per- 
ception whatever, which I have, would probably not 
occur, unless some other person had a certain kind 
of perception? What reason do my own observ- 
ations give me for supposing, for instance, that I 
should not be perceiving what I do now perceive, 
unless someone were hearing the sound of my 
voice? What reason do your own observations 
give you for supposing that you would not be 
perceiving just what you are perceiving, unless I 
were perceiving more or less black marks on a more 
or less white ground ? The question does, I think, 
appear to be a reasonable one ; and most philoso- 
phers, I think, have assumed that there is an answer 
to it. Yet it may be said that there is no answer to 
it: that my own observations give me no reason 
whatever for any single proposition of this kind. 
There are certain philosophers (even apart from 



56 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

thorough sceptics, with whom, as I have said, I am 
not now arguing) who have denied that they do. 
There are certain philosophers who hold that nothing 
which any single one of us observes or can observe, 
gives the slightest reason for supposing that any of 
his own perceptions are generally connected with 
certain perceptions in other people. There are 
philosophers who hold that the only generalisations 
for which our own observations do give any warrant 
are generalisations concerning the manner in which 
our own perceptions, thoughts and feelings do and 
probably will succeed one another; and who con- 
clude that, this being so, we have no reason what- 
ever for believing in the existence of any other 
people. And these philosophers are, I think, right 
in drawing this conclusion from this premiss. It 
does not, indeed, follow from their premiss that we 
have not a reason in the sense which I first ex- 
plained, and in which, I insisted, it must be admitted 
that we have a reason. It does not follow that 
some of our perceptions are not such as would 
probably not exist, unless some other person had 
certain perceptions. But, as I have urged, when 
we say that we have a reason for asserting the 
existence of something not perceived, we commonly 
mean something more than this. We mean not 
only that, since what we perceive does exist, the 
unperceived thing probably exists too; we mean 
also that we have some reason for asserting this 
connection between the perceived and the unper- 
ceived. And holding, as we do, that no reason can 
be given for asserting such a connection, except 
observation, we should say that, if observation gives 
no reason for asserting it, we have no reason for 
asserting it ; and having no reason for asserting this 
conection between the perceived and the unper- 
ceived, we should say that we have none either for 
asserting the even probable existence of the un- 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 57 

perceived. This, I think, is what we commonly 
mean by saying that we have no reason to believe 
in the existence of a particular thing which we do 
not perceive. And hence, I think, those philoso- 
phers who hold that our own observations give us 
no reason whatever for any generalisation whatever 
concerning the connection of any of them with those 
of other people, are quite right in concluding that 
we have no reason to assert that any other person 
ever did have any particular thought or perception 
whatever. I think that the words of this conclusion, 
understood in their natural meaning, express pre* 
cisely what the premiss asserts. We need not, 
indeed, conclude, as many of these philosophers are 
inclined to do, that, because we have no reason for 
believing in the existence of other people, it is 
therefore highly doubtful whether they do exist 
The philosophers who advocate this opinion 
commonly refute themselves by assigning the ex* 
istence of other people as part of their reason for 
believing that it is very doubtful whether any other 
people exist. That for which we have no reason 
may, nevertheless, be certainly true. And, indeed, 
one of the philosophers who hold most clearly and 
expressly that we do know not only the existence 
of other people but also that of material objects, is also 
one of those who deny most emphatically that our 
own observations can give any reason for believing 
either in the one or in the other. I refer to Thomas 
Reid. Reid, indeed, allows himself to use not only 
the word "observe/* but even the word "perceive," 
in that wide sense in which it might be said that we 
observe or perceive the thoughts and feelings of 
others : and I think that the fact that he uses the 
words in this sense, has misled him into thinking 
that his view is more plausible and more in ac- 
cordance with Common Sense than it really is : by 
using the words in this sense he is able to plead 



58 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

that "observation" really does give a reason for 
some of those generalisations, for which Common 
Sense holds that " observation " (in a narrower 
sense) does give a reason. But with regard to what 
we observe or perceive, in the strict sense to which 
I am confining those words, he asserts quite ex- 
plicitly that it gives us no reason either for believing 
in the existence of material objects or for believing 
in the existence of other minds. Berkeley, he says, 
has proved incontrovertibly that it gives us no 
reason for the one, and Hume that it gives us no 
reason for the other. 

Now these philosophers may be right in holding 
this. It may, perhaps, be true that, in this sense, 
my own observations give me no reason whatever 
for believing that any other person ever has or will 
perceive anything like or unlike what I perceive. 
But I think it is desirable we should realise how 
paradoxical are the consequences which must be 
admitted, if this is true. It must then be admitted 
that the very large part of our knowledge, which we 
suppose to nave some basis in experience, is by no 
means based upon experience, in the sense, and to 
the extent, which we suppose. We do for instance, 
commonly suppose that there is some basis in 
experience for the assertion that some people, whom 
we call Germans, use one set of words to express 
much the same meaning which we express by using 
a different set of words. But, if this view be 
correct, we must admit that no person's experience 
gives him any reason whatever for supposing that, 
when he hears certain words, any one else has ever 
heard or thought of the same words, or meant 
anything by them. The view admits, indeed, that 
I do know that when I hear certain words, 
somebody else has generally had thoughts more or 
less similar to those which I suppose him to have 
had : but it denies that my own observations coqlc| 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 59 

ever give me the least reason for supposing that 
this is so. It admits that my own observations may 
give me reason for supposing that */" anyone has ever 
had perceptions like mine in some respects, he will 
also have had other perceptions like others of mine : 
but it denies that they give me any reason for 
supposing that any one else has had a perception 
like one of mine. It admits that my own 
observations may give me reason for supposing that 
certain perceptions and thoughts in one person {if 
they exist) will be followed or preceded by certain 
other perceptions and thoughts in that person : but 
it denies that they give me any reason whatever for 
any similar generalisation concerning the connec- 
tion of a certain kind of perception in one person 
with a certain kind of perception in another. It 
admits that I should not have certain perceptions, 
which I do have, unless someone else had had 
certain other perceptions ; but it denies that my own 
observations can give me any reason for saying so — 
for saying that I should not have had this 
perception, unless someone else had had that. No 
observations of mine, it holds, can ever render it 
probable that such a generalisation is true ; no 
observation of mine can ever confirm or verify such 
a generalisation. If we are to say that any such 
generalisation whatever is based upon observation, 
we can only mean, what Reid means, that it is based 
on a series of assumptions. When I observe this 
particular thing, I assume that that particular thing, 
which I do not observe, exists ; when I observe 
another particular thing, I again assume that a 
second particular thing, which I do not observe, 
exists ; when 1 observe a third particular thing, I 
again assume that a third particular thing, whicn I 
do not observe, exists. These assumed facts — the 
assumed fact that one observation of mine is 
accompanied by the existence of one particular kind 



60 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

of thing, and that another observation of mine is 
accompanied by the existence of a different particu- 
lar kind of thing, will then give me a reason for 
different generalisations concerning the connection 
of different perceptions of mine with different 
external objects — objects which I do not perceive. 
But (it is maintained) nothing but a mass of such 
assumptions will give me a reason for any such 
generalisation. 

Now I think it must be admitted that there is 
something paradoxical in such a view. I think it 
may be admitted that, in holding it, the philosopher 
of Common Sense departs from Common Sense at 
least as far in one direction as his opponents had 
done in another. But I think that there is some 
excuse for those who hold it : I think that, in one 
respect, they are more in the right than those who 
do not hold it — than those who hold that my own 
observations do give me a reason for believing in 
the existence of other people. For those who hold 
that my observations do give me a reason, have, I 
believe, universally supposed that the reason lies in a 
part of my observations, in which no such reason 
is to be found. This is why I have chosen to ask 
the question : What reason do my observations give 
me for believing that any other person has any 
particular perceptions or beliefs ? I wish to 
consider which among the things which I observe 
will give such a reason. For this is a question to 
which no answer, that I have ever seen, appears to 
me to be correct Those who have asked it have, so 
far as I know, answered it either by denying that my 
observations give me any reason or by pointing to 
a part of my observations, which, as it seems to me, 
really do give none. Those who deny are, it seems 
to me, right in holding that the reason given by 
those who affirm is no reason. And their correct 
opinion on this point will, I think, partly serve to 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 61 

explain their denial. They have supposed that if our 
observations give us any reason at all for asserting the 
existence of other people, that reason must lie where 
it has been supposed to lie by those who hold that 
they do give a reason. And then, finding that this 
assigned reason is no reason, they have assumed that 
there is no other. 

I am proposing then to ask : Which among the 
observations, which I make, and which (as we 
commonly suppose) are similar in kind to those 
which all or almost all men make, will give a reason 
for supposing that the existence of any of them is 
generally connected with the existence of certain 
kinds of perception or belief in other people ? And 
in order to answer this question, it is obvious we 
must first consider two others. We must consider, 
in the first place : Of what nature must observations 
be, if they are to give a reason for any generalisation 
asserting that the existence of one kind of thing is 
generally connected with that of another ? And we 
must consider in the second place : What kinds of 
things do we observe ? 

Now to the first of these questions I am not 
going to attempt to give a complete answer. The 
question concerning the rules of Inductive Logic, 
which is the question at issue, is an immensely 
difficult and intricate question. And I am not 
going to attempt to say, what kind of observations 
are sufficient to justify a generalisation. But it is 
comparatively easy to point out that a certain kind 
of observations are necessary to justify a generalisa- 
tion : and this is all that I propose to do. I wish 
to point out certain conditions which observations 
must satisfy, if they are to justify a generalisation ; 
without in any way implying that all observations 
which do satisfy these conditions, will justify a 
generalisation. The conditions, I shall mention, 
are ones which are certainly not sufficient to justify 



62 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

a generalisation ; but they are, I think, conditions, 
without which no generalisation can be justified. If 
a particular kind of observations do not satisfy these 
conditions, we can say with certainty that those 
observations give us no reason for believing in the 
existence of other people ; though, with regard to 
observations which do satisfy them, we shall only 
be able to say that they may give a reason. 

What conditions, then, must observations satisfy, 
if they are to justify a generalisation ? Let us 
suppose that the generalisation to be justified is one 
which asserts that the existence of a kind of object, 
which we will call A, is generally preceded, accom- 
panied, or followed by the existence of a kind of 
object, which we call B. A, for instance, might be 
the hearing of a certain word by one person, and B 
the thought of that which we call the meaning of 
the word, in another person ; and the generalisation 
to be justified might be that when one person hears 
a word, not spoken by himself, someone else has 
generally thought of the meaning of that word. 
What must I have observed, if the generalisation 
that the existence of A is generally preceded by the 
existence of B, is to be justified by my observations ? 
One first point, I think, is plain. I must have 
observed both some object, which is in some respects 
like A, and which I will call a, and also some object 
in some respects like B which I will call fi : I must 
have observed both a and A and also I must have 
observed fi preceding a. This, at least, I must 
have observed. But I do not pretend to say how 
like a and fi must be to A and B ; nor do I pretend 
to say how often I must have observed fi preceding 
a, although it is generally held that I must have 
observed this more than once. These are questions, 
which would have to be discussed if we were trying 
to discover what observations were sufficient to 
justify the generalisation that the existence of A is 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 63 

generally preceded by that of B. But I am only 
trying to lay down the minimum which is necessary 
to justify this generalisation ; and therefore I am 
content to say that we must have observed some- 
thing more or less like B preceding something more 
or less like A, at least once. 

But there is yet another minimum condition. If 
my observation of P preceding a is to justify the 
generalisation that the existence of A is generally 
preceded by the existence of B, it is plain, I think, 
that both the P and the a, which I observed, must 
have existed or been real) and that also the existence 
of p must really have preceded that of a. It is 

Elain that if, when I observed a and 8 f a existed 
ut fi did not, this observation could give me no 
reason to suppose that on another occasion when A 
existed, B would exist. Or again, if, when I 
observed P preceding a, both P and a existed, 
but the existence of P did not really precede that of 
a, but, on the contrary, followed it, this observation 
could certainly give me no reason to suppose that, 
in general, the existence of A was preceded by the 
existence of B. Indeed this condition that what is 
observed must have been real might be said to be 
included in the very meaning of the word " observa- 
tion." We should, in this connection, say that we 
had not observed P preceding a, unless P and a 
were both real, and P had really preceded a. If I 
say " I have observed that, on one occasion, my 
hearing of the word ' moon ' was followed by my 
imagining a luminous silvery disc," I commonly 
mean to include in my statement the assertion that 
I did, on that occasion, really hear the word "moon," 
and really did have a visual image of a luminous 
disc, and that my perception was really followed by 
my imagination. If it were proved to me that this 
had not really happened, I should admit that I had 
not really observed it But though this condition 



64 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

that, if observation is to give reason for a generali- 
sation, what is observed must be real, may thus be 
said to be implied in the very word "observation/' 
it was necessary for me to mention the condition 
explicitly. It was necessary, because, as I shall 
presently show, we do and must also use the word 
" observation " in a sense in which the assertion " I 
observe A " by no means includes the assertion " A 
exists " — in a sense in which it may be true that 
though I did observe A, yet A did not exist. 

But there is also, I think, a third necessary con- 
dition which is very apt to be overlooked. It may, 
perhaps, be allowed that observation gives some 
reason for the proposition that hens' eggs are gener- 
ally laid by hens. I do not mean to say that any 
one man's observation can give a reason for this 
proposition : I do not assume either that it can or 
that it cannot. Nor do I mean to make any as- 
sumption as to what must be meant by the words 
"hens" and "eggs," if this proposition is to be true. 
I am quite willing to allow for the moment that if it 
is true at all, we must understand by " hens " and 
44 eggs," objects very unlike that which we directly 
observe, when we see a hen in a yard, or an egg on 
the breakfast-table. I am willing to allow the 
possibility that, as some Idealists would say, the 
proposition " Hens lay eggs " is false, unless we 
mean by it : A certain kind of collection of spirits 
or monads sometimes has a certain intelligible re- 
lation to another kind of collection of spirits or 
monads. I am willing to allow the possibility that, 
as Reid and some scientists would say, the pro- 
position " Hens lay eggs " is false, if we mean by it 
anything more than that : Certain configurations of 
invisible material particles sometimes have a certain 
spatio-temporal relation to another kind of con* 
figuration of invisible material particles. Or again 
I am willing to allow, with certain other philoso- 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 65 

phers, that we must, if it is to be true, interpret this 
proposition as meaning that certain kinds of sens- 
ations have to certain other kinds a relation which 
may be expressed by saying that the one kind of 
sensations "lay" the other kind. Or again, as 
other philosophers say, the proposition " Hens lay 
eggs " may possibly mean : Certain sensations of 
mine would, under certain conditions, have to certain 
other sensations of mine a relation which may be 
expressed by saying that the one set would "lay" 
the other set. But whatever the proposition " Hens' 
eggs are generally laid by hens" may mean, most 
philosophers would, I think, allow that, in some 
sense or other, this proposition was true. And they 
would also I think allow that we have some reason 
for it ; and that part of this reason at all events lies 
in observation : they would allow that we should 
have no reason for it unless certain things had been 
observed, which have been observed, Few, I think, 
would say that the existence of an egg " intrinsically 
points " to that of a hen, in such a sense that, even 
if we had had no experience of any kind concerning 
the manner in which objects like eggs are connected 
with animals like hens, the mere inspection of an 
egg would justify the assertion : A hen has probably 
existed. 

I assume, then, that objects having all the charac- 
teristics which hens' eggs have (whatever these may 
be) are generally laid by hens ^whatever hens may 
be) ; and I assume that, if we have any reason for 
this generalisation at all, observation gives us some 
reason for it But now, let us suppose that the only 
observations we had made were those which we 
should commonly describe by saying that we had 
seen a hen laying an egg. I do not say that any 
number of such observations, by themselves, would 
be sufficient to justify our generalisation : I think it 
is plain that they would not. But let us suppose, 
B 



66 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

for the moment, that we had observed nothing else 
which bore upon the connection between hens and 
eggs ; and that, if therefore our generalisation was 
justified by any observations at all, it was justified 
by these. We are supposing, then, that the ob- 
servations which we describe as "seeing hens lay 
eggs " give some reason for the generalisation that 
eggs of that kind are generally laid by hens. And 
if these observations give reason for this, obviously 
in a sense they give reason for the generalisation 
that the existence of such an egg is generally pre- 
ceded by that of a hen ; and hence also, they give 
us reason to suppose that if such an egg exists, a 
hen has probably existed also — that unless a hen 
had existed, the egg would not have existed. But 
the point to which I wish to call attention is that it 
is only in a limited sense that they do give reason 
for this. They only give us reason to suppose that, 
for each egg, there has existed a hen, which was at 
some time near the place where the egg in question 
then was, and which existed at a time near to that 
at which the egg began to exist The only kind of 
hens, whose existence they do give us reason to 
suppose, are hens, of which each was at some time 
in spatial and temporal proximity (or, if Idealists 
prefer, in the relations which are tne " intelligible 
counterparts" of these) to an egg. They give us 
no information at all about the existence of hens (if 
there are any) which never came within a thousand 
miles of an egg 9 or which were dead a thousand 
years before any egg existed. That is to say, they 
do give us reason to suppose that, if a particular egg 
exists, there has probably existed a hen which was 
at some time near that egg ; but they give us no 
reason to suppose that, if a particular egg exists, 
there must have existed a hen which never came 
near that egg. They do give us reason to suppose 
that, for each egg f there has probably existed a hen 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 67 

which at some time stood to the egg in question in 
that relation which we have observed to hold be- 
tween an egg and a hen, when we observed the hen 
laying an egg. But they give us no reason to infer 
from the existence of an egg any other kind of hen : 
any hen which never stood to the egg in the relation 
in which we have observed that some hens do stand 
to eggs. 

What I wish to suggest is that this condition is a 
universal condition for sound inductions. If the 
observation of £ preceding a can ever give us any 
reason at all for supposing that the existence of A 
is generally preceded by that of B, it can at most 
only give us reason to suppose that the existence of 
an A is generally preceded by that of a B which 
stands to our A in the same relation in which fi has 
been observed to stand to a. It cannot give the 
least reason for supposing that the existence of an 
A must have been preceded by that of a B, which 
did not stand to A in the observed relation, but in 
some quite different one. If we are to have any 
reason to infer from the existence of an A the 
existence of such a B, the reason must lie in some 
different observations. That this is so, in the case 
of hens' eggs and hens, is, I think, obvious : and, if 
the rule is not universal, some reason should &t least 
be given for supposing that it does apply in one 
case and not in another. 

Having thus attempted to point out some 
conditions which seem to be necessary, though 
not sufficient, where observation is to give any 
reason for a generalisation, I may now proceed to 
my second preliminary question : What kinds of 
things do we observe ? 

In order to illustrate how much and how little I 
mean by " observation" or "direct perception," I 
will take as an instance a very common visual 
perception. Most of us are familiar with the 



68 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

experience which we should describe by saying that 
we had seen a red book and a blue book side 
by side upon a shelf. What exactly can we be said 
to observe or directly perceive when we have such 
an experience? We certainly observe one colour, 
which we call blue, and a different colour, which we 
call red ; each of these we observe as having a 
particular size and shape ; and we observe also 
these two coloured patches as having to one another 
the spatial relation which we express by saying they 
are side by side. All this we certainly see or 
directly perceive now, whatever may have been the 
process by which we have come to perceive so 
much. But when we say, as in ordinary talk we 
should, that the objects we perceive are books, we 
certainly mean to ascribe to them properties, which, 
in a sense which we all understand, are not actually 
seen by us, at the moment when we are merely 
looking at two books on a shelf two yards off. And 
all such properties I mean to exclude as not being 
then observed or directly perceived by us. When I 
speak of what we observe, when we see two books 
on a shelf, I mean to limit the expression to that 
which is actually seen. And, thus understood, the 
expression does include colours, and the size and 
shape of colours, and spatial relations in three 
dimensions between these patches of colour, but it 
includes nothing else. 

But I am also using observation in a sense in 
which we can be said actually to observe a move- 
ment We commonly say that we can sometimes 
see a red billiard ball moving towards a white one 
on a green table. And, here again, I do not mean 
to include in what is directly perceived or observed, 
all that we mean by saying that the two objects 
perceived are billiard-balls. But I do mean to 
include what (we should say) we actually see. We 
actually see a more or less round red patch moving 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 69 

towards a more or less round white patch ; we see 
the stretch of green between them diminishing in 
size. And this perception is not merely the same 
as a series of perceptions — first a perception of a 
red patch with a green stretch of one size between 
it and the white ; then a perception of a red patch 
with a green stretch of a different size between it 
and the white ; and so on. In order to perceive a 
movement we must have a different perception from 
any one of these or from the sum of them. We 
must actually see the green stretch diminishing in 
size. 

Now it is undoubtedly difficult, in some instances, 
to decide precisely what is perceived in this sense 
and what is not. But I hope I have said enough 
to show that I am using " perceive " and " observe " 
in a sense in which, on a given occasion, it is easy 
to decide that some things certainly are perceived, 
and other things, as certainly, are not perceived 
I am using it in a sense in which we do perceive 
such a complex object as a white patch moving 
towards a red one on a green field ; but I am not 
using it in any sense in which we could be said to 
"perceive" or "observe " that what we saw moving 
was a billiard-ball. And in the same way I think 
we can distinguish roughly between what, on any 
given occasion, we perceive, as we say, "by any 
one of the other senses," and what we do not 
perceive by it. We can say with certainty that, on 
any given occasion, there are certain kinds of 
"content" which we are actually hearing, and 
others which we are not actually hearing; though 
with regard to some again it is difficult to say 
whether we are actually hearing them or not And 
similarly we can distinguish with certainty in some 
instances, between what we are on a given occasion, 
actually smelling or feeling, and what we are not 
actually smelling or feeling. 



70 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

But now, besides these kinds of "things," 
"objects," or "contents," which we perceive, as 
we say, "by the senses," there is also another kind 
which we can be said to observe. Not only can I 
observe a red and blue book side by side ; I can also 
observe myself observing them. I can ptrceive a 
red patch moving towards a white, and I can also 
perceive my perception of this movement And 
what I wish to make as plain as I can is that my 
perception of the movement of a coloured patch can 
at least be distinguished from that movement itself. 
I wish to make it plain that to observe a coloured 
patch moving is to observe one thing ; and to 
observe myself observing a coloured patch moving 
is another. When I observe my own perception of 
a movement, I observe something more than when 
I merely observe the movement, and something 
very different from the movement I may perceive 
a red and a blue book side by side on a shelf; and 
at another time I may perceive a red ball moving 
towards a white. The red and blue patch, of one 
shape, at rest side by side, are different from the 
red, of another shape, moving towards the white ; 
and yet, when I say that both are " perceived," I 
mean by "perceived" one and the same thing. 
And since, thus, two different things may both be 
perceived, there must also be some difference 
between each of them and what is meant by saying 
that it is perceived. Indeed, in precisely the same 
way in which 1 may observe a spatial relation 
between a red patch and a blue (when I observe 
them "side by side") I do, when I observe my own 
perception of them, observe a spatial relation 
between it and them. I observe a distance between 
my perception and the red and blue books which I 
perceive, comparable in magnitude with the breadth 
or height of the blue book, just as these are 
comparable in magnitude with one another. And 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 71 

when I say I observe a distance between my 
perception of a red book and that red book itself, I 
do not mean that I observe a distance between my 
eyes, or any other part of what I call my body, and 
the red patch in question. I am talking not of my 
eyes, but of my actual perception. I observe my 
perception of a book to be near the book and 
further from the table, in exactly the same sense in 
which I observe the book to be near the shelf on 
which it stands, and further from the table. And 
just as, if the distance between a red patch and a 
white is to be perceived, the red patch must be 
different from the white, so, if I perceive a certain 
distance between my perception and the red patch, 
my perception must be different from the red patch 
which I perceive. 

I assume, then, that we observe, on the one hand, 
coloured patches of certain shapes and sizes, and 
their spatial relations to one another, together with 
all the other kinds of "contents," which we should 
usually be said to perceive " through the senses." 
And, on the other hand, we also sometimes observe 
our own perceptions of such "contents" and our 
thoughts. And these two kinds of "content" are 
different from one another : my perception of a red 
patch with gold letters on it, is not itself a red patch 
with gold letters on it ; and hence, when I observe 
my perception of this patch, I observe something 
different from that which I observe when I merely 
perceive the patch. Either of these two kinds 
of "content" — either colours, moving or at rest, 
sounds, smells, and all the rest — or, on the other 
hand, my perceptions of these — either of these 
two kinds, or both, might conceivably, since both 
are observed, give grounds for a generalisation 
concerning what exists. But, as I nave said, if 
observations are to give any ground for such a 
generalisation, it must be assumed that what is 



72 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

observed exists or is real And since, as I have 
insisted, when I observe my perception of a red patch 
with gold letters on it, I observe something different 
from what I observed when I merely observed a red 
patch with gold letters on it, it follows that to assume 
the existence of my perception of this red and gold 
is not the same thing, as to assume the existence of 
the red and gold itself. 

But what, it may be asked, do I mean by this 
property of " existence " or "reality," which may, it 
would seem, belong to every content, which I 
observe, or may again belong to none, or which 
may belong to some and not to others ? What is 
this property which may belong to my perception of 
a movement, and yet not belong to the movement 
perceived, or which may again belong to the move- 
ment perceived and not to my perception of it, or 
which may again belong to both or to neither ? 

It is necessary, I think, to ask this question at 
this point, because there are some philosophers who 
hold that, in the case of some kinds of " content," 
at all events, to say that they "exist" is to say that 
they are " perceived." Some hold that to say " A 
exists " is to say neither more nor less than " A is 
perceived" — that the two expressions are perfect 
synonyms ; and others again would say that by " A 
exists or is real" we may mean more than that "A 
is perceived," but that we must at least mean this. 
Now, I have hitherto used the word "existence" 
pretty freely, and I think that, when I used it, I 
used it in its ordinary sense. I think it will 
generally have suggested to you precisely what I 
meant to convey, and I think that, in some cases at 
all events, it will not even have occurred to you to 
doubt whether you did understand what I meant by 
it. But, if these philosophers are right, then, if you 
have understood what I meant by it, I have all along 
been using it in a sense, which renders the end of 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 73 

my last paragraph perfect nonsense. If these 
philosophers are right, then, when I assert that 
what is perceived may yet not exist, I am really 
asserting that what is perceived may yet not be 
perceived — I am contradicting myself- I am, of 
course, quite unaware that I am doing so. But 
these philosophers would say either you are con- 
tradicting yourself, or you are not using the word 
•• exists " in its ordinary sense. And either of these 
alternatives would be fatal to my purpose. If I am 
not using the word in its ordinary sense, then I shall 
not be understood by anyone ; and, if I am contra- 
dicting myself, then what I say will not be worth 
understanding. 

Now, with one class of these philosophers — the 
class to which, I think, Berkeley belongs — I think I 
can put myself right comparatively easily. The 
philosophers I mean are those who say that it is 
only in the case of one particular class of " contents " 
(the kind of "content" which Berkeley calls "ideas") 
that to say " the ' content ' A exists " is to say 4< A is 
perceived," and who admit that in the case of other 
contents — myself and my perceptions and thoughts, 
for example — to say that these exist or are real, is to 
say of them something different from this. These 
philosophers admit, that is to say, that the word 
" exists " has two different senses : and that in only 
one of these senses is it synonymous with the words 
11 is perceived." When (they hold) I say of such a 
content as a red patch with gold letters on it that it 
11 exists " I do mean that it is perceived ; but when 
I say of my perception of such a patch that it exists, 
I do not mean that my perception is perceived but 
something different from this. Now, it would be 
nothing strange that one and the same word should 
be used in two different senses ; many words are 
used in many different senses. But it would, I think, 
be something very strange indeed, if in the case of 



74 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

a word which we constantly apply to all sorts of 
different objects, we should uniformly apply it to one 
large class of object in the one sense and the one 
sense only and the other large class in the other 
sense and the other sense only. Usually, in the 
case of such ambiguous words, it happens that, 
in different contexts, we apply it to one and the 
same object in both senses. We sometimes wish 
to say of a given object that it has the one 
property, and sometimes we wish to say of the 
same object that it has the other property ; and 
hence we apply the same word to the same object, 
at one time in one sense, and at another in the other. 
I think, therefore, that, even if there were these two 
different senses of the word "existence," it would be 
very unlikely that we should not commonly, in some 
contexts, apply it in the sense, in which (as is 
alleged) it does apply to perceptions, to " contents " 
which are not perceptions. Indeed, I think, it is 
quite plain that we constantly do ask, with regard 
to what is not a perception, whether it exists, in 
precisely the same sense, in which we ask, with 
rega d to a perception, whether it exists. We ask 
in precisely the same sense : Was the Roc a real 
bird, or merely an imaginary one? and, did Sindbad's 
perception of the Roc really exist, or is it a fiction 
that he perceived a Roc ? I think, therefore, that 
the sense in which these philosophers admit that we 
do apply the word "existence" to perceptions, is 
one in which we also commonly apply it to " con- 
tents" other than perceptions. But, even if this is 
not the case, I can set myself right with them by 
a simple explanation. I need merely explain that 
the sense in which I am proposing to enquire 
whether a red patch exists, is precisely the sense in 
which they admit that my perception of a red patch 
does exist. And in this sense, it is plain that to 
suppose that a thing may exist, which is not 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 75 

perceived, or that it may not exist, although it is 
perceived, is at least not self-contradictory. 

But there may be other philosophers who will say 
that, in the case of a perception also, to say that it 
exists or is real is to say that it is perceived — either 
that alone or something more as well. And to 
these philosophers 1 would first point out that they 
are admitting that the proposition "This perception 
is real " is significant. There is some sense or other 
in which we may say : " Alexander's perception of 
an elephant was real or did exist, but Sindbad's 
perception of a Roc was not real — never did exist " : 
the latter proposition is, in some sense or other, not 
self-contradictory. And then I would ask of them : 
When they say, that to call a perception M real " is 
to assert that it is perceived, do they mean by this 
that to call it real is to assert that it is really per- 
ceived, or not? If they say M No," then they are 
asserting that to call a perception " real " is merely 
to say that it was perceived in the sense in which 
Sindbad did perceive a Roc : they are asserting that 
to call it " real " is not to say, in any sense, that it 
was really perceived : they are asserting that to call 
a perception "real" is to say that it was perceived, 
in some sense quite other than that in which we 
ordinarily use the word : for we certainly commonly 
mean, when we say " A was perceived," that a per- 
ception of A was " real " : we should commonly say 
that Sindbad did not perceive a Roc — meaning that 
no such perception ever did exist. I do not think 
they do mean this ; and, in any case, if they do, I 
think it is plain that they are wrong. When we 
say that a perception is " real," we certainly do not 
mean merely that it is the object of another per- 
ception, which may itself be quite unreal — purely 
imaginary. I assume, therefore, that when they 
say : To call a perception " real " is to say that it is 
perceived ; they mean, what we should naturally 



76 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

understand, namely, that : To call it " real " is to 
say that it is really perceived — to say that it is the 
object of another perception, which is also real in 
the same sense. And, if they mean this, then what 
they say is certainly untrue. Their definition of 
reality is circular. It cannot be the case that the 
only sense in which a perception may be said to be 
real, is one in which to call it so is to assert that not 
it alone, but another perception is real also. It 
cannot be the case that the assertion " A is real " is 
identical with the assertion "A and B are both 
real," where A and B are different, and "real" is 
used in the same sense as applied to both. If it is 
to be true that the assertion "A is real" ever % in 
any sense, includes the assertion il A is really per- 
ceived," there must be another sense of the word 
" real," in which to assert "A is real" is to assert 
less than " A is really perceived " — the sense, 
namely, in which we here assert that the perception 
of A is real. 

We find, therefore, that the other class of phil- 
osophers were at least right in this : they were right 
in allowing that the sense in which we commonly 
say that our perceptions exist is one in which " ex- 
ist " does not include, even as a part of its meaning, 
"is perceived." We find that there is a common 
sense of the word "existence," in which to say "A 
exists" must mean less than "A is really per- 
ceived " : since, otherwise, the only possible defi- 
nition of the word " existence " would be a circular 
definition. And I may point out that two other 
definitions, which have been sometimes suggested 
by philosophers as giving what we commonly mean 
by "reality" or "existence" are vitiated by the 
same fault — they also are circular. Some philoso- 
phers have sometimes suggested that when we call 
a thing "real," we mean that it is "systematically 
connected" in some way with other things. But, 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 77 

when we look into their meaning, we find that what 
they mean is (what, indeed, is alone plausible) — 
systematically connected with other real things. 
And it may possibly be the case that we sometimes 
use the word " real " in this sense : but, at least, it 
must be certainly the case, that, if we do, we also 
use it in another and simpler sense — the sense in 
which it is employed in the proposed definition. 
And other philosophers have suggested that what 
we mean by "real" is — " connected in some way 
with a purpose — helping or hindering, or the object 
of a purpose." But if we look into their meaning, 
we find they mean — connected with a real purpose. 
And hence, even if we do sometimes mean by 
"real," "connected with a real purpose," it is plain 
we also sometimes mean by " real " something 
simpler than this — that namely, which is meant by 
" real " in the proposed definition. 

It is certain, therefore, that we do commonly use 
the word " existence " in a sense, in which to say 
" A exists " is not to say " A is perceived," or 4< A is 
systematically connected with other real things," or 
" A is purposive." There is a simpler sense than 
any of these — the sense in which we say that our 
own perceptions do exist, and that Sindbad's per- 
ceptions did not exist. But when I say this, I am 
by no means denying that what exists, in this 
simple sense, may not always also exist in all the 
others ; and that what exists in any of them may 
not also always exist in this. It is quite possible 
that what exists is always also perceived, and that 
what is perceived always also exists. All that I am 
saying is that, even if this is so, this proposition is 
significant — is not merely a proposition about the 
meaning of a word. It is not self-contradictory to 
suppose that some things which exist are not per- 
ceived, and that some things which are perceived 
do not exist. 



78 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

But, it may be asked : What is this common 
simple sense of the word " exists " ? For my own 
part, it seems to me to be so simple that it cannot 
be expressed in other words, except those which are 
recognised as its synonyms. I think we are all 
perfectly familiar with its meaning : it is the meaning 
which you understood me to have throughout this 
paper, until I began this discussion. I think we 
can perceive at once what is meant by asserting 
that my perception of black marks on a white 
ground is "real," and that no such perception as 
Sindbad's of a Roc was ever " real " : we are per- 
fectly familiar with the property which the one per- 
ception is affirmed to possess, aud the other to be 
without. And I think, as I have said, that this 
property is a simple one. But, whatever it is, this, 
which we ordinarily mean, is what I mean by 
"existence" or "reality." And this property, we 
have seen, is certainly neither identical with nor 
inclusive of that complex one which we mean^by 
the words " is perceived." 

I may now, then, at last approach the main 
question of my paper. Which among the " contents " 
which I observe will give me reason to suppose that 
my observation of some of them is generally pre- 
ceded or accompanied or followed by the existence 
of certain particular perceptions, thoughts or feelings 
in another person? I have explained that the 
"contents" which I actually observe may be 
divided into two classes : on the one hand, those 
which, as we commonly say, we perceive " through 
the senses " ; and, on the other hand, my perceptions 
of these last, my thoughts, and my feelings. I have 
explained that if any of these observed contents are 
to give reason for a generalisation about what exists, 
they must exist. And I have explained that with 
regard to both classes of " contents " I am using the 
word "exist" in precisely the same sense — a sense, 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 79 

in which it is certainly not self-contradictory to 
suppose that what is perceived, does not exist, and 
that what is not perceived, does exist ; and, in 
which, therefore, the assumption that a red patch 
with gold letters on it exists, is a different assump- 
tion from the assumption that my perception of a 
red patch with gold letters on it exists ; and the 
assumption that my perception of a red patch with 
gold letters on it exists, is a different assumption 
from the assumption that a red patch with gold 
letters on it exists. 

What, then, that we observe, can give us any 
reason for believing that anyone else has certain 

E articular perceptions, thoughts or feelings? It 
as, I think, been very commonly assumed that the 
observation of my own perceptions, thoughts, and 
feelings, can, by itself, give me such a reason. And 
I propose, therefor, to examine this assumption. 
If, as I hope to show, it is false ; it will then follow, 
that if our own observation gives us any reason 
whatever, for believing in the existence of other 
persons, we must assume the existence, not only of 
our own perceptions, thoughts and feelings, but 
also of some, at least, among that other class of 
data, which I may now, for the sake of brevity, call 
••sense-contents"; we must assume that some of 
them exist, in precisely the same sense in which we 
assume that our perceptions, thoughts, and feelings 
exist. 

The theory which I propose to examine is, then, 
the following. My observation of my own thoughts, 
feelings, and perceptions may, it asserts, give me 
some reason to suppose that another person has 
thoughts, feelings, and perceptions similar to some 
of mine. Let us assume, accordingly, that my own 
thoughts, feelings, and perceptions do exist ; but 
that none of the "sense-contents," which I also 
observe, do so. Where among my perceptions am 



80 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

I to look for any which might conceivably give me 
a reason for supposing the existence of other per- 
ceptions similar to my own ? It is obvious where I 
must look. I have perceptions which I call percep- 
tions of other people's bodies ; and these are cer- 
tainly similar in many respects to other perceptions 
of my own body. But I also observe that certain 
kinds of perceptions of my own body are preceded 
by certain other perceptions, thoughts, or feelings 
of mine. I may, for instance, observe that when I 
perceive my hand suddenly catch hold of my foot in 
a particular way, this perception was preceded by a 
particular kind of feeling of pain. I may, perhaps, 
observe this often enough to justify the generalis- 
ation that the perception of that particular motion 
of my body is generally preceded by that particular 
feeling of pain. And in this way I may perhaps 
have reason for quite a number of generalisations 
which assert that particular kinds of perceptions of 
my own body are generally preceded by other 
particular kinds of perceptions, thoughts, or feelings 
of my own. 

But I may also, no doubt, have the perception, 
which I call the perception of another person's hand 
catching hold of his foot, in a manner similar to that 
in which I have perceived my own hand catch hold 
of my own foot And my perception of another 
person's hand catching hold of his foot may un- 
doubtedly be similar in many respects to my 
perception of my own hand catching hold of my own 
foot But I shall not observe the same kind of 
feeling of pain preceding my perception of his hand 
catching hold of his foot, which I have observed 
preceding my perception of my hand catching hold 
of my foot Will my generalisation, then, give me 
any reason to suppose that nevertheless my per- 
ception of his hand catching hold of his foot is 
preceded by a similar feeling of pain, not in me but 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 81 

in him ? We undoubtedly do assume that when I 
perceive another person's body making movements 
similar to those which I have observed my own 
body making, this perception has generally been 
preceded by some feeling or perception of his 
similar to that which I have observed to precede my 
perception of similar movements in my own body. 
We do assume this ; and it is precisely the kind of 
generalisation, which, I have insisted, must be ad- 
mitted to be true. But my present question is : Will 
such observations as I have described give any 
reason for thinking any such generalisation true ? I 
think it is plain that they will not give the slightest 
reason for thinking so. In the first place, all the 
perceptions which I call perceptions of another 
person's body differ very considerably from any of 
those which I call perceptions of my own. But I 
am willing to waive this objection. I am not 
offering any theory as to what degree of likeness 
is sufficient to justify a generalisation : and therefore 
I will allow that the degree of likeness may be 
sufficient. But there remains an objection which is, 
I think, quite fatal to the proposed inference. This 
objection is that the inference in question plainly 
does not satisfy the third condition which I 
suggested above as necessary^ wherever any 
generalisation is to be justified by observation. I 
am willing to allow that my observations of the fact 
that my perception of a certain movement in my 
own body is preceded by a certain feeling of pain, 
will justify the generalisation that my perception 
of any such movement, whether in my own body 
or in that of another person, is generally pre- 
ceded by a similar feeling of pain. Ana I 
allow, therefore, that when I perceive a certain 
movement in another's body, it is probable that the 
feeling of pain exists, though I do not perceive it. 
But, if it is probable that such a feeling of pain ex- 

F 



82 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

ists, such a feeling must stand in the same relation 
to my perception of the movement in another 
persons body, in which a similar feeling of pain has 
been observed by me to stand to my perception of 
such a movement in my own body. That is to say 
the only kind of feeling of pain, which my obser- 
vations do justify me in inferring, if (as I admit 
they may) they justify me in inferring any at all, is 
a feeling of pain of my own. They cannot possibly 
justify the belief in the existence of any such feeling 
except one which stands to my perception in the 
same relation in which my feelings do stand to my 
perceptions — one, that is to say, which is my own. 
I have no more reason to believe that the feeling of 
pain which probably precedes my perception of a 
movement in another persons body can be the 
feeling of another person, than, in my former ex- 
ample, I had reason to suppose that the hen, whose 
existence probably preceded that of a given egg 9 
could be a hen, which had never been near the egg 
in question. The two cases are exactly analogous. 
I observe a feeling of pain of my own preceding a 
perception of my own. I observe the two, that is to 
say, as standing to one another, in those relations 
(whatever they may be) in which any perception of 
mine stands to any other thought, perception or 
feeling of mine, and which are, at all events, 
different from any relation in which a perception or 
feeling of another person can stand to one of mine. 
I never perceive the feeling and the perception as 
standing in any other relation. In any case, there- 
fore, where I do observe something like the per- 
ception, but do not observe the feeling, I can only 
be justified (^justified in inferring any feeling at 
all), in inferring an unperceived feeling of my own. 

For this reason I think that no observations of 
my own perceptions, feelings or thoughts can give 
me the slightest reason for supposing a connection 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 83 

between any of them and any feeling, perception, 
or thought in another person. The argument is 
perfectly general, since all my perceptions, feelings 
and thoughts do have to one another those 
relations in virtue of which I call them mine ; and 
which, when I talk of a perception, feeling or 
thought as being another person's, I mean to say 
that it has not got to any of mine. I can, therefore, 
merely from observation of this class of data never 
obtain the slightest reason for belief in the existence 
of a feeling, perception, or thought which does not 
stand in these relations to one of mine — which is, 
that is to say, the feeling, perception or thought, 
of another person. But now different is the case, 
if we adopt the hypothesis, which I wish to recom- 
mend — if we assume the existence of that other 
class of data which I have called " sense-contents ! " 
On this hypothesis, that which I perceive, when I 
perceive a movement of my own body, is real; that 
which I perceive when I perceive a movement of 
another's body is real also. I can now observe not 
merely the relation between my perception of a 
movement of my body and my own feelings, but 
also a relation between a real movement of my 
body and my own feelings. And there is no reason 
why I should not be justified in inferring that 
another person's feelings stand in the same relation 
to the real movements of his body, in which I 
observe my own feelings to stand to similar real 
movements of mine. 

But there is another argument which may still be 
urged by those who hold that my own perceptions, 
thoughts, and feelings, by themselves, may be 
sufficient to justify a belief in the existence of other 
persons. It may be said: "Our observation of 
our own perceptions may be sufficient to verify or 
confirm the hypothesis that other persons exist 
This hypothesis is one which "works." The 



84 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

assumption that other persons have particular 
thoughts, feelings and perceptions enables us to 
predict that they will have others and that our own 
perceptions will be modified accordingly : it enables 
us to predict future perceptions of our own ; and we 
find that these predictions are constantly verified. 
We observe that we do have the perceptions, which 
the hypothesisgleads us to expect we should have. 
In short, our perceptions occur just as they would 
do, if the hypothesis were true ; our perceptions 
behave as if other persons had the perceptions, 
thoughts and feelings which we suppose them to 
have. Surely, then, they confirm the truth of the 
hypothesis — they give some reason to think it 
probably true ? ' 

All this, which I have supposed an opponent to 
urge, I admit to be true. I admit that the fact that 
an hypothesis works may give some reason to suppose 
it true. I admit that my perceptions occur just as 
they would do, if other people had the perceptions 
which I suppose them to have. I admit that that 
assumption enables me to make predictions as to 
future perceptions of my own, and that I observe 
these predictions to come true. I admit all this. 
But I admit it only in a sense in which it in no way 
conflicts with the position which I am maintaining. 
The words, which I have put into the mouth of a 
supposed opponent, may, in fact, mean three 
different things, which it is worth while to dis- 
tinguish. In two of those meanings, which I shall 
admit to be true and which are what make them 
seem plausible, they do not deny what I assert. 
Only in the third sense are they an objection to 
my position : and in that sense they are false. 

One of the meanings which I admit to be true is 
as follows : — I have not only admitted but insisted 
that some of my perceptions are just such as would 
occur if another person had certain particular 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 85 

feelings : I have insisted that I should not have 
just those perceptions which I do have, unless some 
other person had certain feelings and perceptions 
which I suppose him to have. And I admit further 
that the fact that I have one of the perceptions in 
question — for instance, that of another person's hand 
catching hold of his foot — this fact, together with 
the true assumption that I should not have this 
perception, unless some other person felt pain, will 
justify the assertion that another person has felt 
pain. I n this sense, I admit, the fact that I perceive 
what I do perceive will give me reason to suppose 
that another person has felt pain. And, on the 
other hand, I also admit that the fact that I have 
this perception, together vtith the true assumption 
that when I have it another person has felt pain, 
may help to justify the assumption that the percep- 
tion in question is one which I should not have 
had unless another person had felt pain — it helps to 
justify the generalisation that certain of my per- 
ceptions are just what would occur, if another 
person had felt pain. In general terms, that is to 
say, I admit that the occurrence of B, together with 
the assumption that B is just the sort of thing 
which would occur if A existed, will justify the 
assertion that A exists in that particular instance. 
And I also admit that the occurrence of B, together 
with the assumption that A exists in that particular 
instance, may help to justify the assumption that 
B is just the sort of thing which would exist, if A 
existed. In other words : When it is said that 
the observation of B's existence confirms or verifies 
the assumption that A exists, either of two things 
may be meant. It may be meant that, assuming' B 
to be the sort of thing which would exist it A 
existed, the observation of B confirms the assump- 
tion that A exists in this particular instance. Or, 
on the other hand, it may be meant that, assuming 



86 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

A to exist in this particular instance, the observation 
of B may confirm the generalisation, that B is just 
the sort of thing which would exist, if A existed. 
Either the one or the other of these two things is, I 
think, what is generally assumed, when it is as- 
sumed that what we do observe confirms or verifies 
the assumption that there exists some particular 
thing which we don't observe. And I am admitting 
that both these assumptions are true. 

But neither of them conflicts in any way with the 
position I am maintaining. What I am maintaining 
is that no observation of my own perceptions, by 
itself, can confirm the generalisation that any one of 
them is just what would occur if another person had 
a particular feeling. I admit this generalisation to 
be true ; and I admit that my observation of my 
own perceptions and feelings may give me reason to 
suppose that if another person has certain percep- 
tions or feelings he will also have certain others. 
What I deny is that they give me the slightest 
reason to suppose that the existence of any such 
feeling or perception in another has any connection 
with the existence of any perception of my own — 
to suppose that any perception of my own is the 
sort of thing which would occur if another person 
had a particular feeling. What therefore, my 
opponent must affirm is that the observation of a 
perception of my own without the assumption (which 
Reid makes) that in that particular instance any 
feeling or perception of another person, of any kind 
whatever, has preceded it, may give me reason to 
suppose that that perception of my own is of a kind 
which is generally preceded by a particular kind of 
feeling in another person. And this, I think, is 
plainly false. 

But there is yet a third thing which may be meant, 
and which I am willing to admit may be true. It 
may be said : M I believe many generalisations of 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 87 

the following kind. I believe that when I have a 
perception A, some other person has generally had 
a feeling X ; I believe that the existence of the 
feeling X is generally followed, in the same person, 
by that of the feeling Y ; and I believe also that 
when another person has the feeling Y, I generally 
have the perception B. I believe all this." And it 
must, I think, be admitted that we do believe 
generalisations of this kind, and generalisations in 
which there are not merely two steps between 
A and B, but a great number of steps. " But 
then," it may be said, "my belief in this 
generalisation causes me, when I observe my per- 
ception A, to expect that I shall have the perception 
B ; and such expectations, I observe, are constantly 
realised. 1 ' And this also, I think, must be admitted 
to be true. "But, finally," it may be said, "beliefs 
which produce expectations which are constantly 
realised are generally true. And hence the fact that 
these beliefs of mine about the connection of feelings 
in other persons with perceptions of my own do lead 
to expectations which are realised, gives me reason 
to suppose that these generalisations are true and 
hence that other persons do have particular -kinds of 
feelings." And I am willing to admit that this also 
is true. I am willing to admit that true predictions 
can, as a rule, only be produced by true beliefs. 
The generalisation that this is so, is, indeed, one 
which can only be justified by the observations of 
beliefs, which are, in some way, independently 
proved to be true ; and hence, if it is to be justified, 
without assuming the existence of anything other 
than my own perceptions, thoughts, and feelings, it 
can only be justified by my observation that beliefs 
with regard to the manner in which these succeed 
one another generally lead to true predictions. 
Whether the observation of such beliefs alone could 
give sufficient reason for it, is, I think, doubtful ; but 



88 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

I am willing to admit that it may be so. One thing, 
however, is, I think, quite plain : namely, that this 
generalisation "Beliefs which lead to true predictions 
are generally true" cannot be true, unless some other 
of the " contents " which I observe, beside my own 
perceptions, thoughts, and feelings, do exist. That 
is to say, in giving a reason for supposing the exist- 
ence of other people, this generalisation also gives a 
reason for the very theory which I am advocating, 
namely, that some of those data which I have called 
"sense-contents" do exist. It does this, because it 
is quite certain that beliefs in generalisations about 
the existence of sense-contents can (and do) con- 
stantly lead to true predictions. The belief that 
when I have observed a fire of a certain size in my 
grate, something similar to what I have observed 
will continue to exist for a certain time, can, and 
constantly does, lead to the true prediction that, 
when I come back to my room in half an hour's 
time, I shall observe a fire of a certain size still 
burning. We make predictions on such grounds, I 
think, every day and all day long. And hence un- 
less such beliefs as that what I observe when I see 
a fire burning does exist, are true, we certainly 
have no reason to suppose that beliefs which 
lead to true predictions are generally true. And 
hence on this hypothesis also it remains true : 
that, unless some of the contents which I observe 
other than my own perceptions, thoughts, and 
feelings, do exist, I cannot have the slightest reason 
for supposing that the existence of certain percep- 
tions of my own is generally connected with that of 
certain perceptions, thoughts, or feelings in any 
other person. 

I conclude therefore that, unless some of the 
observed data which I have called sense-contents do 
exist, my own observations cannot give me the 
slightest reason for believing that anybody else has 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 89 

ever had any particular perception, thought, or 
feeling. And, having arrived so far towards an 
answer to my first question : How do we know that 
any other persons exist ? I may now point out that 
precisely the same answer must be given to my 
second question: How do we know that any 
particular kind of thing exists, other than ourselves, 
our perceptions, thoughts, and feelings, and what 
we directly perceive ? There is a view concerning 
what exists, which deserves, I think, much more 
respect than it generally receives . from philosophers 
nowadays. The view I mean is the view that 
material objects, such as they are conceived by 
physical science, do really exist. It is held by some 
persons (and Reid is among them) that we do know 
of the existence, not only of other persons, but also 
of the movements of matter in space. It is held 
that we do know, with considerable precision, what 
kinds of movements of matter generally precede my 
perception, when I have a particular perception. It 
is held, for instance, that when I perceive a red and 
blue book side by side on a shelf, at a certain 
distance from me, there have existed, between two 
material objects, which may be called books, and 
another kind of material object, which may be 
called my eyes, certain wave-like motions of a 
material medium ; that there have existed two 
different sets of waves, of which the one is connected 
with my perception of red and the other with my 
perception of blue ; and that the relative heights and 
breadths of the two different sets of waves, and the 
relative velocity of their movements are very 
exactly known. It is held that some men have a 
vast amount of very precise information about the 
existence of objects of this kind ; and I think the 
view that this is so deserves a great deal of respect 
But what I wish now to point out is that no one's 
observation of his own perceptions, thoughts and 



90 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

feelings, can, by itself, give him the slightest reason 
for believing in the existence of any such material 
objects. All the arguments by which I have tried 
to show that this kind of observation alone can give 
me no reason to believe in the existence of any kind 
of perception or feeling in another person, apply, 
with at least equal force, to show that it can give me 
no reason to believe in the existence of any kind of 
material object On the other hand, if we are to 
admit the principle that " Beliefs which lead to true 
predictions, are generally true," this principle will 
give us at least as much reason to believe in the 
existence of certain kinds of material objects as to 
believe in the existence of other persons ; since one 
of the most remarkable facts about beliefs in the 
existence of such objects is that they do so often 
lead to true predictions. But it must be remem- 
bered that we can have no reason for believing this 
principle itself, unless our own perceptions, thoughts 
and feelings are not the only kind of observed 
"content " which really does exist : we can have no 
reason for it, unless some such things as what I 
perceive, when I see a red and blue book side by 
side, do really exist 

It would seem, therefore, that if my own obser- 
vations do give me any reason whatever for believing 
in the existence either of any perception in any 
other person or of any material object, it must be 
true that not only my own perceptions, thoughts 
and feelings, but also some of the other kinds of 
things which I directly perceive — colours, sounds, 
smells, etc. — do really exist : it must be true that some 
objects of this kind exist or are real in precisely the 
same simple sense in which my perceptions of them 
exist or are real. Is there then any reason to think 
that this is not true ? Is there any reason to think, 
for instance, that none of the colours which I perceive 
as occupying areas of certain shapes and sizes really 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 91 

exist in the areas which they appear to occupy? 
This is a question which I wished to discuss at 
length, because I think that it is one in which there 
are real difficulties. But I have given so much 
space to other questions, that I can only deal with it 
very briefly here. 

Some philosophers are very fond of asserting that 
a colour cannot exist except when it is perceived ; 
and it might possibly be thought that when I suggest 
that colours do really exist, I am suggesting that 
they do exist when they are not perceived, I wish, 
therefore, briefly to point out that the question 
whether anything does exist, when it is not perceived, 
is one which I have not argued and shall not attempt 
to argue in this paper. I have, indeed, tried to 
show that since " exists " does not mean " is 
perceived," it is, at least, conceivable that things 
should exist, when they are not perceived. But I 
have admitted that it is quite possible none do so : 
it may be the case that whenever a thing exists, it is 
also at the same time perceived, for anything that I 
have said or shall say to the contrary. I think, 
indeed, that, if such things as colours do exist, my 
observation of their behaviour will justify me in 
concluding that they also exist when I myself am, 
at least, not aware of perceiving them : but since I 
have not attempted to determine what kinds of 
observation are sufficient to justify a generalisation, 
I do not pretend to say whether this is so or not : 
and still less do I pretend to say whether, if they 
exist when / do not perceive them, we are justified 
in supposing that someone else must be perceiving 
them. The question whether anything exists, when 
it is not perceived, and, if so, what things, seems to 
me to be one which can only be settled by obser- 
vation ; and thus, I conceive, observation might 
justify us in concluding that certain kinds of things — 
pains, for example, do not exist, when they are not 



92 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

perceived and that other kinds of things — colours, 
for example, do exist, when they are not perceived. 
The only way, in which, so far as I am aware, the 
theory I am advocating does conflict with ordinary 
Idealistic conclusions, is that it does suggest that 
things, which are not "spiritual," do sometimes 
exist, as really and as truly, as things which are. 

The theory, therefore, that nothing exists, except 
when it is perceived, is no objection (even if it be 
true) to the supposition that colours do exist. 
What objections are there to this supposition ? All 
serious objections to it are, I think, of one type. 
They all rest upon the assumption that, if a certain 
kind of thing exists at a certain time in a certain 
place, certain other kinds of things cannot exist at 
the same time in the same place. They are all, that 
is to say, of the same type as Berkeley's argument : 
that, though tbe same body of water may appear to 
be simultaneously both hot and cold (if one of the 
hands we plunge into it is warm and the other cold), 
yet the heat and the cold cannot both really be in 
the same body at the same time. And it is worth 
noticing that anyone who uses this argument must 
admit tnat he understands what is meant by " really 
existing in a given place," and that he means by it 
something other than " being perceived as in a given 
place." For the argument itself admits that both 
the heat and the cold are really perceived as being in 
the same place, and that there is no difficulty in 
supposing that they are so ; whereas it urges that 
there is a difficulty in supposing that they both 
really exist in it. 

Now there is one obvious defect in this type of 
argument, if designed to prove that no sensible 
quality exists at any place where it is perceived as 
being — a defect, which Berkeley himself admits in 
his " Principles," though he omits to notice it where 
he repeats the argument in his " Hylas." Even if 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 93 

we assume that the heat and the cold cannot both 
exist in the same place (and I admit that, in this 
case, the contrary assumption does seem repugnant 
to Common Sense), it does not follow that neither 
exists there. That is to say this type of argument, 
even if we grant its initial assumption, will only 
entitle us to conclude that some sensible qualities 
which we perceive as being in a certain place at a 
certain time, do not exist in that place at that time. 
And this conclusion, I am inclined to think, is true. 
In the case, for instance, of the so-called " images " 
which we perceive in a looking-glass, we may very 
readily admit that the colours and shapes which we 
perceive do not exist at the places where they appear 
to be — namely at various distances behind the glass. 
But yet, so far as I can see, we have no reason 
whatever for supposing that they do not, except the 
assumption that our observations give us reason to 
believe that other sensible qualities do exist in those 
positions behind the glass ; and the assumption that 
where these other sensible qualities do exist, those 
which we see in the glass do not exist. I should, 
therefore, admit that some sensible qualities which 
we perceive as being in certain places, do not exist 
in those places, while still retaining my belief that 
others do. And perhaps this explanation is the one 
which should also be adopted in the case of sensible 
qualities whieh appear to be at a great distance from 
us. When, for instance, (as we say), " we see the 
moon, M what we perceive (if the moon be full) is a 
round bright silver disc, of a small size, at a place 
very distant from us. Does that silver disc exist at 
that place? With what suppositions does the 
assumption that it does conflict ? Only, so far as I 
can see, with the supposition that the place in 
question is really occupied by a body such as 
science has taught us to suppose that the moon 
really is — a spherical body immensely larger than 



94 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

objects, in comparison with which the silver disc 
which we perceive is small ; or else with the 
supposition that the place in question is really 
occupied by some part of our atmosphere, or some 
part of the medium which science supposes to exist 
between our atmosphere and the moon ; or else with 
the supposition that the place in question is really 
occupied by what we might see, if the moon were 
nearer to us by many thousands of miles. Unless 
we suppose that some other object is in the place, in 
which the silver disc appears to be, and that this 
object is of a kind which cannot occupy the same 
place which is occupied by a silver disc, we have no 
reason to suppose that the silver disc does not really 
exist in the place where it appears to be. And, in 
this case, we perhaps have reason for both supposi- 
tions and should therefore conclude that the silver 
disc, which we perceive, does not exist in any real 
place. 

Part, therefore, of these objections to our theory 
may, I think, be met by admitting that some of the 
sensible qualities which we perceive do not exist at 
the places where they appear to exist, though others 
do. But there is, I think, another class of cases, in 
which we may be justified in denying that two 
things which (it is asserted) cannot occupy the same 
space, really cannot. I will take an instance which 
is, I think, typical. When we look at a drop of 
blood with the naked eye, we perceive a small red 
spot, uniformly red all over. But when (as we say) 
we look at the same object under a microscope of a 
certain power, I am informed that we see a much 
larger spot, of similar shape, indeed, but not 
uniformly red — having, in fact, small red spots at 
different positions in a yellowish field. And if we 
were again to look at the same object through a 
microscope of much higher power still, we might 
perceive yet a third different arrangement of 



OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 95 

colours. Is there any fatal objection to supposing 
that all three appearances — the uniform red spot, the 
yellowish field with reddish spots in it, and the third, 
whatever that may be — do all really occupy the 
same real spatial area ? I cannot see that there is. 
We are familiar with the idea that a given spatial 
area may contain parts which are invisible to us. 
And hence, I think it is quite conceivable that parts 
of a given area may be really occupied by one 
colour, while the whole is really occupied by 
another. And this, I think, is what we actually do 
believe in many cases. At all events, we certainly 
believe that the area which appears to be occupied 
by one colour really is the same area as that which 
appears to be occupied by another. And, unless we 
assume that the area, in both cases, really is the 
same, we can certainly have no reason to deny that 
each colour does really occupy the area which it 
appears to occupy. 

For these reasons I think that the difficulties in 
the way of supposing that some of the sensible 
qualities which we perceive as being in certain 
places, really exist in the places in which we perceive 
them to be, are not insuperable. I have indeed not 
done justice to these difficulties ; but then, neither 
have I done justice to what is to be said on the 
other side. At all events, I think it is plain that we 
have no reason to assert, in any case whatever, that 
a perceived colour does not really exist in the place 
where it is perceived as being, unless we assume that 
that very same place really is occupied by something 
else — either by some different sensible qualities or 
by material objects such as physical science supposes 
to exist. But what reason can we give for such an 
assumption ? I have tried to show that our own 
observations can give us none, unless we assume 
that some of the sensible qualities, which we observe 
as occupying certain places, do really exist in those 



96 OBJECTS OF PERCEPTION 

places. And, if this is so, then we must admit that 
neither he who believes (with Reid) in the existence 
of other minds and of matter also, nor he who 
believes in the existence of other minds and denies 
that of matter, can have, in his own observations, 
the slightest reason either for his assertion or for his 
denial : we must admit that he can have no reason 
for either assertion or denial, except one which 
consists in the assumption of the existence or non- 
existence of something which he does not observe — 
something, therefore, of the very same kind as that 
for which he gives it as a reason. I am very 
unwilling to suppose that this is the case : I am 
very unwilling to suppose that he who believes that 
Sindbad the Sailor really saw what the "Arabian 
Nights " represent him as seeing, has just as good 
reason (so far as his own observation goes) for 
believing this as he who denies it has for denying it 
Still this may be the case. We must, perhaps, be 
content to assume as certain that for which our 
observation gives no reason : to assume such pro- 
positions as that Sindbad did not see a Roc, and 
that you do hear my voice. But if it is said that 
these things are certain ; then it also appears to me 
to be certain that the colours which I perceive do 
exist (some of them) where I perceive them. The 
more I look at objects round me, the more I am 
unable to resist the conviction that what I see does 
exist, as truly and as really, as my perception of it 
The conviction is overwhelming. 

This being, then, the state of the case, I think I 
may at least plead that we have grounds for suspense 
of judgment as to whether what I see does not really 
exist ; grounds, too, for renewed enquiry, more 
careful than such enquiry has sometimes been in the 
past 



WILLIAM JAMES* "PRAGMATISM" 



My object in this paper is to discuss some of the 
things which Prof. William James says about truth 
in the recent book, to which he has given the above 
name.* In Lecture VI he professes to give an 
account of a theory, which he calls " the pragmatist 
theory of truth ; " and he professes to give a briefer 

freliminary account of the same theory in Lecture 
I. Moreover, in Lecture VII, he goes on to make 
some further remarks about truth. In all these 
Lectures he seems to me to make statements to 
which there are very obvious objections; and my 
main object is to point out, as clearly and simply as 
I can, what seem to me to be the principal objections 
to some of these statements. 

We may, I think, distinguish three different things 
which he seems particularly anxious to assert about 
truth. 

(I) In the first place, he is plainly anxious to 
assert some connection between truth and " verifica- 
tion " or " utility." Our true ideas, he seems to say, 
are those that " work," in the sense that they are 
or can be " verified, " or are "useful." 

(II) In the second place, he seems to object to 
the view that truth is something " static " or " immut- 
able/* He is anxious to assert that truths are in 
some sense " mutable." 

(III) In the third place, he asserts that "to an 

* Pragmatism : A New Name for some Old Ways of Thinking : 
Popular Lectures on Philosophy. By William James. Longmans, 
Green, and Co., 1907* 
G 



98 WILLIAM JAMES* " PRAGMATISM " 

unascertainable extent our truths are man-made 
products " (p. 242). 

To what he asserts under each of these three 
heads there are, I think, serious objections ; and I 
now propose to point out what seem to me to be the 
principal ones, under each head separately. 

(i) 

Professor James is plainly anxious to assert 
some connection between truth and "verification" 
or " utility." And that there is some connection 
between them everybody will admit. That many of 
our true ideas are verified ; that many of them can 
be verified ; and that many of them are useful, is, I 
take it, quite indisputable. But Professor James 
seems plainly to wish to assert something more than 
this. And one more thing which he wishes to assert 
is, I think, pretty plain. He suggests, at the begin- 
ning of Lecture VI, that he is going to tell us in 
what sense it is that our true ideas "agree with 
reality." Truth, he says, certainly means their 
agreement with reality ; the only question is as to 
what we are to understand by the words ••agree- 
ment" and "reality" in this proposition. And he 
first briefly considers the theory, that the sense in 
which our true ideas agree with reality, is that they 
"copy" some reality. And he affirms that some of 
our true ideas really do do this. But he rejects the 
theory, as a theory of what truth means, on the 
ground that they do not all do so. Plainly, there- 
fore, he implies that no theory of what truth means 
\ will be correct, unless it tells us of some property 
s" which belongs to all our true ideas without exception. 
But his own theory is a theory of what truth means. 
Apparently, therefore, he wishes to assert that not 
only many but all our true ideas are or can be 
verified ; that all of them are useful. And it is, I 
think, pretty plain that this is one. of the things 
which he wishes to assert. 



WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM" 99 

Apparently, therefore, Professor James wishes to 
assert that all our true ideas are or can be verified 
— that all are useful. And certainly this is not a 
truism like the proposition that many of them are 
so. Even if this were all that he meant, it would 
be worth discussing. But even this, I think, is not 
all. The very first proposition in which he ex- 
presses his theory is the following. " True ideas," 
he says (p. 201) "are those that we can assimilate, 
validate, corroborate and verify. False ideas are 
those that we cannot." And what does this mean ? 
Let us, for brevity's sake, substitute the word 
" verify " alone for the four words which Professor 
James uses, as he himself subsequently seems to do. 
He asserts, then, that true ideas are those which we 
can verify. And plainly he does not mean by this 
merely that some of the ideas which we can verify 
are true, while plenty of others, which we can verify, 
are not true. The plain meaning of his words is 
that all the ideas which we can verify are true. No 
one would use them who did not mean this. Ap- 
parently, therefore, Professor James means to assert 
not merely that we can verify all our true ideas ; but 
also that all the ideas, which we can verify, are true. 
And so, too, with utility or usefulness. He seems 
to mean not merely that all our true ideas are 
useful ; but that all those which are useful are true. 
This would follow, for one thing, from the fact that 
he seems to use the words " verification " or " verifi- 
ability" and "usefulness" as if they came to the 
same thing. But, in this case too, he asserts it in 
words that have but one plain meaning. "The 
true" he says (p. 222) " is only the expedient in the 
way of our thinking." " The true " is the expedient : 
that is, all expedient thinking is true. Or again : 
"An idea is 'true' so long as to believe it is 
profitable to our lives" (p. 75). That is to say, 
every idea, which is profitable to our lives, is, while 



ioo WILLIAM JAMES' " PRAGMATISM 



9» 



V 



3 



it is so, true. These words certainly have a plain 
enough meaning. Apparently, therefore, Professor 
James means to assert not merely that all true ideas 
are useful, but also that all useful ideas are true. 

Professor James' words, then, do at least suggest 
that he wishes to assert all four of the following 
propositions. He wishes to assert, it would seem — 

(t) That we can verify all those of our ideas, 

which are true. 
(2) That all those among our ideas, which we can 

verify, are true. 

That all our true ideas are useful. 

That all those of our ideas, which arefuseful, 

are true. 

These four propositions are what I propose first to 
consider. He does mean to assert them, at least 
Very likely he wishes to assert something more 
even than these. He does, in fact, suggest that he 
means to assert, in addition, that these properties of 
" verifiability " and " utility " are the only properties 
(beside that of being properly called "true") which 
belong to all our true ideas and to none but true 
ideas. But this obviously cannot be true, unless all 
these four propositions are true. And therefore we 
may as well consider them first. 

First, then, can we verify all our true ideas ? 

I wish only to point out the plainest and most 
obvious reasons why I think it is doubtful whether 
we can. 

We are very often in doubt as to whether we did 
or did not do a certain thing in the past. We may 
have the idea that we did, and also the idea that we 
did not ; and we may wish to find out which idea is 
the true one. Very often, indeed, I may believe 
very strongly, that I did do a certain thing; and 
somebody else, who has equally good reason to 
know, may believe equally strongly that I did not 



WILLIAM JAMES' « PRAGMATISM " 101 

For instance, I may have written a letter, and may 
believe that I used certain words in it. But my 
correspondent may believe that I did not. Can we 
always verify either of these ideas? Certainly 
sometimes we can. The letter may be produced, 
and prove that I did use the words in question. 
And I shall then have verified my idea. Or it may 
prove that I did not use them. And then we shall 
nave verified my correspondent's idea. But, sup- 
pose the letter has been destroyed ; suppose there is 
no copy of it, nor any trustworthy record of what 
was said in it ; suppose there is no other witness as 
to what I said in it, beside myself and my corre- 
spondent ? Can we then always verify which of our 
ideas is the true one ? I think it is very doubtful 
whether we can nearly always. Certainly we may 
often try to discover any possible means of verifi- 
cation, and be quite unable, for a time at least, to 
discover any. Such cases, in which we are unable, 
for a time at least, to verify either of two contra- 
dictory ideas, occur very commonly indeed. Let us 
take an even more trivial instance than the last. 
Bad whist-players often do not notice at all carefully 
which cards they have among the lower cards in a 
suit. At the end of a hand they cannot be certain 
whether they had or had not the seven of diamonds, 
or the five of spades. And, after the cards have 
been shuffled, a dispute will sometimes arise as to 
whether a particular player had the seven of dia- 
monds or not. His partner may think that he had, 
and he himself may think that he had not. Both 
may be uncertain, and the memory of both, on such 
a point, may be well known to be untrustworthy. 
And, moreover, neither of the other players may be 
able to remember any better. Is it always possible 
to verify which of these ideas is the true one? 
Either the player did or did not have the seven of 
diamonds. This much is certain. One person 



ioi WILLIAM JAMES' " PRAGMATISM 



»» 



thinks that he did, and another thinks he did not ; 
and both, so soon as the question is raised, have be- 
fore their minds both of these ideas — the idea that 
he did, and the idea that he did not This also is 
certain. And it is certain that one or other of these 
two ideas is true. But can they always verify either 
of them? Sometimes, no doubt, they can, even 
after the cards have been shuffled. There may 
have been a fifth person present, overlooking the 
play, whose memory is perfectly trustworthy, and 
whose word may be taken as settling the point 
Or the players may themselves be able, by recalling 
other incidents of play, to arrive at such a certainty 
as may be said to verify the one hypothesis or the 
other. But very often neither of these two things 
will occur. And, in such a case, is it always 
possible to verify the true idea ? Perhaps, theoreti- 
cally! it may be still possible. Theoretically, I sup- 
pose, the fact that one player, and not any of the 
other three, had the card in his hand, may have 
made some difference to the card, which might be 
discovered by some possible method of scientific 
investigation. Perhaps some such difference may 
remain even after the same card has been repeatedly 
used in many subsequent games. But suppose the 
same question arises again, a week after the original 
game was played. Did you, or did you not, last 
week have the seven of diamonds in that particular 
hand? The question has not been settled in the 
meantime ; and now, perhaps, the original pack of 
cards has been destroyed. Is it still possible to 
verify either idea ? Theoretically, I suppose, it may 
be still possible. But even this, I think, is very 
doubtful. And surely it is plain that, humanly and 
practically speaking, it will often have become quite 
impossible to verify either idea. In all probability 
it never will be possible for any man to verify 
whether I had the card or not on this particular 



WILLIAM JAMES* "PRAGMATISM" 103 

occasion. No doubt we are here speaking of an 
idea, which some man could have verified at one 
time But the hypothesis I am considering is the 
hypothesis that we never have a true idea, which 
we can not verify ; that is to say, which we cannot 
verify after the idea has occurred. And with regard 
to this hypothesis, it seems to me quite plain that 
very often indeed we have two ideas, one or other of 
which is certainly true ; and yet that, in all proba- 
bility, it is no longer possible and never will be 
possible for any man to verify either. 

It seems to me, then, that we very often have ) 
true ideas which we cannot verify ; true ideas, \ 
which, in all probability, no man ever will be able 
to verify. And, so far, I have given only com- 
paratively trivial instances. But it is plain that, in 
the same sense, historians are very frequently occu- 
pied with true ideas, which it is doubtful whether 
they can verify. One historian thinks that a certain 
event took place, and another that it did not ; and 
both may admit that they cannot verify their idea. 
Subsequent historians may, no doubt, sometimes be 
able to verify one or the other. New evidence may 
be discovered or men may learn to make a better 
use of evidence already in existence. But is it 
certain that this will always happen ? Is it certain 
that every question, about which historians have 
doubted, will some day be able to be settled by 
verification of one or the other hypothesis ? Surely 
the probability is that in the case of an immense 
number of events, with regard to which we should 
like to know whether they happened or not, it never 
will be possible for any man to verify either the one 
hypothesis or the other. Yet it may be certain that 
either the events in question did happen or did not 
Here, therefore, again, we have a large number of 
ideas— -cases where many men doubt whether a 
thing did happen or did not, and have therefore the 



io 4 WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM 



» 



idea both of its having happened and of its not 
having happened — with regard to which it is certain 
that half of them are true, but where it seems highly 
doubtful whether any single one of them will ever 
be able to be verified. No doubt it is just possible 
that men will some day be able to verify every one 
of them. But surely it is very doubtful whether 
they will. And the theory against which I am 
protesting is the positive assertion that we can verify 
all our true ideas — that some one some, day certainly 
will be able to verify every one of them. This 
theory, I urge, has all probability against it. 

And so far I have been dealing only with ideas 
with regard to what happened in the past. These 
seem to me to be the cases which offer the most 
numerous and most certain exceptions to the rule 
that we can verify our true ideas. With regard to 
particular past events, either in their own lives or in 
those of other people, men very frequently have 
ideas, which it seems highly improbable that any 
man will ever be able to verify. And yet it is 
certain that a great many of these ideas are true, 
because in a great many cases we have both the 
idea that the event did happen and also the idea 
that it did not, when it is certain that one or other 
of these ideas is true. And these ideas with regard 
to past events would by themselves be sufficient for 
my purpose. If, as seems certain, there are many 
true ideas with regard to the past, which it is highly 
improbable that anyone will ever be able to verify, 
then, obviously, there is nothing in a true idea 
which makes it certain that we can verify it. But 
it is, I think, certainly not only in the case of ideas, 
with regard to the past, that it is doubtful whether 
we can verify all the true ideas we have. In the 
case of many generalisations dealing not only with 
the past but with the future, it is, I think, obviously 
doubtful whether we shall ever be able to verify all 



WILLIAM JAMES' « PRAGMATISM " 105 

those which are true; although here, perhaps, in 
most cases, the probability that we shall not is not 
so great. But is it quite certain, that in all cases 
where scientific men have considered hypotheses, 
one or other of which must be true, either will ever 
be verified? It seems to be obviously doubtful 
Take, for instance, the question whether our actual 
space is Euclidean or not This is a case where the 
alternative has been considered ; and where it is 
certain that, whatever be meant by "our actual 
space/' it either is Euclidean or is not. It has been 
held, too, that the hypothesis that it is not Euclidean 
might, conceivably, be verified by observations. 
But it is doubtful whether it ever will be. And 
though it would be rash to say that no man ever 
will be able to verify either hypothesis ; it is also 
rash to assert positively that we shall — that we 
certainly can verify the true hypotheses. There are, 
I believe, ever so many similar cases, where alter- 
native hypotheses, one or other of which must be 
true, have occurred to men of science, and where 
yet it is very doubtful whether either ever will be 
verified. Or take, again, such ideas as the idea 
that there is a God, or the idea that we are immortal 
Many men have had not only contradictory ideas, 
but contradictory beliefs, about these matters. And 
here we have cases where it is disputed whether 
these ideas have not actually been verified. But it 
seems to me doubtful whether they have been. 
And there is a view, which seems to me to deserve 
respect, that, in these matters, we never shall be 
able to verify the true hypothesis. Is it perfectly 
certain that this view is a false one ? I do not say 
that it is true. I think it is quite possible that we 
shall some day be able to verify either the belief 
that we are immortal or the belief that we are not 
But it seems to me doubtful whether we shall And 
for this reason alone I should refuse to assent to the 



io6 WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM 



»» 



positive assertion that we certainly can verify all 
our true ideas. 

When, therefore, Professor James tells us that 
"True ideas are those that we can assimilate, 
validate, corroborate and verify. False ideas are 
those that we cannot," there seems to be a serious 
objection to part of what these words imply. They 
imply that no idea of ours is true, unless we can 
verify it. They imply, therefore, that whenever a 
man wonders whether or not he had the seven of 
diamonds in the third hand at whist last night, 
neither of these ideas is true unless he can verify 
it But it seems certain that in this, and an 
immense number of similar cases, one or other 
of the two ideas is true. Either, he did have 
the card in his hand or he did not If anything is 
a fact, this is one. Either, therefore, Professor 
James' words imply the denial of this obvious fact, or 
else he implies that in all such cases we can verify 
one or other of the two ideas. But to this the 
objection is that, in any obvious sense of the words, it 
seems very doubtful whether we can. On the con- 
trary it seems extremely probable that in a very large 
number of such cases no man ever will be able to 
verify either of the two ideas. There is, therefore, 
a serious objection to what Professor James 1 words 
imply. Whether he himself really means to assert 
these things which his words imply I do not know. 
Perhaps he would admit that, in this sense, we 
probably cannot verify nearly all our true ideas. 
All that I have wished to make plain is that there 
is, at least, an objection to what he says, whether to 
what he means or not There is ample reason why 
we should refuse assent to the statement that none 
of our ideas are true, except those which we can 
verify. 

But to another part of what he implies by the 
words quoted above, there is, I think, no serious 



WILLIAM JAMES' " PRAGMATISM " 107 

objection. There is reason to object to the state- 
ment that we can verify all our true ideas ; but to 
the statement that all ideas, which we can "ass- 
imilate, validate, corroborate and verify," are true, 
I see no serious objection. Here, I think, we 
might say simply that all ideas which we can verify 
are true. To this, which is the second of the four 
propositions, which I distinguished above (p. 35) as 
what Professor James seems to wish to assert, there 
is, I think, no serious objection, if we understand 
the word "verify" in its proper and natural sense. 
We may, no doubt, sometimes say that we have 
verified an idea or an hypothesis, when we have 
only obtained evidence which proves it to be 
probable, and does not prove it to be certain. And, 
if we use the word in this loose sense for incomplete 
verification, it is obviously the case that we may 
verify an idea which is not true. But it seems 
scarcely necessary to point this out. And where 
we really can completely verify an idea or an 
hypothesis, there, undoubtedly, the idea which we 
can verify is always true. The very meaning of the 
word " verify " is to find evidence which does really 
prove an idea to be true ; and where an idea can be \ 
really proved to be true, it is of course, always true—/ 

This is all I wish to say about Professor James 9 
first two propositions, namely : — 

(1) That no ideas of ours are true, except those 

which we can verify. 

(2) That all those ideas, which we can verify, are 

true. 

The first seems to me extremely doubtful — in 
fact, almost certainly untrue ; the second on the 
other hand, certainly true, in- its most obvious 
meaning. And I shall say no more about them. 
The fact is, I doubt whether either of them 
expresses anything which Professor James is really 



io8 WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM 



»» 



8 



anxious to assert. I have mentioned them, only 
because his words do, in fact, imply them and 
because he gives those words a very prominent 
place. But I have already had occasion to notice 
that he seems to speak as if to say that we can 
verify an idea came to the same thing as saying it 
is useful to us. And it is the connection of truth 
with usefulness, not its connection with "verifica- 
tion," that he is, I think, really anxious to assert 
He talks about " verification" only, 1 believe, because 
he thinks that what he says about it will support his 
main view that truth is what "works," is "useful," 
is "expedient," "pays." It is this main view we 
have now to consider. We have to consider the 
two propositions : — 

That all our true ideas are useful. 

That all ideas, which are useful, are true. 

First, then : is it the case that all our true ideas 
are useful ? Is it the case that none of our ideas 
are true, except those which are useful ? 

I wish to introduce my discussion of this question 
by quoting a passage in which Professor James 
seems to me to say something which is indisputably 
true. Towards the end of Lecture VI, he attacks 
the view that truths " have an unconditional claim 
to be recognised." And in the course of his attack 
the following passage occurs : — 

"Must I," he says, "constantly be repeating the 
truth 'twice two are four' because of its eternal 
claim on recognition? or is it sometimes irrelevant? 
Must my thoughts dwell night and day on my 
personal sins and blemishes, because I truly have 
them ? — or may I sink and ignore them in order to 
be a decent social unit, and not a mass of morbid 
melancholy and apology ? " 

u It is quite evident/' he goes on, " that our 
obligation to acknowledge truth, so far from being 



WILLIAM JAMES 1 « PRAGMATISM " 109 

unconditional, is tremendously conditional. Truth 
with a big T, and in the singular, claims abstractly 
to be recognised, of course ; but concrete truths in 
the plural need be recognised only when their 
recognition is expedient." (pp. 231-232). 

What Professor James says in this passage seems 
to me so indisputably true as fully to justify the 
vigour of his language. It is as clear as anything 
can be that it would not be useful for any man's 
mind to be always occupied with the true idea that 
he had certain faults and blemishes ; or to be always 
occupied with the idea that twice two are four. It 
is clear, that is, that, if there are times at which a 
particular true idea is useful, there certainly are 
other times at which it would not be useful, but 
positively in the way. This is plainly true of nearly 
all, if not quite all, our true ideas. It is plainly true 
with regard to nearly all of them that, even if the 
occasions on which their occurrence is useful are 
many, the occasions on which their occurrence would 
not be useful are many more. With regard to most 
of them it is true that on most occasions they will, 
as Professor James says elsewhere, " be practically 
irrelevant, and had better remain latent." 

It is, then, quite clear that almost any particular 
true idea would not be useful at all times and that 
the times at which it would not be useful, are many 
more than the times at which it would. And what 
we have to consider is whether, in just this sense in 
which it is so clear that most true ideas would not 
be useful at most times, it is nevertheless true that 
all our true ideas are useful. Is this so? Are all 
our true ideas useful ? 

Professor James, we see, has just told us that 
there are ever so many occasions upon which a 
particular true idea, such as that 2 + 2=4, would not be 
useful — when, on the contrary, it would be positively 
in the way. And this seems to be indisputably 



no WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM 



»* 



clear. But is not something else almost equally 
clear? Is it not almost equally clear that cases, 
such as he says would not be useful, do sometimes 
actually happen ? Is it not clear that we do actually 
sometimes have true ideas, at times when they are 
not useful, but are positively in the way ? It seems 
to me to be perfectly clear that this does sometimes 
occur ; and not sometimes only, but very commonly. 
The cases in which true ideas occur at times when 
they are useful, are, perhaps, far more numerous; 
but, if we look at men in general, the cases in which 
true ideas occur, at times when they are not useful, 
do surely make up positively a very large number. 
Is it not the case that men do sometimes dwell on 
their faults and blemishes, when it is not useful for 
them to do so? when they would much better be 
thinking of something else ? Is it not the case that 
they are often unable to get their minds away from 
a true idea, when it is harmful for them to dwell on 
it ? Still more commonly, does it not happen that 
they waste their time in acquiring pieces of infor- 
ation which are no use to them, though perhaps 
very useful to other people ? All this seems to me 
to be undeniable — just as undeniable as what Pro- 
fessor James himself has said ; and, if this is so, 
then, in one sense of the words, it is plainly not true 
that all, or nearly all, our true ideas are useful. In 
one sense of the words. For if I have the idea that 
2+2—4 on one day, and then have it again the 
next, I may certainly, in a sense, call the idea I 
have on one day one idea, and the idea I have on 
the next another. I have had two ideas that 2 + 2 
=4, and not one only. Or if two different persons 
both think that I have faults, there have been two 
ideas of this truth and not one only. And in asking 
whether all our true ideas are useful, we might 
mean to ask whether both of these ideas were useful 
and not merely whether one of them was. In this 



WILLIAM JAMES* " PRAGMATISM " in 

sense, then, it is plainly not true that all our true 
ideas are useful. It is not true, that is, that every 
true idea is useful, whenever it occurs. 

In one sense, then, it is plainly not true that all 
our true ideas are useful. But there still remains a 
perfectly legitimate sense in which it might be true. 
It might be meant, that is, not that every occurrence 
of a true idea is useful, but that every true idea is 
useful on at least one of the occasions when it 
occurs. But is this, in fact, the case? It seems to 
me almost as plain that it is not, as that the other 
was not. We have seen that true ideas are not by 
any means always useful on every occasion when 
they occur ; though most that do occur many times 
over and to many different people are, no doubt, 
useful on some of these occasions. But there seems 
to be an immense number of true ideas, which occur 
but once and to one person, and never again either 
to him or to anyone else. I may, for instance, idly 
count the number of dots on the back of a card, and 
arrive at a true idea of their number; and yet, 
perhaps, I may never think of their number again, 
nor anybody else ever know it We are all, it seems 
to me, constantly noticing trivial details, and getting 
true ideas about them, of which we never think 
again, and which nobody else ever gets. And is it 
quite certain that all these true ideas are useful ? It 
seems to me perfectly clear, on the contrary, that 
many of them are not. Just as it is clear that 
many men sometimes waste their time in acquiring 
information which is useful to others but not to 
them, surely it is clear that they sometimes waste 
their time in acquiring information, which is useful 
to nobody at all, because nobody else ever acquires 
it I do not say that it is never useful idly to count 
the number of dots on the back of a card. Plainly 
it is sometimes useful to be idle, and one idle em* 
ployment may often be as good as another. But 



ua WILLIAM JAMES* "PRAGMATISM 



»» 



\ 
\ 



surely it is true that men sometimes do these things* 
when their time would have been better employed 
otherwise? Surely they sometimes get into the 
habit of attending to trivial truths, which it is as 
great a disadvantage that they should attend to as 
that they should constantly be thinking of their 
own thoughts and blemishes ? I cannot see my 
way to deny that this is so; and therefore I 
cannot see my way to assert positively that all our 
true ideas are useful, even so much as on one 
occasion. It seems to me that there are many true 
ideas which occur but once, and which are not use- 
ful when they do occur. And if this be so, then it 
is plainly not true that all our true ideas are useful 
in any sense at all. 

These seem to me to be the most obvious 
objections to the assertion that all our true ideas are 
useful. It is clear, we saw to begin with, that true 
ideas, which are sometimes useful, would not be 
useful at all times. And it seemed almost equally 
clear that they do sometimes occur at times when 
they are not useful. Our true ideas, therefore are 
not useful at every time when they actually occur. 
But in just this sense in which it is so clear that true 
ideas which are sometimes useful, nevertheless some- 
times occur at times when they are not, it seems pretty 
plain that true ideas, which occur but once, are, 
some of them, not useful. If an idea, which is 
sometimes useful, does sometimes occur to a man 
at a time when it is irrelevant and in the way, why 
should not an idea, which occurs but once, occur at 
a time when it is irrelevant and in the way ? It 
seems hardly possible to doubt that this does some- 
times happen. But, if this be so, then it is not true 
that all our true ideas are useful, even so much as 
on one occasion. It is not true that none of our 
ideas are true, except those which are useful. 

But now, what are we to say of the converse 



WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM 1 ' 113 

proposition — the proposition that all those among 
our ideas, which are useful, are true ? That we 
never have a useful idea, which is not true ? 

I confess the matter seems to me equally clears 
here. The assertion should mean that every idea, < 
which is at any time useful, is true ; that no idea, \ 
which is not true, is ever useful. And it seems \ 
hardly possible to doubt that this assertion is falseJ 
It is, in the first place, commonly held that it is 
sometimes right positively to deceive another 
jxyson. • In war, for instance It Is held that one 
army is justified in trying to give the enemy a false 
idea as to where it will be at a given time. Such a 
false idea is sometimes given, and it seems to me 
quite clear that it is sometimes useful. In such a 
case, no doubt, it may be said that the false idea is 
useful to the party who have given it, but not useful 
to those who actually believe in it. And the 
question whether it is useful on the whole will 
depend upon the question which side it is desirable 
should win. But it seems to me unquestionable 
that the false idea is sometimes useful on the whole. 
Take, for instance, the case of a party of savages, 
who wish to make a night attack and massacre a 
party of Europeans but are deceived as to the 
position in which the Europeans are encamped. It 
is surely plain that such a false idea is sometimes 
useful on the whole. But quite apart from the 
question whether deception is ever justifiable, it 
is not very difficult to think of cases where a false 
idea, not produced by deception, is plainly useful — 
and useful, not merely on the whole, but to the 
person who has it as well. A man often thinks 
that his watch is right, when, in fact, it is slow, and v 
his false idea may cause him to miss his train. 
And in such cases, no doubt, his false idea is 
generally disadvantageous. But, in a particular 
case, the train which he would have caught but 

H 



ii 4 WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM 



»» 



for his false idea may be destroyed in a railway 
accident, or something may suddenly occur at 
home, which renders it much more useful that he 
should be there, than it would have been for him 
to catch his train. Do such cases never occur ? 
And is not the false idea sometimes useful in some 
of them ? It seems to me perfectly clear that it is 
sometimes useful for a man to think his watch is 
right when it is wrong. And such instances would 
be sufficient to show that it is not the case that 
every idea of ours, which is ever useful, is a true 
idea. But let us take cases, not, like these, of an 
idea, which occurs but a few times or to one man, 
but of ideas which have occurred to many men at 
many times. It seems to me very difficult to be 
sure that the belief in an eternal hell has not been 
often useful to many men, and yet it may be 
doubted whether this idea is true. And so, too, 
with the belief in a happy life after death, or the 
belief in the existence of a God ; it is, I think, very 
difficult to be sure that these beliefs have not been, 
and are not still, often useful, and yet it may be 
doubted whether they are true. These beliefs, of 
course, are matters of controversy. Some men 
believe that they are both useful and true ; and 
others, again, that they are neither. And I do 
not think we are justified in giving them as certain 
instances of beliefs, which are not true, but, never- 
theless, have often been useful. But there is a 
view that these beliefs, though not true, have, 
nevertheless, been often useful ; and this view 
seems to me to dese/ve respect, especially since, 
as we have seen, some beliefs, which are not true, 
certainly are sometimes useful. Are we justified in 
asserting positively that it is false ? Is it perfectly 
certain that beliefs, which have often been useful 
to many men, may not, nevertheless, be untrue ? 
Is it perfectly certain that beliefs, which are not 



WILLIAM JAMES' " PRAGMATISM " 115 

true, have not often been useful to many men ? 
The certainty may at least be doubted, and in any 
case it seems certain that some beliefs, which are 
not true, are, nevertheless, sometimes useful. 

For these reasons, it seems to me almost certain 
that both the assertions which I have been con- 
sidering are false. It is almost certainly false that ? 
all our true ideas are useful, and almost certainly J 
false that all our useful ideas are true. But I have 
only urged what seem to me to be the most obvious 
objections to these two statements ; I have not 
tried to sustain these objections by elaborate 
arguments, and I have omitted elaborate argument, 
partly because of a reason which I now wish to 
state. The fact is, I am not at all sure that 
Professor James would not himself admit that both 
these statements are false. I think it is quite 
possible he would admit that they are, and would 
say that he never meant either to assert or to imply 
the contrary. He complains that some of the critics 
of Pragmatism are unwilling to read any but the 
silliest of possible meanings into the statements of 
Pragmatism ; and, perhaps, he would say that this 
is the case here. I certainly hope that he would. 
I certainly hope he would say that these statements, 
to which I have objected, are silly. For it does\ 
seem to me intensely silly to say that we can verify 
all our true ideas ; intensely silly to say that every j ' 
one of our true ideas is at some time useful ;■ 
intensely silly to say that every idea which is ever 
useful is true. I hope Professor James would 1 
admit all these things to be silly, for if he and 
other Pragmatists would admit even as much as 
this, I think a good deal would be gained. But 
it by no means follows that because a philosopher 
would admit a view to be silly, when it is definitely 
put before him, he has not himself been constantly 
holding and implying that very view. He may 



u6 WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM 



»? 



quite sincerely protest that he never has either 
held or implied it, and yet he may all the time have 
been not only implying it but holding it — vaguely, 
perhaps, but really. A man may assure us, quite 
sincerely that he is not angry ; he may really think 
that he is not, and yet we may be able to judge 
quite certainly from what he says that he really is 
angry. He may assure us quite sincerely that he 
never meant anything to our discredit by what he 
said — that he was not thinking of anything in the 
least discreditable to us, and yet it may be plain 
from his words that he was actually condemning us 
very severely. And so with a philosopher. He 
may protest, quite angrily, when a view is put 
before him in other words than his own, that he 
never either meant or implied any such thing, and 
yet it may be possible to judge, from what he says, 
that this very view, wrapped up in other words, was 
not only held by him but was precisely what made 
his thoughts seem to him to be interesting and 
important. Certainly he may quite often imply a 
given thing which, at another time, he denies. 
Unless it were possible for a philosopher to do 
this, there would be very little inconsistency in 
philosophy, and surely everyone will admit that 
other philosophers are very often inconsistent. 
And so in this case, even if Professor James would 
say that he never meant to imply the things to 
which I have been objecting, yet in the case of two 
of these things, I cannot help thinking that he does 
actually imply them — nay more, that he is frequently 
actually vaguely thinking of them, and that his 
theory of truth owes its interest, in very great part, 
to the fact that he is implying them. In the case 
of the two views that all our true ideas are useful, 
and that all our useful ideas are true, I think this 
is so, and I do not mean merely that his words 
imply them. A man's words may often imply a 



WILLIAM JAMES' " PRAGMATISM " 117 

thing, when he himself is in no way, however 
vaguely, thinking either of that thing or of anything 
which implies it ; he may simply have expressed 
himself unfortunately. But in the case of the two 
views that all our true ideas are useful, and all our 
useful ideas true, I do not think this is so with 
Professor James. I think that his thoughts seem 
interesting to him and others, largely because he is 
thinking, not merely of words, but of things which 
imply these two views, in the very form in which I 
have objected to them. And I wish now to give 
some reasons for thinking this. 

Professor James certainly wishes to assert that 
there is some connection between truth and utility. 
And the connection which I have suggested that he 
has vaguely before his mind is this : that every true 
idea is, at some time or other, useful, and conversely 
that every idea, which is ever useful, is true. And 
I have urged that there are obvious objections to 
both these views. But now, supposing Professor 
James does not mean^to assert either of these two 
things, what else can he mean to assert ? What 
else can he mean, that would account for the 
interest and importance he seems to attach to his 
assertion of connection between truth and utility ? 
Let us consider the alternatives. 

And, first of all, he might mean that most of our 
true ideas are useful, and most of our useful ideas 
true. He might mean that most of our true ideas 
are useful at some time or other ; and even that 
most of them are useful, whenever they actually 
occur. And he might mean, moreover, that if we 
consider the whole range of ideas, which are useful 
to us, we shall find that by far the greater number 
of them are true ones ; that true ideas are far more 
often useful to us, than those which are not true. 
And all this, I think, may be readily admitted to be 
true. If this were all that he meant, I do not think 



n8 WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM" 

that anyone would be very anxious to dispute it But 
is it conceivable that this is all that he means ? Is 
it conceivable that he should have been so anxious 
to insist upon this admitted commonplace ? Is it 
conceivable that he should have been offering us 
this, and nothing more, as a theory of what truth 
means, and a theory worth making a fuss about, 
and being proud of? It seems to me quite incon- 
ceivable that this should have been all that he 
meant. He must have had something more than 
this in his mind. But, if so, what more ? 

In the passage which I quoted at the beginning, 
as showing that he does mean to assert that all 
useful ideas are true, he immediately goes on to 
assert a qualification, which must now be noticed 
41 The true," he says, " is only the expedient in the 
way of our thinking " (p. 222). But he immediately 
adds : *' Expedient in the long run, and on the 
whole, of course ; for what meets expediently all 
the experience in sight won't necessarily meet all 
further experiences equally satisfactorily," Here, 
therefore, we have something else that he might 
mean. What is expedient in the long run, he 
means to say, is true. And what exactly does this 
mean ? It seems to mean that an idea, which is 
not true, may be expedient for some time. That 
is to say, it may occur once, and be expedient then ; 
and again, and be expedient then ; and so on, over 
a considerable period. But (Professor James seems 
to prophesy) if it is not true, there will come a time, 
when it will cease to be expedient. If it occurs 
again and again over a long enough period, there 
will at last, if it is not true, come a time when it 
will (for once at least) fail to be useful, and will 

i perhaps he means) never be useful again. This is, 
think, what Professor James means in this 
passage. He means, I think, that though an idea, 
which is not true, may for some time be repeatedly 



WILLIAM JAMES' « PRAGMATISM » 119 

expedient, there will at last come a time when its 
occurrence will, perhaps, never be expedient again, 
certainly will, for a time, not be generally expedient. 
And this a view which, it seems to me, may possibly 
be true. It is certainly possible that a time may 
come, in the far future, when ideas, which are not 
true, will hardly ever, if ever, be expedient. And 
this is all that Professor James seems here positively 
to mean. He seems to mean that, if you take time 
enough, false ideas will some day cease to be ex- 
pedient. And it is very difficult to be sure that 
this is not true ; since it is very difficult to prophesy 
as to what may happen in the far future. I am 
sure I hope that this prophesy will come true. But 
in the meantime (Professor James seems to admit) 
ideas, which are not true, may, for an indefinitely 
long time, again and again be expedient. And is it 
conceivable that a theory, which admits this, is all 
that he has meant to assert ? Is it conceivable that 
what interests him, in his theory of truth, is merely 
the belief that, some day or other, false ideas will 
cease to be expedient ? " In the long run, of 
course" he says, as if this were what he had meant 
all along. But I think it is quite plain that this is 
not all that he has meant This may be one thing 
which he is anxious to assert, but it certainly does 
not explain the whole of his interest in his theory of 
truth. 

And, in fact, there is quite a different theory 
which he seems plainly to have in his mind in other 
places. When Professor James says, " in the long 
run, of course" he implies that ideas which are 
expedient only for a short run, are very often not 
true. But in what he says elsewhere he asserts the 
very opposite of this. He says elsewhere that a 
belief is true •' so long as to believe it is profitable 
to our lives" (p. 75). That is to say, a belief will 
be true, so long as it is useful, even if it is not useful 



i2o WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM 



ft 



in the long run ! This is certainly quite a different 
theory ; and, strictly speaking, it implies that an 
idea, which is useful even on one occasion, will be 
true. But perhaps this is only a verbal implication. 
I think very likely that here Professor James was 
only thinking of ideas, which can be said to have a 
run, though only a comparatively short one — of ideas, 
that is, which are expedient, not merely on one 
occasion, but for some time. That is to say, the 
\ theory which he now suggests, is that ideas, which 
J occur again and again, perhaps to one man only, 
I perhaps to several different people, over some space 
i of time are, if they are expedient on most occasions 
I within that space of time, true. This is a view 
[which he is, I think, really anxious to assert ; and 
Hf it were true, it would, I think, be important 
And it is difficult to find instances which show, with 
certainty, that it is false. I believe that it is false ; 
but it is difficult to prove it, because, in the case of 
some ideas it is so difficult to be certain that they 
ever were useful, and in the case of others so 
difficult to be certain that they are not true. A 
belief such as I spoke of before — the belief in 
eternal hell — is an instance. I think this belief has 
been, for a long time, useful, and that yet it is false. 
But it is, perhaps, arguable that it never has been 
useful ; and many people on the other hand, would 
still assert that it is true. It cannot, therefore, 
perhaps, fairly be used as an instance of a belief, 
which is certainly not true, and yet has for some 
time been useful. But whether this view that all 
beliefs, which are expedient for some time, are 
true, be true or false ; can it be all that Professor 
James means to assert? Can it constitute the 
whole of what interests him in his theory of 
truth ? 

I do not think it can. I think it is plain that he 
has in his mind something more than any of these 



WILLIAM JAMES' " PRAGMATISM " 121 

alternatives, or than all of them taken together. 
And I think so partly for the following reason. He 
speaks from the outset as if he intended to tell us 
what distinguishes true ideas from those which are 
not true ; to tell us, that is to say, not merely of 
some property which belongs to all our true ideas ; 
nor yet merely of some property, which belongs to 
none but true ideas ; but of some property which 
satisfies both these requirements at once — which 
both belongs to all our true ideas, and also be- 
longs to none but true ones. Truth, he says to 
begin with, means the agreement of our ideas with 
reality ; and he adds " as falsity their disagreement." 
And he explains that he is going to tell us what 
property it is that is meant by these words " agree- 
ment with reality." So again in the next passage 
which I quoted: "True ideas," he says "are those 
that we can assimilate, validate, corroborate and 
verify." But, he also adds, " False ideas are those 
that we cannot." And no one, I think, could 
possibly speak in this way, who had not in his head 
the intention of telling us what property it is which 
distinguishes true ideas from those which are not 
true, and which, therefore, not only belongs to all 
ideas which are true, but also to none that are not 
And that he has this idea in his head and 
thinks that the property of being " useful " or 
11 paying " is such a property, is again clearly shown 
by a later passage. " Our account of truth," he says 
(p. 218) "is an account of truths in the plural, of 
processes of leading, realised in rebus, and having only 
this quality in common, that they pay" Only this 
quality in common ! If this be so, the quality must 
obviously be one, which is not shared by any ideas 
which are not true ; for, if true ideas have any quality 
in common at all, they must have at least one such 
quality, which is not shared by those which are not 
true. Plainly, therefore, Professor James is in- 



xaa WILLIAM JAMES* "PRAGMATISM 



?* 



tending to tell us of a property which belongs both 
to all true ideas and only to true ideas. And this 

{nroperty, he says, is that of "paying." But now 
et us suppose that he means by " paying/ 1 not 
" paying once at least/ 1 but, according to the alter- 
native he suggests, " paying in the long run " or 
"paying for some time/' Can he possibly have 
supposed that these were properties which belonged 
both to all true ideas and also to none but true ones ? 
They may, perhaps, be properties which belong to 
none but true ones. I doubt, as I have said, 
whether the latter does; but still it is difficult to 
prove the opposite. But even if we granted that 
they belong to none but true ones, surely it is only 
too obvious that they do not fulfil the other require- 
ment — that they do not belong to nearly all true 
ones. Can anyone suppose that all our true ideas 
pay "in the long run" or repeatedly for some 
time ? Surely it is plain that an enormous number do 
not for the simple reason that an enormous number 
of them have no run at all, either long or short, but 
occur but once, and never recur. I believe truly 
that a certain book is on a particular shelf about 
10.15 p.m. on December 21st, 1907; and this true 
belief serves me well and helps me to find it But 
the belief that that book is there at that particular 
time occurs to no one else, and never again to me. 
Surely there are thousands of useful true beliefs 
which, like this, are useful but once, and never occur 
again ; and it would, therefore, be preposterous to 
say that every true idea is useful " in the long run " 
or repeatedly for some time. If, therefore, we 
supposed Professor James to mean that " paying in 
the long run " or " paying repeatedly over a con- 
siderable period " were properties which belonged 
to all true ideas aud to none but true ones, we 
should be supposing htm to mean something still 
more monstrous than if we suppose him to mean 



WILLIAM JAMES' " PRAGMATISM '* 1*3 

that " paying at least once " was such a 
property. 

To sum up then : 

I think there is no doubt that Professor James 9 
interest in " the pragmatist theory of truth " is 
largely due to the fact that he thinks it tells us what 
distinguishes true ideas from those which are not 
true. And he thinks the distinction is that true 
ideas "pay," and false ones don't. The most 
natural interpretation of this view is : That every 
true idea pays at least once ; and that every idea, 
which pays at least once, is true. These were the 
propositions I considered first, and I gave reasons 
for thinking that both are false. But Professor 
James suggested elsewhere that what he means by 
"paying" is "paying in the long run." And here 
it seems possibly true that all ideas which " pay in 
the long run " are true ; but it is certainly false that 
all our true ideas " pay in the long run," if by this 
be meant anything more than "pay at least once." 
Again, he suggested that what he meant by paying 
was "paying for some time." And here, again, 
even if it is true (and it seems very doubtful) that 
all ideas which pay for some time are true, it is 
certainly false that all our true ideas pay for some 
time, if by this be meant anything more than that 
they pay " at least once." 

This, I think, is the simplest and most obvious 
objection to Professor James 1 " instrumental " view 
of truth — the view that truth is what "works," 
"pays," is "useful," He seems certainly to have 
in his mind the idea that this theory tells us what 
distinguishes true ideas from false ones, and to be 
interested in it mainly for this reason. He has 
vaguely in his mind that he has told us of some 
property which belongs to all true ideas and to none 
but true ones ; and that this property is that of 
"paying." And the objection is, that, whatever 



i2 4 WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM 



ft 



we understand by "paying," whether "paying at 
least once," or " paying in the long run," or " paying 
for some time," it seems certain that none of these 
properties will satisfy both requirements. As re- 
gards the first, that of "paying at least once," it 
seems almost certain that it satisfies neither: it is 
neither true that all our true ideas "pay at least 
once," nor yet that every idea which pays at least 
once, is true. On the contrary, many true ideas 
never pay at all ; and many ideas, which are not 
true, do pay on at least one occasion. And as 
regards the others, "paying in the long run" and 
" paying for some time," even if these do belong to 
none but true ideas (and even this seems very 
doubtful), they certainly neither of them satisfy the 
other requirement— neither of them belong to all 
our true ideas. For, in order that either of them 
may belong to an idea, that idea must pay at least 
once ; and, as we have seen, many true ideas do 
not pay even once, and cannot, therefore, pay either 
in the long run or for some time. And, moreover, 
many true ideas, which do pay on one occasion, 
seem to pay on one occasion and one only. 

And, if Professor James does not mean to assert 
any of these things, what is there left for him to 
mean ? There is left in the first place, the theory 
that most of our true ideas do pay ; and that most 
of the ideas which pay are true. This seems to me 
to be true, and, indeed, to be all that is certainly 
true in what he says. But is it conceivable that 
this is all he has meant? Obviously, these asser- 
tions tell us of no property at all which belongs to 
all true ideas, and to none but true ones ; and, 
moreover, it seems impossible that he should have 
been so anxious to assert this generally admitted 
commonplace. What a very different complexion 
his whole discussion would have worn, had he 
merely asserted this — this quite clearly, and nothing 



WILLIAM JAMES 1 "PRAGMATISM" 125 

but this, while admitting openly that many true ideas 
do not pay, and that many, which do pay, are not true! 

And, besides this commonplace, there is only left 
for him to mean two one-sided and doubtful 
assertions to the effect that certain properties belong 
to none but true ideas. There is the assertion that 
all ideas which pay in the long run are true, and 
the assertion that all ideas which pay for some con- 
siderable time are true. And as to the first, it may 
be true ; but it may also be doubted, and Professor 
James gives us no reason at all for thinking that it 
is true. Assuming that religious ideas have been 
useful in the past, is it quite certain that they may 
not permanently continue to be useful, even though 
they are false ? That, in short, even though they 
are not true, they nevertheless will be useful, not 
only for a time, but in the long run ? And as for 
the assertion that all ideas, which pay for a con- 
siderable time, are true, this is obviously more 
doubtful still. Whether certain religious ideas will 
or will not be useful in the long run, it seems 
difficult to doubt that many of them have been 
useful for a considerable time. And why should 
we be told dogmatically that all of these are true ? 
This, it seems to me, is by far the most interesting 
assertion, which is left for Professor James to make, 
when we have rejected the theory that the property 
of being useful belongs to all true ideas, as well as 
to none but true ones. But he has given no reason 
for asserting it He seems, in fact, to base it 
merely upon the general untenable theory, that 
utility belongs to all true ideas, and to none but 
true ones ; that this is what truth means. 

These, then, seem to me the plainest and most 
obvious objections to what Professor James says 
about the connection between truth and utility. 
And there are only two further points, in what he 
says under this head, that I wish to notice. 



126 WILLIAM JAMES' " PRAGMATISM " 

In the first place, we have hitherto been consider- 
ing only whether it is true, as a matter of empirical 
fact, that all our true ideas are useful, and those 
which are not true, never. Professor James seems, 
at least, to mean that, as a matter of fact, this is so ; 
and I have only urged hitherto that as a matter of 
/act, it is not so. But as we have seen, he also 
asserts something more than this — he also asserts 
that this property of utility is the only one which 
belongs to all our true ideas. And this further 
assertion cannot possibly be true, if, as I have 
urged, there are many true ideas which do not 
possess this property ; or if, as I have urged, many 
ideas, which do possess it, are nevertheless not true. 
The objections already considered are, then, sufficient 
to overthrow this further assertion also. If there 
are any true ideas, which are not useful, or if any, 
which are useful, are not true, it cannot be the case 
that utility is the only property which true ideas 
have in common. There must be some property, 
other than utility, which is common to all true 
ideas ; and a correct theory as to what property it 
is that does belong to all true ideas, and to none 
but true ones, is still to seek. The empirical 
objections, hitherto given, are then sufficient objec- 
tions to this further assertion also; but they are 
not the only objections to it. There is another 
and still more serious objection to the assertion that 
utility is the only property which all true ideas have 
in common. For this assertion does not merely 
imply that, as a matter of fact, all our true ideas 
and none but true ideas are useful. It does, indeed, 
imply this ; and therefore the fact that these em- 
pirical assertions are not true is sufficient to refute 
it But it also implies something more. If utility 
were the only property which all true ideas had in 
common, it would follow not merely that all true 
ideas are useful, but also that any idea, which was 



WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM" 127 

useful, would be true no matter what other properties 
it might have or might fail to have. There can, I 
tbink, be no doubt that Professor James does fre- 
quently speak as if this were the case ; and there is 
an independent and still more serious objection to 
this implication. Even if it were true (as it is not) 
that all our true ideas and none but true ideas are, 
as a matter of fact, useful, we should still have a 
strong reason to object to the statement that any 
idea, which was useful, would be true. For it implies 
that if such an idea as mine, that Professor James 
exists, and has certain thoughts, were useful, this 
idea would be true, even if no such person as Pro- 
fessor James ever did exist. It implies that, if the 
idea that I had the seven of diamonds in my hand 
at cards last night, were useful, this idea would be 
true, even if, in fact, I did not have that card in 
my hand. And we can, I think, see quite plainly 
that this is not the case. With regard to some 
kinds of ideas, at all events — ideas with regard to 
the existence of other people, or with regard to past 
experiences of our own — it seems quite plain that 
they would not 'be true, unless they "agreed with 
reality " in some other sense than that which Pro- 
fessor James declares to be the only one in which 
true ideas must agree with it. Even if my idea 
that Professor James exists were \ to "agree with 
reality," in the sense that, owing to it, I handled 
other realities better than I should have done with- 
out it, it would, I think, plainly not be true, unless 
Professor James really did exist — unless he were a 
reality. And this, I think, is one of the two most 
serious objections to what he seems to hold about 
the connection of truth with utility. He seems to 
hold that any idea, which was useful, would be true, 
no matter what other properties it might fail to have. 
And with regard to some ideas, at all events, it 
seems plain that they cannot be true, unless they 



128 WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM 



»> 



have the property that what they believe to exist, 
really does or did exist. Beliefs in the existence of 
other people might be useful to me, even if I alone 
existed ; but, nevertheless, in such a case, they 
would not be true. 

And there is only one other point, in what Pro- 
fessor James says in connection with the "instru- 
mental" view of truth, upon which I wish to 
remark. We have seen that he seems sometimes 
to hold that beliefs are true, so long" as they are 
" profitable to our lives." And this implies, as we 
have seen, the doubtful proposition than any belief 
which is useful for some length of time, is true. 
But this is not all that it implies. It also implies 
that beliefs are true only so long as they are profit- 
able. Nor does Professor James appear to mean 
by this that they occur, only so long as they are 
profitable. He seems to hold, on the contrary, that 
beliefs, which are profitable for some time, do some- 
times finally occur at a time when they are not 
profitable. He implies, therefore, that a belief, 
which occurs at several different times, may be true 
at some of the times at which it occurs, and yet 
untrue at others. I think there is no doubt that 
this view is what he is sometimes thinking of. And 
this, we see, constitutes a quite new view as to the 
connection between truth and utility — a view quite 
different from any that we have hitherto considered. 
This view asserts not that every true idea is useful 
at some time, or in the long run, or for a consider- 
able period ; but that the truth of an idea may 
come and go, as its utility comes and goes. It 
admits that one and the same idea sometimes occurs 
at times when it is useful, and sometimes at times 
when it is not ; but it maintains that this same idea 
is true, at those times when it is useful, and not true, 
at those when it is not. And the fact that Professor 
James seems to suggest this view, constitutes, I 



WILLIAM JAMES* "PRAGMATISM" 129 

think, a second most serious objection to what he 
says about the connection of truth and utility. It 
seem9 so obvious that utility is a property which 
cornea and goes — which belongs to a given idea at 
one time, and does not belong to it at another, that 
anyone who says that the true is the useful naturally 
seems not to be overlooking this obvious fact, but 
to be suggesting that truth is a property which 
comes and goes in the same way. It is, in this way 
I think, that the " instrumental " view of truth is 
connected with the view that truth is " mutable." 
Professor James does, I think, imply that truth is 
mutable in just this sense — namely, that one and 
the same idea may be true at some of the times at 
which it occurs, and not true at others,, and this is 
the view which I have next to consider. 

(") 

Professor James seems to hold, generally, 
that "truth" is mutable. And by this he seems 
sometimes to mean that an idea which, when it 
occurs at one time, is true, may, when it occurs at 
another time, not be true. He seems to hold that 
one and the same idea may be true at one time and 
false at another. That it may be, for I do not 
suppose he means that all ideas do actually undergo 
this change from true to false. Many true ideas 
seem to occur but once, and, if so, they, at least, 
will not actually be true at one time and false at 
another, though, even with regard to these, perhaps 
Professor James means to maintain that they might 
be false at another time, if they were to occur at it 
But I am not sure that he even means to maintain 
this with regard to all our true ideas. Perhaps he 
does not mean to say, with regard to all of them, 
even that they can change from true to false. He 
speaks, generally, indeed, as if truth were mutable ; 
but, in one passage, he seems to insist that there is 
a certain class of true ideas, none of which are 
1 



A 



130 WILLIAM JAMES* "PRAGMATISM" 

mutable in this respect "Relations among purity 
mental ideas" he says (p. 209), "form another 
sphere where true and false beliefs obtain, and here 
the beliefs are absolute or unconditional. When 
they are true they bear the name either of defini- 
tions or of principles. It is either a principle or a 
definition that 1 and 1 make 2, that 2 and 1 make 
3, and so on ; that white differs less from grey than 
it does from black ; that when the cause begins to 
act the effect also commences. Such propositions 
hold of all possible ' ones/ of all conceivable ' whites,' 
4 greys/ and • causes/ The objects here are mental 
objects. Their relations are perceptually obvious 
at a glance, and no sense- verification is necessary. 
Moreover, once true, always true, of those same 
mental objects. Truth here has an 'eternal' 
character. If you can find a concrete thing any- 
where that is 'one' or 'white' or 'grey' or an 
' effect/ then your principles will everlastingly apply 
to it" Professor James does seem here to hold that 
there are true ideas, which once true, are always 
true. Perhaps, then, he does not hold that all true 
ideas are mutable. Perhaps he does not even hold 
that all true ideas, except ideas of this kind, are so. 
But he does seem to hold at least that many of our 
true ideas are mutable. And even this proposition 
seems to me to be disputable. It seems to me 
that there is a sense in which it is the case with 
every true idea that, if once true, it is always true. 
That is to say, that every idea, which is true once, 
would be true at any other time at which it were to 
occur ; and that every idea which does occur more 
than once, if true once, is true at every time at 
which it does occur. There seems to me, I say, to 
be a sense in which this is so. And this seems to 
me to be the sense in which it is most commonly 
and most naturally maintained that all truths are 
41 immutable." Professor James seems to mean to 



WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM" 131 

deny it, even in this sense. He seems to me* 
contsgntly to speak as if there were no sense inN 
which all truths are immutable. And I only wish 
to point out what seems to me to be the plainest 
and most obvious objection to such language. 

And, first of all, there is one doctrine, which he 
seems to connect with this of his that " truths are 
mutable," with regard to which I fully agree with 
him. He seems very anxious to insist that reality 
is mutable : that it does change, and that it is not 
irrational to hope that in the future it will be 
different from and much better than it is now. And 
this seems to me to be quite undeniable. It seems to 
me quite certain that I do have ideas at one time which 
I did not have at another ; that change, therefore, doss 
really occur. It seems to me quite certain that in 
the future many things will be different from what 
they are now ; and I see no reason to think that 
they may not be much better. There is much 
misery in the world now; and I think it is quite 
possible that some day there will really be much 
less. This view that reality is mutable, that /aetsf- 
do change, that some things have properties at one 
time which they do not have at other times, seems 
to me certainly true. And so far, therefore, as 
Professor James merely means to assert this obvious 
fact, I have no objection to his view. Some 
philosophers, I think, have really implied the denial 
of this fact All those who deny the reality of time 
do seem to me to imply that nothing really changes or 
can change — that, in fact, reality is wholly 
immutable. And so far as Professor James is 
merely protesting against this view, I should, 
therefore, agree with him. 

But I think it is quite plain that he does not mean 
merely this, when he says that truth is mutable. No 
one would choose this way of expressing himself if 
he merely meant to say that some things are 



,1 



132 WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM 



99 



mutable. Truth, Professor James has told U6, is a 
property of certain of our ideas. And those of our 
ideas, which are true or false, are certainly only a 
part of the Universe. Other things in the Universe- 
might, therefore, change, even if our ideas never 
changed in respect of this property. Arid our ideas 
themselves do undoubtedly change in some respects. 
A given idea exists in my mind at one moment and 
does not exist in it at another. At one moment it 
is in my mind and not in somebody else's, and at 
another in somebody else's and not in mine. I 
sometimes think of the truth that twice two are four* 
when I am in one mood, and sometimes when I am; 
in another. I sometimes think of it in connection 
with one set of ideas and sometimes in connection 
with another set. Ideas, then, are constantly 
changing in some respects. They come and go; 
and at one time they stand in a given relation to* 
other things or ideas, to which at another time they 
do not stand in that relation. In this sense, any 
given idea^may certainly have a property at one 
time which it has not got at another time. All this 
seems obvious ; and all this cannot be admitted, 
without admitting that reality is mutable — that- 
some things change. But obviously it does not seem- 
to follow from this that there is no respect in which 
ideas are immutable. It does not seem to follow 
that because ideas, and other things, change some of 
their : properties, they necessarily change that one 
which we are considering — namely, " truth." It 
does not follow that a given idea, which has the 
property of truth at one time, ever exists at any 
other time without having that property. And yet 
that this does happen seems to be part of what is 
meant by saying that truth is mutable. Plainly, 
therefore, to say this is to say something quite 
different from saying that some things are mutable. 
Even, therefore, if We admit that some things are 



WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM" 133 

mutable, it is still open to consider whether truth is 
so. And this is what I want now to consider. • Is it 
the case that an idea which exists at one time, and is 
true then, ever exists at any other time, without 
being true? Is it the case that any idea ever 
changes from true to false ? That it has the property 
of being true on one of the occasions when it exists, 
and that it has not this property, but that of being 
false instead) on some other occasion when it exists!} 
In order to answer this question clearly, it is, I 
think, necessary to make still another distinction* 
jit does certainly seem to be true, in a sense, that & 
given idea may be true on one occasion and false 00 
another. We ' constantly speak as if; there were 
cases in which a given thing was true on one 
occasion and false on another; and I think it 
cannot be denied that, when we so speak, we are 
often expressing in a perfectly proper and legitimate 
manner something which is undeniably true. Jt is 
true now, I might say, that I am in this room ; but 
jto-morrow this will not be true. It is true now that \ 
men are often very miserable ; but perhaps in some 
future state of society this will not be true. These 
are perfectly natural forms of expression, and what 
they express is something which certainly may be 
true. And yet what they do apparently assert i$ 
that something or other, which is true at one time! 
will not, or perhaps will not, be true at another. We 
constantly use such expressions, which imply that 
what is true at one time is not true at another ; and 
it is certainly legitimate to use them. And hence, I 
think, we must admit that, in a sense, it is true that 
a thing may be true at one time which is not true at 
another; in that sense, namely, in which we use 
these expressions. And it is, I think, also plain that 
these things, which may be true at one time and 
false at another, may, in a sense, be ideas. We 
plight even say : The idea that I am in this room, is 



134 WILLIAM JAMES' " PRAGMATISM * 

true now ; but to-morrow it will not be true. We 
might say this without any strain on language. In 
any ordinary book — indeed, in any philosophical 
book, where the subject we are at present discuss- 
ing was not being expressly discussed — such 
expressions do, I think, constantly occur. And we 
should pass them, without any objection. We 
should at once understand what they meant, and 
treat them as perfectly natural expressions of 
m things undeniably true. We must, then, I think, 
[ admit that, in a sense, an idea may be true at one 
! time, and false at another. The question is : In 
i what sense? What is the truth for which these 
perfectly legitimate expressions stand ? * 

It seems to me that in all these cases, so far as we 
are not merely talking of facts, but of true ideas, that 
the M idea " wnich we truly say to be true at one time 
and false at another, is merely the idea of a sentence — 
that is, of certain words. And we do undoubtedly 
call words "true." The words M I am at a meeting 
of the Aristotelian Society " are true, if I use them 
now ; but if I use the same words to-morrow, they 
would not be true. The words "George III is 
king of England" were true in 1800, but they are 
not true now, That is to say, a given set of words 
may undoubtedly be true at one time, and false at 
another ; and since we may have ideas of words as 
well as of other things, we may, in this sense, say 
the same of certain of our "ideas," We may say 
that some of our " ideas " (namely those of words) 
are true at one time and not true at another. 

But is it conceivable that Professor James merely 
meant to assert that the same words are sometimes 
true at one time and false at another ? Can this be 
all he means by saying that truth is mutable ? I 
do not think it can possibly be so. No one, I 
think, in definitely discussing the mutability of 
truth, could say that true ideas were mutable, and 



WILLIAM JAMES' « PRAGMATISM " 135 

yet mean (although he did not say so) that this 
proposition applied solely to ideas of words. Pro- 
fessor James must, I think, have been sometimes 
thinking that other ideas, and not merely ideas of 
words, do sometimes change from true to false. 
And this is the proposition which I am concerned to 
dispute. It seems to me that if we mean by an 
idea, not merely the idea of certain words, but the 
kind of idea which words express, it is very doubtful 
whether such an idea ever changes from true to 
false — whether any such idea is ever true at one 
time and false at another. 

And plainly, in the first place, the mere fact that 
the same set of words, as in the instances I have 
given, really are true at one time and false at 
another, does not afford any presumption that 
anything which they stand for is true at one time 
and false at another. For the same words may 
obviously be used in different senses at different 
times; and hence though the same words, which 
formerly expressed a truth, may cease to express 
one, that may be because they now express a 
different idea, and not because the idea which they 
formerly expressed has ceased to be true. Ana 
that, in instances such as I have given, the words 
do change their meaning according to the time at 
which they are uttered or thought of, is I think, 
evident. If I use now the words " I am in this 
room," these words certainly express (among other 
things) the idea that my being in this room is 
contemporary with my present use of the words ; 
and if I were to use the same words to-morrow, 
they would express the idea that my being in this 
room to-morrow, was contemporary with the use 
of them then. And since my use of them then 
would not be the same fact as my use of them now, 
they would certainly then express a different idea 
from that which they express now. And in general, 



136 WILLIAM JAMES* "PRAGMATISM* 

whenever we use the present tense in its primary 
sense, it seems to me plain that we do mean some- 
thing different by it each time we use it. We 
always mean (among other things) to express the 
idea that a given event is contemporary with our 
actual use of it ; and since our actual use of it on 
one occasion is always a different fact from our 
actual use of it on another, we express by it a 
different idea each time we use it. And similarly 
with the past and future tenses. If anybody had 
said in 1807 " Napoleon is dead," he would certainly 
have meant by these words something different 
from what I mean by them when I use them now. 
He would have meant that Napoleon's death 
occurred at a time previous to his use of those 
words ; and this would not have been true. But in 
this fact there is nothing to show that if he had 
meant by them what I mean now, his idea would 
not have been as true then as mine is how. And 
so, if I say "It will rain to-morrow," these words 
have a different meaning to-day from what they 
would have if I used them to-morrow. What we 
mean by " to-morrow " is obviously a different day, 
when we use the word on one day, from what we 
mean by it when we use it on another. But in this 
there is nothing to show that if the idea, which I 
now mean by " It will rain tomorrow," were to 
occur again to-morrow, it would not be true then, if 
it is true now. All this is surely very obvious* 
But, if we take account of it, and if we concentrate 
our attention not on the words but on what is meant 
by them, is it so certain that what we mean by them 
on any one occasion ever changes from true to false? 
If there were to occur to me to-morrow the 'very 
same idea which I now express by the words " I am 
in this room," is it certain that this idea would not 
be as true then as it is now? It is perhaps true 
that the whole of what I mean by such a phrase as 



VTIUA AM JAMES* « PRAGMATISM H 137 

this never does recur. But part of it does, and 
that a part which is true. Part of what I mean i& 
fcertainly identical with part of what I should mean 
to-morrow by saying " I was in that room last 
night" And this part would be as true then, as it 
is now. And is there any part, which, if it were to 
recur at any time, would not then be true, though 
it is true now? In the case of all ideas or parts of 
ideas, which ever do actually recur, can we find a 
single instance of one, which is plainly true at on& 
of the times when it occurs, and yet not true at 
another? I cannot think of any such instance!. 
And on the other hand this very proposition that 
any idea (other than mere words) which is true 
once, would be true at any time, seems to me to 
be one of those truths of which Professor James 
has spoken as having an "eternal," "absolute,* 
M unconditional " character — as being "perceptually 
obvious at a glance " and needing " no sense- 
Verification." Just as we know that, if a particular 
colour differs more from black than from grey 
at one time, the same colour would differ more from 
black than from grey at any time, so, it seems to 
me, we can see that, if a particular idea is true at 
one time, the same idea would be true at any time. 

♦ It seems to me, then, that if we mean by an idea, * 1 
not mere words, but the kind of idea which words V 
express, any idea, which is true at one time when 
it occurs, would be true at any time when it were to 
bccur ; and that this is so, even though it is an idea; 
which refers to facts which are mutable. My being 
in this room is a fact which is now, but which 
certainly has not been at every time and will not be 
at every time. And the words "I am in this room/ ? 
though they express a truth now, would not have 
expressed one if I had used them yesterday, and 
Fill not if I use them to-morrow. But if we 
consider the idea which these words now express — 



138 WILLIAM JAMES' " PRAGMATISM 



i» 



namely, the idea of the connection of my being in 
this room with this particular time — it seems to me 
evident that anybody who had thought of that 
connection at any time in the past, would have been 
thinking truly, and that anybody who were to think 
of it at any time in the future would be thinking 
truly. This seems to me to be the sense in which 
truths are immutable — iif which no idea can change 
from true to false. And I think Professor James 
means to deny of truths generally, if not of all 
truths, that they are immutable even in this sense. 
If he does not mean this there seems nothing left 
for him to mean, when he says that truths are 
mutable, except (i) that some, facts are mutable, and 
(2) that the same words may be true at one time 
and false at another. And it seems to me impossible 
that he could speak as he does, if he meant nothing 
more than these two things. I believe, therefore! 
that he is really thinking that ideas which have 
been once true {ideas, and not merely words) do 
sometimes afterwards become false : that the very 
same idea is at one time true and at another false. 
But he certainly gives no instance which shows 
that this does ever occur. And how far does 
he mean his principle to carry him ? Does he hold 
that this idea that Julius Caesar was murdered in 
the Senate- House, though true now, may, at some 
future time cease to be true, if it should be more 
profitable to the lives of future generations to believe 
that he died in his bed ? Things like this are what 
Jhis words seem to imply ; and, even if he does hold 
f I that truths like this are not mutable, he never tries 
to tell us to what kinds of truths he would limit 
mutability, nor how they differ from such as this. 

(in) 

Finally, there remains the view that "to an 
unascertainable extent our truths are man-made 



WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM" 139 

products/' And the only point I want to make 
about this view may be put very briefly. 

It is noticeable that all the instances which Pro- 
fessor James gives of the ways in which, according to 
him, "our truths " are " made " are instances of ways 
in which our beliefs come into existence. In many 
of these ways, it would seem, false beliefs sometimes 
come into existence as well as true ones ; and I take 
it Professor James does not always wish to deny this. 
False beliefs, I think he would say, are just as much 
" man-made products" as true ones: it is sufficient 
for his purpose if true beliefs do come into existence 
in the ways he mentions. And the only point which 
seems to be illustrated by all these instances, is that 
in all of them the existence of a true belief does 
depend in some way or other upon the previous 
existence of something in some man's mind. They 
are all of them cases in which we may truly say : 
This man would not have had just that belief, had 
not some man previously had such and such experi- 
ences, or interests, or purposes. In some cases they 
are instances of ways in which the existence of a 
particular belief in a man depends upon his own 
previous experiences or interests or volitions. But 
this does not seem to be the case in all. Professor 
James seems also anxious to illustrate the point that 
one man's beliefs often depend upon the previous 
experiences or interests or volitions of other men* 
And, as I say, the only point which seems to be 
definitely illustrated in all cases is that the existence 
of a true belief does depend, in some way or other, 
upon something which has previously existed in 
some man's mind. Almost any kind of dependence, 
it would seem, is sufficient to illustrate Professor 
James' point 

And as regards this general thesis that almost all 
our beliefs, true as well as false, depend, in some 
way or other, upon what has previously been in 



140 WILLIAM JAMES' "PRAGMATISM 



M 



sdme human mind, it will, I think, be readily 
admitted. It is a commonplace, which, so far as I 
know, hardly anyone would deny. If this is all that 
k to be meant by saying that our true beliefs are 
"man-made," it must, I think, be admitted that almost 
all, if not quite all, really are man-made. And this is 
all that Professor James' instances seem to me, in 
fact, to show. 

But is this all that Professor James means, when 
he says that our truths are man-made ? Is it con- 
ceivable that he only means to insist upon this 
undeniable, and generally admitted, commonplace? 
It seems to me quite plain that this is not all that he 
means. I think he certainly means to suggest that, 
from the fact that we "make" our true beliefs, 
.something else follows. And I think it is not hard 
to see one thing more which he does mean. I think 
he certainly means to suggest that we not only 
make our true beliefs, but also that we make them 
true. At least as much as this is certainly naturally 
suggested by his words. No one would persistently 
say that we make our truths, unless he meaot, at 
least, not merely that we make our true beliefs, but 
also that we make them true — unless he meant not 
merely that the existence of our true beliefs, but 
also that their truth, depended upon human con- 
ditions. This, it seems to me, is one consequence 
which Professor James means us to draw from the 
commonplace that the existence of our true beliefs 
depends upon human conditions. But does this 
ponsequence, in fact, follow from that commonplace ? 
From the fact that we make our true beliefs, does it 
follow that we make them true ? 

In one sense, undoubtedly, even this does follow* 
If we sky (as we may say) that no belief can be true^ 
Unless it exists, then it follows that, in a sense, the 
truth of a belief must always depend upon any 
conditions upon which its existence depends. I& 



WILLIAM J AMES' « PRAGMATISM * i 4 r 

therefore, the occurrence of a belief depends upon 
human conditions, so, too, must its truth. If the' 
belief had never existed, it would never have been 
trae ; and therefore its truth must, in a sense, depend 
upon human conditions in exactly the same degree 
in which its existence depends upon them. This is 1 
obvious. But is this all that is meant? Is this all 
that would be suggested to us by telling us that we' 
make our beliefs true? 

It is easy to see that it is not. I may have the 
belief that it will rain to-morrow. And I may have 
••made" myself have this belief. It may be the 
case that I should not have had it, but for peculi- 
arities in my past experiences, in my interests and 
my volitions. It may be the case that I should 
not have had it, but for a deliberate attempt to con- 
sider the question whether it will rain or not. This 
may easily happen. And certainly this particular 
belief of mine would not have been true, unless it 
existed. Its truth, therefore, depends, in a sense, 
upon any conditions upon which its existence 
depends. And this belief may be true. It will be 
true, if it does rain to-morrow. But, in spite of all 
these reasons, would anyone think of saying that,' 
in case it is true, I had made it true ? Would 
anyone say that I had had any hand at all in making 
it true? Plainly no one would. We should say 
that I had a hand in making it true, if and only if 
I had a hand in making the rain fall. In every 
case in which we believe in the existence of anything; 
past or future, we should say that we had helped to 
make the belief true, if and only if we had helped to* 
cause the existence of the fact which, in that belief, 
we believed did exist ot would exist. Surely this is 
plain. I may believe that the sun will rise to- 1 
morrow. And I may have had a hand in "making 19 
this belief; certainly it often depends for its existence 
upon what has been previously in my mind. And : 



142 WILLIAM JAMES' " PRAGMATISM 



ft 



if the sun does rise, my belief will have been true. 
I have, therefore, had a hand in making a true 
belief. But would anyone say that, therefore, I had 
a hand in making this belief true} Certainly no 
one would. No one would say that anything had 
contributed to make this belief true, except those 
conditions (whatever they may be) which contributed 
to making the sun actually rise. 

It is plain, then, that by " making a belief true," 
we mean something quite different from what 
Professor James means by "making" that belief. 
Conditions which have a hand in making a given 
true belief, may (it appears) have no hand at all in 
making it true ; and conditions which have a hand 
in making it true may have no hand at all in making 
it. Certainly this is how we use the words. We 
should never say that we had made a belief true, 
merely because we had made the belief. But now, 
which of these two things does Professor James 
mean ? Does he mean merely the accepted common- 
place that we make our true beliefs, in the sense 
that almost all of them depend for their existence 
on what has been previously in some human mind ? 
Or does he mean also that we make them true — that 
their truth also depends on what has been previously 
in some human mind ? 

I cannot help thinking that he has the latter, and 
not only the former in his mind. But, then, what 
does this involve ? If his instances of " truth- 
making" are to be anything to the purpose, it 
should mean that, whenever I have a hand in causing 
one of my own beliefs, I always have to that extent 
a hand in making it true. That, therefore, I have 
a hand in actually making the sun rise, the wind 
blow, and the rain fall, whenever I cause my beliefs 
in these things. Nay, more, it should mean that, 
whenever I " make " a true belief about the past, I 
must have had a hand in making this true. And if 



WILLIAM JAMES' « PRAGMATISM ft 143 

so, then certainly I must have had a hand in causing 
the French Revolution, in causing my father's birth, 
in making Professor James write this book. 
Certainly he implies that some man or other must 
have helped in causing almost every event, in which 
any man ever truly believed. That it was we who 
made the planets revolve round the sun, who made the 
Alps rise, and the floor of the Pacific sink — all these 
things, and others like them, seem to be involved. 
And it is these consequences which seem to me to 
justify a doubt whether, in fact " our truths are tQ 
an unascertainable extent man-made." That some 
of our truths are man-made — indeed, a great many — 
I fully admit We certainly do make some of our 
beliefs true. The Secretary probably had a belief 
that I should write this paper, and I have made his 
belief true by writing it. Men certainly have the 
power to alter the world to a certain extent ; and, so 
far as they do this, they certainly " make true " any 
beliefs, wnich are beliefs in the occurrence of these 
alterations. But I can see no reason for supposing 
that they "make true" nearly all those of their 
beliefs which are true. And certainly the only 
reason which Professor Tames seems to give for 
believing this — namely, that the existence of almost 
all their beliefs depends on them — seems to be no 
reason for it at all. For unquestionably a man 
does not " make true " nearly every belief whose ! 
existence depends on him ; and if so, the question: 
which of their beliefs and how many, men do 
14 make true" must be settled by quite other con- 
siderations. 



In conclusion, I wish to sum up what seems to 
me to be the most important points about this 
" pragmatist theory of truth," as Professor James 
represents it It seems to me that, in what he says 



144 WILLIAM JAMES' " PRAGMATISM 



ft 



about it, he has in his mind some things which are 
true and others which are false; and I wish to 
tabulate separately the principal ones which I take 
to be true, and the principal ones which I take to 
be false. The true ones seem to me to be these : — 

That most of our true beliefs are useful to us; 
and that most of the beliefs that are useful to us are 
true. 

That the world really does change in some 
respects ; that facts exist at one time, which didn't 
and won't exist at others ; and that hence the world 
may be better at some future time than it is now or 
has been in the past. 

That the very same words may be true at one 
time and false at another — that they may express & 
truth at one time and a falsehood at another. 

That the existence of most, if not all, of our 
beliefs, true as Well as false, does depend upon 
previous events in our mental history ; that we 
should never have had the particular beliefs we do 
have, had not our previous mental history been such 
as it was. 

That the truth, and not merely the existence, of 
fame of our beliefs, dogs, depend upon us. That we 
really do make some alterations in the world, and 
that hence we do help to " make true " all those of 
our beliefs which are beliefs in the existence of 
these alterations. 

• 4 

To all of these propositions I have no objection 
to offer. And they seem to me to be generally 
admitted common-places. A certain class of 
philosophers do, indeed, imply the denial of every 
one of them — namely, those philosophers who deny 
the reality of time. And I think that part of 
Professor James 1 object is to protest against the 
views of these philosophers. All of these pro- 



WILLIAM JAMES* " PRAGMATISM " 14$ 

positions do constitute a protest against such views ; 
and so far they might be all that Professor James 
meant to assert. But I do not think that anyone, 
fairly reading through what he says, could get the 
impression that these things, and nothing more, 
were what he had in his mind. What gives colour 
and interest to what he says, seems to be obviously 
something quite different And, if we try to find 
out what exactly the chief things are which give his 
discussion its colour and interest, it seems to me we 
may distinguish that what he has in his mind, 
wrapped up in more or less ambiguous language, 
are the following propositions, to all of which I have 
tried to urge what seem to me the most obvious 
objections : — 

That utility is a property which distinguishes true 
beliefs from those which are not true ; that, there- 
fore, all true beliefs are useful, and all beliefs, which 
are useful, are true — by " utility " being sometimes 
meant " utility on at least one occasion/ 9 sometimes 
••utility in the long run," sometimes "utility for 
some length of time." 

That all beliefs which are useful for some length 
of time are true. 

That utility is the only property which all true 
beliefs have in common : that, therefore, if it were 
useful to me to believe in Professor James' existence, 
this belief would be true, even if he didn't exist ; 
and that, if it were not useful to me to believe this, 
the belief would be false, even if he did. 

That the beliefs, which we express by words, and 
not merely the words themselves, may be true at one 
time and not true at another; and that this is a 
general rule, though perhaps there may be some 
exceptions. 

That whenever the existence of a belief depends 

K 



146 WILLIAM JAMES' " PRAGMATISM » 

to some extent on us, then also the truth of that 
belief depends to some extent on us ; in the sense 
in which this implies, that, when the existence of my 
belief that a shower will fall depends upon me, then, 
if this belief is true, I must have had a hand in 
making the shower fall : that, therefore, men must 
have had a hand in making to exist almost every 
fact which they ever believe to exist 



HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 



In both of his two books on the Human Under- 
standing, Hume had, I think, one main general 
object. He tells us that it was his object to 
discover "the extent and force of human under- 
standing/' to give us "an exact analysis of its 
powers and capacity." And we may, I think, 
express what he meant by this in the following way. 
He plainly held (as we all do) that some men 
sometimes entertain opinions which they cannot 
know to be true. And he wished to point 
out what characteristics are possessed by those of 
our opinions which we can know to be true, with 
a view of persuading us that any opinion which 
does not possess any of these characteristics is of a 
kind which we cannot know to be so. He thus 
tries to lay down certain rules to the effect that the 
only propositions which we can, any of us, know to 
be true are of certain definite kinds. It is in this 
sense, I think, that he tries to define the limits of 
human understanding. 

With this object he, first of all, divides all the 
propositions, which we can even so much as con- 
ceive, into two classes. They are all, he says, 
either propositions about " relations of ideas " or * 
else about "matters of fact/' By propositions 
about " relations of ideas " he means such pro- 
positions as that twice two are four, or that black 
differs from white ; and it is, I think, easy enough 
to see, though by no means easy to define, what 



148 HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 

kind of propositions it is that he means to include in 
this division. They are, he says, the only kind of 
propositions with regard to which we can have 
11 intuitive " or " demonstrative " certainty. But 
the vast majority of the propositions in which we 
believe and which interest us most, belong to the 
other division : they are propositions about " matters 
of fact" And these again he divides into two 
classes. So far as his words go, this latter division 
is between "matters of fact, beyond the present 
testimony of our senses, or the records of our 
memory," on the one hand, and matters of fact for 
which we have the evidence of our memory or 
senses, on the other. But it is, I think, quite plain 
that these words do not represent quite accurately 
the division which he really means to make. He 
plainly intends to reckon along with facts for which 
we have the evidence of our senses all facts for which 
we have the evidence of direct observation — such 
facts, for instance, as those which I observe when I 
observe that I am angry or afraid, and which 
cannot be strictly said to be apprehended by my 
senses. The division, then, which he really intends 
to make is (to put it quite strictly) into the 
two classes — (i) propositions which assert some 
matter of fact which I am (in the strictest sense) 
observing at the moment, or which I have so 
observed in the past and now remember; and (2) 
propositions which assert any matter of fact which 
I am not now observing and never have observed, 
or, if I have, have quite forgotten. 

We have, then, the three classes — (1) propositions 
which assert " relations of ideas " ; (2^ propositions 
which assert " matters of fact " for which we have 
the evidence of direct observation or personal 
memory ; (3) propositions which assert " matters of 
fact " for which we have not this evidence. And 
as regards propositions of the first two classes, 



HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 149 

Hume does not seem to doubt our capacity for 
knowledge. He does not doubt that we can know 
some (though, of course, not all) propositions about 
" relations of ideas " to be true ; he never doubts, 
for instance, that we can know that twice two are 
four. And he generally assumes also that each of 
us can know the truth of all propositions which 
merely assert some matter of fact which we our- 
selves are, in the strictest sense, directly observing, 
or which we have so observed and now remember. 
He does, indeed, in one place, suggest a doubt 
whether our memory is ever to be implicitly trusted, 
but he generally assumes that it always can. It is 
with regard to propositions of the third class that he 
is chiefly anxious to determine which of them (if 
any) we can know to be true and which not. In 
what cases can any man know any matter of fact 
which he himself has not directly observed ? It is 
Hume's views on this question which form, I think, 
the main interest of his philosophy. 

He proposes, first of all, by way of answer to it, 
a rule, which may, I think, be expressed as follows : 
No man, he says, can ever know any matter of fact, 
which he has not himself observed, unless he can 
know that it is connected by " the relation of cause 
and effect," with some fact which he has observed. 
And no man can ever know that any two facts are 
connected by this relation, except by the help of his 
own past experience. In other words, if I am to 
know any fact, A, which I have not myself observed, 
my past experience must give me some foundation 
for the belief that A is causally connected with some 
fact, B, which I have observed. And the only kind 
of past experience which can give me any found- 
ation for such a belief is, Hume seems to say, as 
follows : I must, he says, have found facts like A 
11 constantly conjoined " in the past with facts like 
B. This is what he says ; but we must not, I think, 



150 HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 

press his words too strictly. I may, for instance, 
know that A is probably a fact, even where the 
conjunction of facts like it with facts like B has not 
been quite constant Or instead of observing facts 
like A conjoined with facts like B, I may have ob- 
served a whole series of conjunctions — for instance, 
between A and C, C and D, D and E, and E and 
B ; and such a series, however long, will do quite as 
well to establish a causal connection between A and 
B, as if I had directly observed conjunctions be- 
tween A and B themselves. Such modifications as 
this, Hume would, I think, certainly allow. But, 
allowing for them, his principle is, I think, quite 
clear. I can, he holds, never know any fact what- 
ever, which I have not myself observed, unless I 
have observed similar facts in the past and have 
observed that they were "conjoined" (directly or 
indirectly) with facts similar to some fact which I 
do now observe or remember. In this sense, he 
holds, all our knowledge of facts, beyond the reach 
of our own observation, is founded on experience. 

This is Hume's primary principle. But what 
consequences does he think will follow from it, as 
to the kind of facts, beyond our own observation, 
which we can know ? We may, I think, distinguish 
three entirely different views as to its consequences, 
which he suggests in different parts of his work. 
I In the first place, where he is specially engaged 
in explaining this primary principle, he certainly 
seems to suppose that all propositions of the kind, 
which we assume most universally in everyday life, 
may be founded on experience in the sense required. 
He supposes that we have this foundation in ex- 
perience for such beliefs as that " a stone will fall, or 
fire burn"; that Julius Caesar was murdered; that 
the sun will rise to-morrow ; that all men are mortal 
He speaks as if experience did not merely render 
such beliefs probable, but actually proved them to 



HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 151 

be true. The " arguments from experience" in 
their favour are, he says, such as " leave no room 
for doubt or opposition." The only kinds of belief, 
which he definitely mentions as not founded on 
experience, are " popular superstitions " on the one 
hand, and certain religious and philosophical beliefs, 
on the other. He seems to suppose that a few (a 
very few) religious beliefs may, perhaps, be founded 
on experience. But as regards most of the specific 
doctrines of Christianity, for example, he seems to 
be clear that they are not so founded. The belief 
in miracles is not founded on experience ; nor is the 
philosophical belief that every event is caused by 
the direct volition of the Deity. In short, it would 
seem, that in this doctrine that our knowledge of 
unobserved facts is confined to such as are " founded 
on experience," he means to draw the line very 
much where it is drawn by the familiar doctrine 
which is called " Agnosticism." We can know such 
facts as are asserted in books on "history, ge- 
ography or astronomy," or on "politics, physics and 
chemistry," because such assertions may be " founded 
on experience " ; but we cannot know the greater 
part of the facts asserted in books " of divinity or 
school metaphysics," because such assertions have 
no foundation in experience. 

This, I think, was clearly one of Hume's views. 
He meant to fix the limits of our knowledge at a 
point which would exclude most religious propositions 
and a great many philosophical ones, as incapable of 
being known ; but which would include all the other 
kinds of propositions, which are most universally 
accepted by common-sense, as capable of being 
known. And he thought that, so far as matters of 
fact beyond the reach of our personal observation 
are concerned, this point coincided with that at 
which the possibility of " foundation on experience " 
ceases* 



152 HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 

But, if we turn to another part of his work, we 
find a very different view suggested. In a quite 
distinct section of both his books, he investigates 
the beliefs which we entertain concerning the 
existence of " external objects." And he distin- 
guishes two different kinds of belief which may be 
leld on this subject " Almost all mankind, and 
philosophers themselves, for the greatest part of 
their lives," believe, he says, that " the very things 
they feel and see " are external objects, in the sense 
that they continue to exist, even when we cease to 
feel or see them. Philosophers, on the other hand, 
have been led to reject this opinion and to suppose 
(when they reflect) that what we actually perceive 
by the senses never exists except when we perceive 
it, but that there are other external objects, which 
do exist independently of us, and which cause us to 
perceive what we do perceive, Hume investigates 
both of these opinions, at great length in the 
Treatise, and much more briefly in the Enquiry, 
and comes to the conclusion, in both books, that 
neither of them can be " founded on experience," 
in the sense he has defined. As regards the first of 
them, the vulgar opinion, he does seem to admit in 
the Treatise that it is, in a sense, founded on 
experience ; but not, he insists, in the sense defined. 
And he seems also to think that, apart from this 
fact, there are conclusive reasons for holding that 
the opinion cannot be true. And as regards the 
philosophical opinion, he says that any belief in 
external objects, which we never perceive but which 
cause our perceptions, cannot possibly be founded 
on experience, for the simple reason that if it were, 
we should need to have directly observed some of 
these objects and their "conjunction" with what 
we do perceive, which ex kypothesi, we cannot have 
done, since we never do directly observe any 
external object. 



HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 153 

Hume, therefore, concludes, in this part of his 
work, that we cannot know of the existence of any 
"external object " whatever. And though in all 
that he says upon this subject, he is plainly thinking 
only of material objects, the principles by which he 
tries to prove that we cannot know these must, I 
think, prove equally well that we cannot know any 
" external object " whatever — not even the existence 
of any other human mind His argument is: We 
cannot directly observe any object whatever, except 
such as exist only when we observe them ; we 
cannot, therefore, observe any " constant con- 
junctions " except between objects of this kind : and 
hence we can have no foundation in experience for 
any proposition which asserts the existence of any 
other kind of object, and cannot, therefore, know 
any such proposition to be true. And this argument 
must plainly apply to all the feelings, thoughts and 
perceptions of other men just as much as to material 
objects. I can never know that any perception of 
mine, or anything which I do observe, must have 
been caused by any other man, because I can never 
directly observe a " constant conjunction " between 
any other man's thoughts or feelings or intentions 
and anything which I directly observe : I cannot, 
therefore, know that any other man ever had any 
thoughts or feelings— or, in short, that any man 
beside myself ever existed. The view, therefore, 
which Hume suggests in this part of his work, 
flatly contradicts the view which he at first seemed 
to hold. He now says we cannot know that a stone 
will fall, that fire will burn, or the sun will rise 
to-morrow. All that I can possibly know, according 
to his present principles, is that / shall see a stone 
fall, shall feel the fire burn, shall see the sun rise 
to-morrow. I cannot even know that any other 
men will see these things ; for I cannot know that 
any other men exist. For the same reason, I cannot 



154 HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 

know that Julius Caesar was murdered, or that all 
men are mortal. For these are propositions 
asserting "external" facts — facts which don't exist 
only at the moment when I observe them ; and, 
according to his present doctrine, I cannot possibly 
know any such proposition to be true. No man, in 
short, can know any proposition about " matters of 
fact " to be true, except such as merely assert some- 
thing about his own states of mind, past, present or 
future — about these or about what he himself has 
directly observed, is observing, or will observe. 

Here, therefore, we have a very different view 
suggested, as to the limits of human knowledge. 
And even this is not all. There is yet a third view, 
inconsistent with both of these, which Hume 
suggests in some parts of his work. 

So far as we have yet seen, he has not in any 
way contradicted his original supposition that we 
can know some matters of fact, which we have never 
ourselves observed. In the second theory, which I 
have just stated, he does not call in question the 
view that I can know all such matters of fact as I 
know to be causally connected with facts which I 
have observed, nor the view that I can know some 
facts to be thus causally connected. All that he 
has done is to question whether I can know any 
external fact to be causally connected with anything 
which I observe ; he would still allow that I may 
be able to know that future states of my own, or 
past states, which I have forgotten, are causally 
connected with those which I now observe or 
remember ; and that I may know therefore, in some 
cases, what I shall experience in the future, or have 
experienced in the past but have now forgotten. 
But in some parts of his work he does seem to 
question whether any man can know even as much 
as this : he seems to question whether we can ever 
know any fact whatever to be causally connected 



HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 155 

with any other fact. For, after laying it down, as 
we saw above, that we cannot know any fact, A, to 
be causally connected with another, B, unless we 
have experienced in the past a constant conjunction 
between facts like A and facts like B, he goes on 
to ask what foundation we have for the conclusion 
that A and B are causally connected, even when we 
have in the past experienced a constant conjunction 
between them. He points out that from the fact that 
A has been constantly conjoined with B in the past, 
it does not follow that it ever will be so again. It 
does not follow, therefore, that the two really are 
causally connected in the sense that, when the one 
occurs, the other always will occur also. And he 
concludes, for this and other reasons, that no 
argument can assure us that, because they have 
been constantly conjoined in the past, therefore 
they really are causally connected. What, then, he 
asks, is the foundation for such an inference ? 
Custom, he concludes, is the only foundation. It is 
nothing but custom which induces us to believe that, 
because two facts have been constantly conjoined 
on many occasions, therefore they will be so on all 
occasions. We have, therefore, no better foundation 
than custom for any conclusion whatever as to facts 
which we have not observed. And can we be said 
really to know any fact, for which we have no better 
foundation than this? Hume himself, it must be 
observed, never says that we can't But he has 
been constantly interpreted as if the conclusion that 
we can't really know any one fact to be causally 
connected with any other, did follow from this 
doctrine of his. And there is, I think, certainly 
much excuse for this interpretation in the tone in 
which he speaks. He does seem to suggest that a 
belief which is merely founded on custom, can 
scarcely be one which we know to be true. And, 
indeed, he owns himself that, when he considers 



156 HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 

that this is our only foundation for any such belief, 
he is sometimes tempted to doubt whether we do 
know any fact whatever, except those which we 
directly observe. He does, therefore, at least 
suggest the view that every mans knowledge is 
entirely confined to those facts, which he is directly 
observing at the moment, or which he has observed 
in the past, and now remembers. 

We see, then, that Hume suggests, at least, 
three entirely different views as to the consequences 
of his original doctrine. His original doctrine was 
that, as regards matters of fact beyond the| reach of 
our own actual observation, the knowledge of each 
of us is strictly limited to thosefor which we have 
a basis in our own experience. And his first view 
as to the consequences of this doctrine was that it 
does show us to be incapable of knowing a good 
many religious and philosophical propositions, which 
many men have claimed that they knew ; but that it 
by no means denies our capacity of knowing the vast 
majority of facts beyond our own observation, which 
we all commonly suppose that we know. His 
second view, on the other hand, is that it cuts off at 
once all possibility of our knowing the vast majority 
of these facts ; since he implies that we cannot have 
any basis in experience for asserting any external 
fact whatever — any fact, that is, except facts re- 
lating to our own actual past and future observations. 
And his third view is more sceptical still, since it 
suggests that we cannot really know any fact what- 
ever, beyond the reach of our present observation 
or memory, even where we have a basis in ex- 
perience for such a fact : it suggests that experience 
cannot ever let us know that any two things are 
causally connected, and therefore that it cannot 
give us knowledge of any fact based on this re- 
lation. 

What are we to think of these three views, and 



HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 157 

of the original doctrine from which Hume seems to 
infer them ? 

As regards the last two views, it may perhaps be 
thought that they are too absurd to deserve any 
serious consideration. It is, in fact, absurd to 
suggest that I do not know any external facts what- 
ever ; that I do not know, for instance, even that 
there are any men beside myself. And Hume 
himself, it might seem, does not seriously expect or 
wish us to accept these views. He points out, with 
regard to all such excessively sceptical opinions that 
we cannot continue to believe them for long together 
— that, at least, we cannot, for long together, avoid 
believing things flatly inconsistent with them. The 
philosopher may believe, when he is philosophising, 
that no man knows of the existence of any other 
man or of any material object ; but at other times he 
will inevitably believe, as we all do, that he does 
know of the existence of this man and of that, and 
even of this and that material object. There can, 
therefore, be no question of making all our beliefs 
consistent with such views as this of never believing 
anything that is inconsistent with them. And it may, 
therefore, seem useless to discuss them. But in fact, 
it by no means follows that, because we are not able 
to adhere consistently to a given view, therefore that 
view is false ; nor does it follow that we may not 
sincerely believe it, whenever we are philosophising, 
even though the moment we cease to philosophise, 
or even before, we may be forced to contradict it 
And philosophers do, in fact, sincerely believe such 
things as this — things which flatly contradict the 
vast majority of the things which they believe at 
other times. Even Hume, I think, does sincerely 
wish to persuade us that we cannot know of the 
existence of external material objects — that this is 
a philosophic truth, which we ought, if we can, so 
long as we are philosophising, to believe. Many 



1 58 HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 

people, I think, are certainly tempted, in their 
philosophic moments, to believe such things ; and, 
since this is so, it is, I think, worth while to consider 
seriously what arguments can be brought against 
such views. It is worth while to consider whether 
they are views which we ought to hold as philo- 
sophical opinions, even if it be quite certain that we 
shall never be able to make the views which we 
entertain at other times consistent with them. And 
it is the more worth while, because the question 
how we can prove or disprove such extreme views 
as these, has a bearing on the question how we 
can, in any case whatever, prove or disprove that 
we do really know, what we suppose ourselves to 
know. 

What arguments, then, are there for or against 
the extreme view that no man can know any ex- 
ternal fact whatever; and the still more extreme 
view that no man can know any matter of fact 
whatever, except those which he is directly observing 
at the moment, or has observed in the past and now 
remembers ? 

It may be pointed out, in the first place, that, if 
these views are true, then at least no man can 
possibly know them to be so. What these views 
assert is that I cannot know any external fact what- 
ever. It follows, therefore, that I cannot know that 
there are any other men, beside myself, and that 
they are like me in this respect. Any philosopher 
who asserts positively that other men, equally with 
himself, are incapable of knowing any external facts, 
is, in that very assertion, contradicting himself, since 
he implies that he does know a great many facts 
about the knowledge of other men. No one, there- 
fore, can be entitled to assert positively that human 
knowledge is limited in this way, since, in asserting 
it positively, he is implying -that his own knowledge 
is not so limited. It cannot be proper, even in our 



HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 159 

philosophic moments, to take up such an attitude as 
this. 

No one, therefore, can know positively that men 
in general, are incapable of knowing external facts. 
But still, although we cannot know it, it remains 
possible that the view should be a true one. Nay, 
more, it remains possible that a man should know 
that he himself is incapable of knowing any external 
facts, and that, if there are any other men whose 
faculties are only similar to his own, they also must 
be incapable of knowing any. The argument just 
used obviously does not apply against such a position 
as this. It only applies against the position that 
men in general positively are incapable of knowing 
external facts : it does not apply against the position 
that the philosopher himself is incapable of knowing 
any, or against the position that there are possibly 
other men in the same case, and that, if their 
faculties are similar to the philosopher's, they 
certainly would be in it. I do not contradict myself 
by maintaining positively that / know no external 
facts, though I do contradict myself if I maintain 
that I am only one among other men, and that no 
man knows any external facts. So far, then, as 
Hume merely maintains that he is incapable of 
knowing any external facts, and that there may be 
other men like him in this respect, the argument just 
used is not valid against his position. Can any 
conclusive arguments be found against it ? 

It seems to me that such a position must, in a 
certain sense, be quite incapable of disproof. So 
much must be granted to any sceptic who feels in- 
clined to hold it. Any valid argument which can 
be brought against it must be of the nature of a 
petitio principii : it must beg the question at issue. 
How is the sceptic to prove to himself that he does 
know any external facts? He can only do it by 
bringing forward some instance of an external fact, 



160 HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 

which he does know ; and, in assuming that he does 
know this one, he is, of course, begging the question. 
It is therefore quite impossible for any one to prove, 
in one strict sense of the term, that he does know 
any external facts. I can only prove that I do, by 
assuming that in some particular instance, I actually 
do know one. That is to say, the so-called proof 
must assume the very thing which it pretends to 
prove. The only proof that we do know external 
facts lies in the simple fact that we do know them. 
And the sceptic can, with perfect internal con* 
sistency, deny that he does know any. But it can, 
I think, be shown that he has no reason for denying 
it And in particular it may, I think, be easily seen 
that the arguments which Hume uses in favour of 
this position have no conclusive force. 

To begin with, his arguments, in both cases, 
depend upon the two original assumptions, (i) that 
we cannot know any fact, which we have not ob- 
served, unless we know it to be causally connected 
with some fact which we have observed, and (2) 
that we have no reason for assuming any causal 
connection, except where we have experienced some 
instances of conjunction between the two facts 
connected. And both of these assumptions may, of 
course, be denied. It is just as easy to deny them, 
as to deny that I do know any external facts. And, 
if these two assumptions did really lead to the 
conclusion that I cannot know any, it would, I 
think, be proper to deny them : we might fairly 
regard the fact that they led to this absurd con- 
clusion as disproving them. But, in fact, I think it 
may be easily seen that they do not lead to it. 

Let us consider, first of all, Hume's most sceptical 
argument (the argument which he merely suggests). 
This argument suggests that, since our only reason 
for supposing two facts to be causally connected is 
that we have found them constantly conjoined in 



HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 161 

the past, and since it does not follow from the fact 
that they have been conjoined ever so many times, 
that they always will be so, therefore we cannot 
know that they always will be so, and hence cannot 
know that they are causally connected But ob- 
viously the conclusion does not follow. We must, 
I think, grant the premiss that, from the fact that 
two things have been conjoined, no matter how 
often, it does not strictly follow that they always are 
conjoined But it by no means follows from this 
that we may not know that, as a matter of fact, 
when two things are conjoined sufficiently often, 
they are also always conjoined. We may quite 
well know many things which do not logically follow 
from anything else which we know. And so, in 
this case, we may know that two things are causally 
connected, although this does not logically follow 
from our past experience, nor yet from anything 
else that we know. And, as for the contention that 
our belief in causal connections is merely based on 
custom, we may, indeed, admit that custom would 
not be a sufficient reason for concluding the belief 
to be true. But the mere fact (if it be a fact) that 
the belief is only caused by custom, is also no 
sufficient reason for concluding that we can not 
know it to be true. Custom may produce beliefs, 
which we do know to be true, even though it be 
admitted that it does not necessarily produce them. 

And as for Hume's argument to prove that we 
can never know any external object to be causally 
connected with anything which we actually observe, 
it is, I think, obviously fallacious. In order to 
prove this, he has, as he recognises, to disprove 
both of two theories. He has, first of all, to 
disprove what he calls the vulgar theory — the 
theory that we can know the very things which we 
see or feel to be external objects ; that is to say, 
can know ft that A these very things exist at times when 

L 



1 62 HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 

we do not observe them. And even here, I think, 
his arguments are obviously inconclusive. But we 
need not stay to consider them, because, in order 
to prove that we cannot know any external objects, 
he has also to disprove what he calls the philosophic 
theory — the theory that we can know things which 
we do observe, to be caused by external objects 
which we never observe. If, therefore, his attempt 
to disprove this theory fails, his proof that we can- 
not know any external objects also fails ; and I think 
it is easy to see that his disproof does fail. It 
amounts merely to this : That we cannot, ex 
hypothesis ever observe these supposed external 
objects, and therefore cannot observe them to be 
constantly conjoined with any objects which we do 
observe. But what follows from this? His own 
theory about the knowledge of causal connection is 
not that in order to know A to be the cause of B, 
we must have observed A itself to be conjoined 
with B ; but only that we must have observed 
objects like A to be constantly conjoined with 
objects like B. And what is to prevent an external 
object from being like some object which we have 
formerly observed ? Suppose I have frequently 
observed a fact like A to be conjoined with a fact 
like B : J and suppose I now observe B, on an 
occasion when I do not observe anything like A. 
There is no reason, on Hume's principles, why I 
should not conclude that A does exist on this 
occasion, even though I do not observe it ; and that 
it is, therefore, an external object It will, of 
course, differ from any object which I have ever 
observed, in respect of the simple fact that it is not 
observed by me, whereas they were. There is, 
therefore, this one respect in which it must be unlike 
anything which I have ever observed. But Hume 
has never said anything to show that unlikeness in 
this single respect is sufficient to invalidate the 



HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 163 

inference. It may quite well be like objects which 
I have observed in all other respects ; and this 
degree of likeness may, according to his principles, 
be quite sufficient to justify us in concluding its 
existence. In short, when Hume argues that we 
cannot possibly learn by experience of the existence 
of any external objects, he is, I think, plainly 
committing the fallacy of supposing that, because 
we cannot, ex hypothesis have ever observed any 
object which actually is "external," therefore we 
can never have observed any object like an external 
one. But plainly we may have observed objects 
like them in all respects except the single one that 
these have been observed whereas the others have 
not. And even a less degree of likeness than this 
would, according to his principles, be quite sufficient 
to justify an inference of causal connection. 

Hume does not, therefore, bring forward any 
arguments at all sufficient to prove either that he 
cannot know any one object to be causally connected 
with any other or that he cannot know any external 
fact And, indeed, I think it is plain that no con- 
clusive argument could possibly be advanced in 
favour of these positions. It would always be at 
least as easy to deny the argument as to deny that 
we do know external facts. We may, therefore, 
each one of us, safely conclude that we do know 
external facts ; and, if we do, then there is no reason 
why we should not also know that other men do 
the same. There is no reason why we should not, 
in this respect, make our philosophical opinions 
agree with what we necessarily believe at other 
times. There is no reason why I should not con- 
fidently assert that I do really know some external 
facts, although I cannot prove the assertion except 
by simply assuming that I do. I am, in fact, as 
certain of this as of anything ; and as reasonably 
certain of it. But just as I am certain that I do 



1 64 HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 

know some external facts, so I am also certain that 
there are others which I do not know. And the 
question remains : Does the line between the two 
rail, where Hume says it falls ? Is it true that the 
only external facts I know are facts for which I have 
a basis in my own experience ? And that I cannot 
know any facts whatever, beyond the reach of my 
own observation and memory, except those for 
which I have such a basis ? 

This, it seems to me, is the most serious question 
which Hume raises. And it should be observed 
that his own attitude towards it is very different 
from his attitude towards the sceptical views which 
we have just been considering. These sceptical 
views he did not expect or wish us to accept, except 
in philosophic moments. He declares that we 
cannot, in ordinary life, avoid believing things which 
are inconsistent with them ; and, in so declaring, he, 
of course, implies incidentally that they are false : 
since he implies that he himself has a great deal of 
knowledge as to what we can and cannot believe in 
ordinary life. But, as regards the view that our 
knowledge of matters of fact beyond our own 
observation is entirely confined to such as are 
founded on experience, he never suggests that it is 
impossible that all our beliefs should be consistent 
with this view, and he does seem to think it 
eminently desirable that they should be. He 
declares that any assertion with regard to such 
matters, which is not founded on experience, can be 
nothing but "sophistry and illusion"; and that all 
books which are composed of such assertions should 
be "committed to the flames." He seems, there- 
fore, to think that here we really have a test by 
which we may determine what we should or should 
not believe, on all occasions : any view on such 
matters, for which we have no foundation in 
experience, is a view which we cannot know to be 



HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 165 

even probably true, and which we should never 
accept, if we can help it. Is there any justification 
for this strong view ? 

It is, of course, abstractly possible that we do 
really know, without the help of experience, some 
matters of fact, which we never have observed. 
Just as we know matters of fact, which we have 
observed, without the need jof any further evidence, 
and just as we know, for instance, that 2 + 2-4, 
without the need of any proof, it is possible that we 
may know, directly and immediately, without the 
need of any basis in experience, some facts which 
we never have observed. This is certainly possible, 
in the same sense in which it is possible that I do not 
really know any external facts : no conclusive disproof 
can be brought against either position. We must 
make assumptions as to what facts we do know and 
do not know, before we can proceed to discuss 
whether or not all of the former are based on 
experience ; and none of these assumptions can, in 
the last resort, be conclusively proved. We may 
offer one of them in proof of another ; but it will 
always be possible to dispute the one which we offer 
in proof. But there are, in fact, certain kinds of 
things which we universally assume that we do know 
or do not know, Just as we assume that we do know 
some external facts ; and if among all the things 
which we know as certainly as this, there should 
turn out to be none for which we have no basis in 
experience, Hume's view would I think, be as fully 
proved as it is capable of being. The question is : 
Can it be proved in this sense ? Among all the 
facts beyond our own observation, which we know 
most certainly, are there any which are certainly not 
based upon experience ? For my part, I confess, 
I cannot feel certain what is the right answer to this 
question : I cannot tell whether Hume was right or 
wrong. But if he was wrong — if there are any 



166 HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 

matters of fact, beyond our own observation, which 
we know for certain, and which yet we know directly 
and immediately, without any basis in experience, 
we are, I think, faced with an eminently interesting 
problem. For it is, I think, as certain as anythinj 
can be that there are some kinds of facts with regan 
to which Hume was right — that there are some 
kinds of facts which we cannot know without the 
evidence of experience. I could not know, for 
instance, without some such evidence, such a fact as 
that Julius Caesar was murdered. For such a fact 
I must, in the first instance, have the evidence of 
other persons ; and if I am to know that their 
evidence is trustworthy, I must have some ground 
in experience for supposing it to be so. There are, 
therefore, some kinds of facts which we cannot 
know without the evidence of experience and 
observation. And if it is to be maintained that 
there are others, which we can know without any 
such evidence, it ought to be pointed out exactly 
what kind of facts these are, and in what respects 
they differ from those which we cannot know 
without the help of experience. Hume gives us a 
very clear division of the kinds of propositions which 
we can know to be true. There are, first of all, 
some propositions which assert "relations of 
ideas " ; there are, secondly, propositions which 
assert "matters of fact" which we ourselves are 
actually observing, or have observed and now 
remember; and there are, thirdly, propositions 
which assert " matters of fact " which we have 
never actually observed, but for believing in which 
we have some foundation in our past observations. 
And it is, I think, certain that some propositions, 
which we know as certainly as we know anything, 
do belong to each of these three classes. I know, 
for instance, that twice two are four ; I know by 
direct observation that I am now seeing these words, 



HUME'S PHILOSOPHY 167 

that I am writing, and by memory that this after- 
noon I saw St Paul's ; and I know also that Julius 
Caesar was murdered, and I have some foundation 
in experience for this belief, though I did not myself 
witness the murder. Do any of those propositions, 
which we know as certainly as we know these and 
their like, not belong to either of these three classes ? 
Must we add a fourth class consisting of propositions 
which resemble the two last, in respect of the fact 
that they do assert "matters of fact," but which 
differ from them, in that we know them neither by 
direct observation nor by memory, nor yet as a 
result of previous observations? There may, 
perhaps, be such a fourth class ; but, if there is, it 
is, I think, eminently desirable that it should be 
pointed out exactly what propositions they are which 
we do know in this way ; and this, so far as I know, 
has never yet been done, at all clearly, by any 
philosopher. 



THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 

The term " sense-data " is ambiguous ; and there- 
fore I think I had better begin by trying to explain 
what the class of entities is whose status I propose 
to discuss. 

There are several different classes of mental 
events, all of which, owing to their intrinsic 
resemblance to one another in certain respects, may, 
in a wide sense, be called "sensory experiences," 
although only some among them would usually be 
called "sensations." There are (i) those events, 
happening in our minds while we are awake, which 
consist in the experiencing of one of those entities, 
which are usually called " images," in the narrowest 
sense of the term. Everybody distinguishes these 
events from sensations proper ; and yet everybody 
admits that "images" intrinsically resemble the 
entities which are experienced in sensations proper 
in some very important respect There are (2) the 
sensory experiences we have in dreams, some of 
which would certainly be said to be experiences of 
images, while others might be said to be sensations. 
There are (3) hallucinations, and certain classes 
of illusory sensory experiences. There are (4) 
those experiences, which used to be called tne 
having of "after-images," but which psychologists 
now say ought rather to be called " after-sensations." 
And there are, finally, (5) that class of sensory 
experiences, which are immensely commoner than 
any of the above, and which may be called sensations 
proper \ if we agree to use this term in such a way 
as to exclude experiences of my first four sorts. 



THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 169 

Every event, of any one of these five classes, 
consists in the fact that an entity, of some 
kind or other, is experienced. The entity which is 
experienced may be of many different kinds; it 
may, for instance, be a patch of colour, or a sound, 
or a smell, or a taste, etc ; or it may be an image 
of a patch of colour, an image of a sound, an image 
of a smell, an image of a taste, etc. But, what* 
ever be its nature, the entity which is experienced 
must in all cases be distinguished from the fact or 
event which consists in its being experienced ; since 
by saying that it is experienced we mean that it has 
a relation of a certain kind to something else. We 
can, therefore, speak not only of experiences of these 
five kinds, but also of the entities which are ex- 
perienced in experiences of these kinds; and the 
entity which is experienced in such an experience 
is never identical with the experience which con- 
sists in its being experienced. But we can speak 
not only of the entities which are experienced in 
experiences of this kind, but also of the sort of 
entities which are experienced in experiences of this 
kind ; and these two classes may again be different 
For a patch of colour, even if it were not actually 
experienced, would be an entity of the same sort as 
some which are experienced in experiences of this' 
kind: and there is no contradiction in supposing 
that there are patches of colour, which yet are not 
experienced ; since by calling a thing a patch of 
colour we merely make a statement about its in- 
trinsic quality, and in no way assert that it has to 
anything else any of the relations which may be 
meant by saying that it is experienced. In speaking, 
therefore, of the sort of entities which are ex- 
perienced in experiences of the five kinds I have 
mentioned, we do not necessarily confine ourselves 
to those which actually are experienced in some 
such experience : we leave it an open question 



170 THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 

whether the two classes are identical or not And 
the class of entities, whose status I wish to discuss, 
consists precisely of all those, whether experienced 
or not, which are of the same sort as those which are 
experienced in experiences of these five kinds. 

I intend to call this class of entities the class of 
sensibles ; so that the question I am to discuss can 
be expressed in the form : What is the status of 
sensibles ? And it must be remembered that images 
and after-images are just as much "sensibles," in 
my sense of the term, as the entities which are 
experienced in sensations proper ; and so, too, are 
any patches of colour, or sounds, or smells, etc, (if 
such there be), which are not experienced at all. 

In speaking of sensibles as the sort of entities 
which are experienced in sensory experiences I 
seem to imply that all the entities which are ex- 
perienced in sensory experiences have some 
common characteristic other than that which 
consists in their being so experienced. And I 
cannot help thinking that this is the case, in spite 
of the fact that it is difficult to see what intrinsic 
character can be shared in common by entities so 
different from one another as are patches of 
colour, sounds, smells, tastes, etc. For, so far as I 
can see, some non-sensory experiences may be ex- 
actly similar to sensory ones in all intrinsic respects, 
except that what is experienced in them is different 
in kind from what is experienced in any sensory ex- 
perience : the relation meant by saying that in them 
something is experienced may be exactly the same in 
kind, and so may the experient. And, if this be so, it 
seems to compel us to admit that the distinction be- 
tween sensory and non-sensory experiences is derived 
from that between sensibles, and non-sensibles and 
not vice versd. I am inclined, therefore, to think that 
all sensibles, in spite of the great differences between 
them, have some common intrinsic property, which we 



THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 171 

recognise, but which is unanalysable ; and that, when 
we call an experience sensory, what we mean is not 
only that in it something is experienced in a 
particular way, but also that this something has 
this unanalysable property. If this be so, the 
ultimate definition of " sensibles " would be merely 
all entities which have this unanalysable 
property. 

It seems to me that the term "sense-data" is 
often used, and may be correctly used, simply as a 
synonym for " sensibles " ; and everybody, I think, 
would expect me, in discussing the status of sense- 
data, to discuss, among other things, the question 
whether there are any sensibles which are not 
" given." It is true that the etymology of the term 
" sense-data " suggests that nothing should be called 
a sense-datum, but what is given; so that to talk 
of a non-given sense-datum would be a contradiction 
in terms. But, of course, etymology is no safe 
guide either as to the actual or the correct use of 
terms; and it seems to me that the term "sense- 
data " is often, and quite properly, used merely for 
the sort of entities that are given in sense, and not 
in any way limited to those which are actually 
given. But though I think I might thus have 
used "sense-data" quite correctly instead of 
" sensibles," I think the latter term is perhaps more 
convenient ; because though nobody ought to be 
misled by etymologies, so many people in fact are 
so. Moreover the term " sense-data " is sometimes 
limited in yet another way, viz, to the sort of 
sensibles which are experienced in sensations proper ; 
so that in this sense " images " would not be " sense- 
data." For both these reasons, I think it is per- 
haps better to drop the term " sense-data n 
altogether, and to speak only of " sensibles." 

My discussion of the status of sensibles will be 
divided into two parts. I shall first consider how, 



1 7a THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 

in certain respects, they are related to our minds ; 
and then I shall consider how, in certain respects, 
they are related to physical objects. 

a) 

(i) We can, I think, distinguish pretty clearly 
at least one kind of relation which sensibles, of all 
the kinds I have mentioned, do undoubtedly some- 
times have to our minds. 

I do now see certain blackish marks on a whitish 
ground, and I hear certain sounds which I attribute 
to the ticking of my clock. In both cases I have 
to certain sensibles — certain blackish marks, in the 
one case, and certain sounds, in the other — a kind of 
relation with which we are all perfectly familiar, and 
which may be expressed, in the one case, by saying 
that I actually see the marks, and in the other, by say- 
ing that I actually hear the sounds. It seems to me 
quite evident that the relation to the marks which I 
express by saying that I see them, is not different 
in kind from the relation to the sounds which I 
express by saying that I hear them. "Seeing" 
and "hearing/ 1 when thus used as names for a 
relation which we may have to sensibles, are not 
names for different relations, but merely express 
the fact that, in the one case, the kind of sensible 
to which I have a certain kind of relation is a patch 
of colour, while, in the other case, the kind of sensible 
to which I have the same kind of relation is a sound. 
And similarly when I say that I feel warm or smell 
a smell these different verbs do not express the 
fact that I have a different kind of relation to the 
sensibles concerned, but only that I have the same 
kind of relation to a different kind of sensible. Even 
when I call up a visual image of a sensible I saw 
yesterday, or an auditory image of a sound I heard 
yesterday, I have to those images exactly the same 
kind of relation which I have to the patches of 



THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 173 

colour I now see and which I had yesterday to 
those I saw then. 

But this kind of relation, which I sometimes have 
to sensibles of all sorts of different kinds, images 
as well as others, is evidently quite different in kind 
from another relation which I may also have to 
sensibles. After looking at this black mark, I may 
turn away my head or close my eyes, and then I no 
longer actually see the mark I saw just now. I may, 
indeed, have (I myself actually do have at this 
moment) a visual image of the mark before my 
mind ; and to this image I do now have exactly the 
same kind of relation which I had just now to the 
mark itself. But the image is not identical with 
the mark of which it is an image ; and to the mark 
itself it is quite certain that I have not now got the 
same kind of relation as I had just now, when I was 
actually seeing it. And yet I certainly may now 
have to that mark itself a kind of relation, which 
may be expressed by saying that I am thinking of 
it or remembering It I can now make judgments 
about it itself— the very sensible which I did see 
just now and am no longer seeing : as, for instance, 
that I did then see it and that it was different from 
the image of it which I am now seeing. It is, 
therefore, quite certain that there is a most im- 
portant difference between the relation I have to a 
sensible when I am actually seeing or hearing it, 
and any relation (for there may be several) which I 
may have to the same sensible when I am only 
thinking of or remembering it. And I want to 
express this difference by using a particular term 
for the former relation. I shall express this re- 
lation, which I certainly do havefto a sensible when 
I actually see or hear it, and most certainly do not 
have to it, when I only think of or remember it, by 
saying that there is in my mind a direct appre- 
hension of it I have expressly chosen this term 



174 THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 

because, so far as I know, it has not been used 
hitherto as a technical term ; whereas all the terms 
which have been so used, such as "presented," 
"given/ 1 "perceived," seem to me to have been 
spoilt by ambiguity. People sometimes, no doubt, 
use these terms as names for the kind of relation I 
am concerned with. But you can never be sure, 
when an entity is said to be " given " or " presented " 
or "perceived," that what is meant is simply and 
solely that it has to someone that relation which 
sensibles do undoubtedly have to me when I 
actually see or hear them, and which they do not 
have to me when I only think of or remember 
them. 

I have used the rather awkward expression 
"There is in my mind a direct apprehension of 
this black mark, 19 because I want to insist that 
though, when I see the mark, the mark certainly 
has to something the fundamental relation which I 
wish to express by saying that it is directly appre- 
hended, and though the event which consists in its 
being directly apprehended by that something is 
certainly a mental act of mine or which occurs in 
my mind, yet the something which directly 
apprehends it may quite possibly not be anything 
which deserves to be called " I " or " me." It is 
quite possible, I think, that there is no entity what- 
ever which deserves to be called " I " or " me " or 
11 my mind"; and hence that nothing whatever is ever 
directly apprehended by me. Whether this is so or 
not, depends on the nature of that relation which 
certainly does hold between all those mental acts 
which are mine, and does not hold between any of 
mine and any of yours; and which holds again 
between all those mental acts which are yours, but 
does not hold between any of yours and any of mine. 
And I do not feel at all sure what the correct analysis 
of this relation is. It may be the case that the 



THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 175 

relation which unites all those acts of direct appre- 
hension which are mine, and which is what we 
mean to say that they have to one another when 
we say they are all mine, really does consist in 
the fact that one and the. same entity is what 
directly apprehends in each of them : in which case 
this entity could properly be called "me," and it 
would be true to say that, when I see this black 
mark, / directly apprehend it But it is also quite 
possible (and this seems to me to be the view which 
is commonest amongst psychologists) that the entity 
which directly apprehends, in those acts of direct 
apprehension which are mine, is numerically 
different in every different act; and that what I 
mean by calling all these different acts mine is 
either merely that they have some kind of relation 
to one another or that they all have a common 
relation to some other entity, external to them, 
which may or may not be something which 
deserves to be called "me." On any such view, 
what I assert to be true of this black mark, when I 
say that it is seen by me, would not be simply that 
it is directly apprehended by me, but something 
more complex in which, besides direct apprehension, 
some other quite different relation was also involved. 
I should be asserting both (1) that the black mark 
is being directly apprehended by something, and (2) 
that this act of direct apprehension has to something 
else, external to it, a quite different relation, which 
is what makes it an act of mine. I do not know 
how to decide between these views, and that is why 
I wished to explain that the fundamental relation 
which I wish to call direct apprehension, is one 
which quite possibly never holds between me and 
any sensible. But, once this has been explained, I 
think no harm can result from using the expression 
'•I directly apprehend A" as a synonym for "A 
direct apprehension of A occurs in my mind." And 



176 THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 

in future I shall so speak, because it is much more 
convenient 

The only other point, which seems to me to need 
explanation, in order to make it quite clear what 
the relation I call "direct apprehension" is, con- 
cerns its relation to attention ; and as to this I must 
confess I don't feel clear. In every case where it is 
quite clear to me that I am -directly apprehending a 
given entity, it seems also clear to me that I am, 
more or less, attending to it ; and it seems to me 
possible that what I mean by " direct apprehension " 
may be simply identical with what is meant by 
" attention," in one of the senses in which that word 
can be used. That it can, at most, only be identical 
with one of the relations meant by attention seems 
to me clear, because I certainly can be said to 
attend, in some sense or other, to entities, which I 
am not directly apprehending : I may, for instance, 
think, with attention, of a sensible, which I saw 
yesterday, and am certainly not seeing now. It Is, 
therefore, clear that to say I am attending to a 
thing and yet am not directly apprehending it, is 
not a contradiction in terms : and this fact alone is 
sufficient to justify tha use of the special term 
"direct apprehension." But whether to say that I 
am directly apprehending a given thing and yet am 
not attending to it, in any degree at all, is or is not 
a contradiction in terms, I admit I don't feel clear. 

However that may be, one relation, in which 
sensibles of all sorts do sometimes stand to our 
minds, is the relation constituted by the fact that 
we directly apprehend them : or, to speak more 
accurately, by the fact that events which consist in 
their being directly apprehended are in our 
minds, in the sense in which to say that an event is 
in our minds means merely that it is a mental act of 
ours — that it has to our other mental acts that 
relation (whatever it may be) which we mean by 



THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 177 

saying that they are all mental acts of the same 
individual. And it is clear that to say of a sensible 
that it is directly apprehended by me, is to say of it 
something quite different from what I say of a 
mental act of mine, when I say that this mental act is 
in my mind: for nothing is more certain than that 
an act of direct apprehension or belief may be in my 
mind, without being itself directly apprehended by 
me. If, therefore, by saying that a sensible is in 
our minds or is ours, we mean merely that it is 
directly apprehended by us, we must recognise that 
we are here using the phrases "in our minds" or 
"ours" in quite a different sense from that in which 
we use them when we talk of our mental acts being 
"in our minds" or " ours," And why I say this is 
because I think that these two relations are very apt 
to be confused. When, for instance, we say of a given 
entity that it is " experienced," or when the Germans 
say that it is "erlebt," it is sometimes meant, I 
think, merely that it is directly apprehended, but 
sometimes mat it is in my mind, in the sense in 
which* when I entertain a belief, this act of belief is 
in my mind. 

But (2) it seems to me to be commonly held that 
sensibles are often in our minds in some sense quite 
other than that of being directly apprehended by us 
or that of being thought of by us. This seems to 
me to be often what is meant when people say that 
they are " immediately experienced or are " sub- 
jective modifications " ; though, of course, both 
expressions are so ambiguous, that when people 
say that a given entity is immediately experienced 
or is a subjective modification, they may mean 
merely that it is directly apprehended. And since 
I think this view is held, I want to explain that I 
see no reason whatever for thinking that sensibles 
ever are experienced by us in any other sense than 
that of being directly apprehended by us. 

M 



178 THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 

Two kinds of argument, I think, are sometimes 
used to show that they are. 

(a) It is a familiar fact that, when, for instance, 
we are in a room with a ticking clock, we may seem 
suddenly to become aware of the ticks, whereas, so 
far as we can tell, we had previously not heard 
them at all. And it may be urged that in these 
cases, since the same kind of stimulus was acting on 
our ears all the time, we must have experienced the 
same kind of sensible sounds, although we did not 
directly apprehend them. 

But I think most psychologists are now agreed 
that this argument is quite worthless. There seem 
to me to be two possible alternatives to the con- 
clusion drawn. It may, I think, possibly be the 
case that we did directly apprehend the ticks all the 
time, but that we cannot afterwards remember that 
we did, because the degree of attention (if any) 
with which we heard them was so small, that in 
ordinary life we should say that we did not attend 
to them at all. But, what, I think, is much more 
likely is that, though the same stimulus was acting 
on our ears, it failed to produce any mental effect 
whatever, because our attention was otherwise 
engaged. 

\b) It is said that sometimes when we suddenly 
become aware, say, of the eighth stroke of a striking 
clock, we can remember earlier strokes, although we 
seem to ourselves not to have directly apprehended 
them. I cannot say that I have ever noticed this ex- 
perience in myself, but I have no doubt that it is 
possible. And people seem inclined to argue that, 
since we can remember the earlier strokes, we must 
have experienced them, though we did not directly 
apprehend them. 

But here again, the argument does not seem to 
me at all conclusive. I should say, again, that it is 
possible that we did directly apprehend them, but 



THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 179 

only with a very slight degree of attention (if anyV 
And, as an alternative, I should urge that there is 
no reason why we should not be able to remember 
a thing, which we never experienced at all. 

I do not know what other arguments can be 
used to show that we sometimes experience sensibles 
in a sense quite other than that of directly appre- 
hending them. But I do not know how to show 
that we do not ; and since people whose judgment 
I respect, seem to hold that we do, I think it is 
worth while to say something as to what this sense 
of " experience " can be, in case it does occur. 

I have said that sometimes when people say that 
a given entity is " experienced " they seem to mean 
that it belongs to some individual, in the sense in 
which my acts of belief belong to me. To say that 
sensibles were experienced by me in this sense 
would, therefore, be to say that they sometimes 
have to my acts of belief and acts of direct appre- 
hension the same relation which these have to one 
another — the relation which constitutes them mine. 
But that sensibles ever have this kind of relation 
to my mental acts, is a thing which I cannot believe. 
Those who hold that they are ever experienced at 
all, in some sense other than that of being directly 
apprehended, always hold, I think, that, whenever 
they are directly apprehended by us, they also, at 
the same time, have to us this other relation as well 
And it seems to me pretty clear that when I do 
directly apprehend a sensible, it does not have to 
me the same relation which my direct apprehension 
of it has. 

If, therefore, sensibles are ever experienced by us 
at all, in any sense other than that of being directly 
apprehended by us, we must, I think, hold that they 
are so in an entirely new sense, quite different both 
from that in which to be experienced means to be 
directly apprehended, and from that in which to be 



180 THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 

experienced means to occur in some individual's 
mind. And I can only say that I see no reason 
to think that they ever are experienced in any such 
sense. If they are, the fact that they are so is 
presumably open to the inspection of us all ; but I 
cannot distinguish any such fact as occurring in 
myself, as I can distinguish the fact that they are 
directly apprehended. On the other hand, I see no 
way of showing that they are not experienced in 
some such sense ; and perhaps somebody will be 
able to point it out to me. I do not wish to assume! 
therefore, that there is no such sense ; and hence, 
though I am inclined to think that the only sense 
in which they are experienced is that of being 
directly apprehended, I shall, in what follows, use 
the phrase " experienced " to mean either directly 
apprehended or having to something this supposed 
different relation, if such a relation there be. 

(3) We may now, therefore, raise the question: 
Do sensibles ever exist at times when they are not 
being experienced at all ? 

To this question it is usual to give a negative 
answer, and two different a priori reasons may be 
urged in favour of that answer. 

The first is what should be meant by Berkeley's 
dictum that the esse of sensibles is percipi. This 
should mean, whatever else it may mean, at least 
this : that to suppose a sensible to exist and yet not 
to be experienced in self-contradictory. And this 
at least seems to me to be clearly false. Anything 
which was a patch of colour would be a sensible ; 
and to suppose that there are patches of colour 
which are not being experienced is clearly not self- 
contradictory, however false it may be. 

It may, however, be urged (and this is the 
second argument) that, though to suppose a thing 
to be a sensible and yet not experienced is not self- 
contradictory, yet we can clearly see that nothing 



THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 181 

can have the one property without having the 
other. And I do not see my way to deny that we 
may be able to know, a priori that such a connection 
holds between two such properties. In the present 
case, however, I cannot see that it does hold, and 
therefore, so far as a priori reasons go, I conclude 
that there is no reason why sensibles should not 
exist at times when they are not experienced. 

It may, however, be asked : Is there any reason 
to suppose that they ever do ? And the reason, 
which weighs with me most, is one which applies, 
I think, to a certain class of sensibles only ; a class 
which I will try to define by saying that it consists 
of those which would (under certain conditions 
which actually exist) be experienced in a sensation 
proper, if only a. living body, having a certain 
constitution, existed under those conditions in a 
position in which no such body does actually exist 
I think it is very probable that this definition does 
not define at all accurately the kind of sensibles I 
mean ; but I think that what the definition aims at 
will become clearer when I proceed to give my 
reasons for supposing that sensibles, of a kind to be 
defined in some such way, do exist unexperienced. 
The reason is simply that, in Hume's phrase, I 
have " a strong propensity to believe " that, e.g. t 
the visual sensibles which I directly apprehend in 
looking at this paper, still exist unchanged when I 
merely alter the position of my body by turning 
away my head or closing my eyes, provided that the 
physical conditions outside my body remain un- 
changed. In such a case it is certainly true in some 
sense that I should see sensibles like what I saw 
the moment before, if only my head were still in 
the position it was at that moment or my eyes 
unclosed. But if, in such a case, there is reason 
to think that sensibles which I should see, if the 
position of my body were altered, exist in spite of 



1 82 THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 

the fact that I do not experience them, there is, I 
think, an equal reason to suppose it in other cases. 
We must, for instance, suppose that the sensibles 
which I should see now, if I were at the other end 
of the room, or if I were looking under the table, 
exist at this moment, though they are not being 
experienced. And similarly we must suppose that 
the sensibles which you would see, if you were in 
the position in which I am now, exist at this 
moment, in spite of the fact that they may be more 
or less different from those which I see, owing to 
the different constitution of our bodies. All this 
implies of course, that a vast number of sensibles 
exist at any moment, which are not being ex- 
perienced at all. But still it implies this only with 
regard to sensibles of a strictly limited class, namely 
sensibles which would be experienced in a sensation 
proper, if a body, having a certain constitution, were 
in a position in which it is not, under the given 
physical conditions. It does not, for instance, 
imply that any images, of which it may be true that I 
should have them, under present physical conditions, 
if the position of my body were altered, exist 
now ; nor does it imply that sensibles which would 
be experienced by me now in a sensation proper, 
if the physical conditions external to my body were 
different from what they are, exist now. 

I feel, of course, that I have only succeeded in 
defining miserably vaguely the kind of sensibles I 
mean ; and I do not know whether the fact that I 
have a strong propensity to believe that sensibles of 
a kind to be defined in some such way, do exist 
unexperienced, is any good reason for supposing 
that they actually do. The belief may, of course, 
be a mere prejudice. But I do not know of any 
certain test by which prejudices can be distinguished 
from reasonable beliefs. And I cannot help thinking 
that there may be a class of sensibles, capable of 



THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 183 

definition in some such way, which there really is 
reason to think exist unexperienced. 

But, if I am not mistaken, there is an empirical 
argument which, though, even if it were sound, it 
would have no tendency whatever to show that no 
sensibles exist unexperienced, would, if it were 
sound, show that this very class of sensibles, to 
which alone my argument for unexperienced 
existence applies, certainly do not so exist This, 
it seems to me, is the most weighty argument which 
can be used upon the subject ; and I want, therefore, 
to give my reasons for thinking that it is fallacious. 

The argument is one which asserts that there is 
abundant empirical evidence in favour of the view 
that the existence of the sensibles which we ex- 
perience at any time, . always depends upon the 
condition of our nervous system : so that, even where 
it also depends upon external physical conditions, 
we can safely say that sensibles, which we should 
have experienced, if only our nervous system had 
been in a different condition, certainly do not exist, 
when it is not in that condition. And the fallacy of 
this argument seems to me to lie in the fact that it 
does not distinguish between the existence of the 
sensibles which we experience and the fact that we 
experience them. What there is evidence for is that 
our experience of sensibles always depends upon the 
condition of our nervous system ; that, according as 
the condition of the nervous system changes, 
different sensibles are experienced, even where other 
conditions are the same. But obviously the fact that 
our experience of a given sensible depends upon the 
condition of our nervous system does not directly 
show that the existence of the sensible experienced 
always also so depends. The fact that I am now 
experiencing this black mark is certainly a different 
fact from the fact that this black mark now exists. And 
hence the evidence which does tend to show that 



i8 4 THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 

the former fact would not have existed if my nervous 
system had been in a different condition, has no 
tendency to show that the latter would not have 
done so either. I am sure that this distinction 
ought to be made ; and hence, though I think there 
may be other reasons for thinking that the very 
existence of the sensibles, which we experience, and 
not merely the fact that we experience them does 
always depend upon the condition of our nervous 
systems, it seems to me certain that this particular 
argument constitutes no such reason. 

And I think that those who suppose that it does 
are apt to be influenced by an assumption, for 
which also, so far as I can see, there is no reason. 
I have admitted that the only reason I can see for 
supposing that sensibles which we experience ever 
exist unexperienced, seems to lead to the conclusion 
that the sensibles which would be seen by a colour- 
blind man, if he occupied exactly the position which 
I, who am not colour-blind, now occupy, exist now, 
just as much as those which I now see. And it 
may be thought that this implies that the sensibles, 
which he would see, and which would certainly be 
very different from those which I see, are nevertheless 
at this moment in exactly the same place as those 
which I see. Now, for my part, I am not prepared to 
admit that it is impossible they should be in the same 
place. But the assumption against which I wish to 
protest, is the assumption that, if they exist at all, 
they must be in the same place. I can see no reason 
whatever for this assumption. And hence any 
difficulties there may be in the way of supposing 
that they could be in the same place at the same 
time as the sensibles which I see, do not at all apply 
to my hypothesis, which is only that they exist now, 
not that they exist in the same place in which mine do. 

On this question, therefore, as to whether 
sensibles ever exist at times when they are not 



THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 185 

experienced, I have only to say (1) that I think 
there is certainly no good reason whatever for 
asserting that no sensibles do ; and (2) that I think 
perhaps a certain amount of weight ought to be 
attached to our instinctive belief that certain kinds 
of sensibles do ; and that here again any special 
arguments which may be brought forward to 
show that, whether some sensibles exist unex- 
perienced or not, this kind certainly do not, are, so 
far as I can see, wholly inconclusive. 

(") 

I now pass to the question how sensibles are 
related to physical objects. And here I want to say, 
to begin with, that I feel extremely puzzled about the 
whole subject. I find it extremely difficult to dis- 
tinguish clearly from one another the different con- 
siderations which ought to be distinguished ; and all 
I can do is to raise, more or less vaguely, certain 
questions as to how certain particular sensibles are 
related to certain particular physical objects, and to 
give the reasons which seem to me to have most 
weight for answering these questions in one way 
rather than another. I feel that all that I can say 
is very tentative. 

To begin with, I do not know how "physical 
object" is to be defined, and I shall not try to 
define it. I shall, instead, consider certain pro- 
positions, which everybody will admit to be pro- 
positions about physical objects, and which I shall 
assume that I know to be true. And the question 
I shall raise is as to how these propositions are to 
be interpreted — in what sense they are true ; in con- 
sidering which, we shall at the same time consider 
how they are related to certain sensibles. 

I am looking at two coins, one of which is a 
half-crown, the other a florin. Both are lying on 
the ground ; and they are situated obliquely to 



1 86 THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 

my line of sight, so that the visual sensibles which 
I directly apprehend in looking at them are visibly 
elliptical, and not even approximately circular. 
Moreover, the half-crown is so much farther from 
me than the florin that its visual sensible is visibly 
smaller than that of the florin. 

In these circumstances I am going to assume 
that I know the following propositions to be true ; 
and no one, I think, will deny that we can know 
such propositions to be true, though, as we shall 
see, extremely different views may be taken as to 
what they mean. I know (a) that, in the ordinary 
sense of the word " see " I am really seeing two 
coins; an assertion which includes, if it is not 
identical with, the assertion that the visual ex- 
periences, which consist in my direct apprehension 
of those two elliptical patches of colour, are sensa- 
tions proper, and are not either hallucinations nor 
mere experiences of " images " ; (6) that the upper 
sides of the coins are really approximately circular, 
and not merely elliptical like the visual sensibles ; 
(c) that the coins have another side, and an inside, 
though I don't see it ; (d) that the upper side of 
the naif-crown is really larger than that of the 
florin, though, its visual sensible is smaller than 
the visual sensible of the upper side of the florin : 
(e) that both coins continue to exist, even when I 
turn away my head or shut my eyes ; but in saying 
this, I do not, of course, mean to say that there is 
absolutely no change in them ; I daresay there must 
be some change, and I do not know how to define 
exactly what I do mean. But we can, I think, say 
at least this : viz., that propositions (£), (c) f and (a) 
will still be true, although proposition (a) has 
ceased to be true. 

Now all these propositions are, I think, typical 
propositions of the sort which we call propositions 
about physical objects ; and the two coins themselves 



THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 187 

are physical objects, if anything is. My question 
is : In what sense are these propositions true ? 

And in considering this question, there are, I 
think, two principles which we can lay down as 
certain to begin with ; though they do not carry us 
very fan 

The one is (a) that the upper side of the coin, 
which I am said to see, is not simply identical with 
the visual sensible which I directly apprehend in 
seeing it. That this is so might be thought to 
follow absolutely from each of the two facts wnich I 
have called (6) and (d) ; but I am not quite sure 
that it does follow from either of these or from both 
together : for it seems to me just possible that the 
two sensibles in question, though not circular in my 
private space, may yet be circular in physical space ; 
and similarly that though the sensible of the half- 
crown is smaller than that of the florin in my private 
space, it may be larger in physical space. But what 
I think it does follow from is the fact that another 
person may be seeing the upper side of the coin in 
exactly the same sense in wnich I am seeing it, and 
yet his sensible be certainly different from mine. 
From this it follows absolutely that the upper side 
of the coin cannot be identical with both sensibles, 
since they are not identical with one another. And 
though it does not follow absolutely that it may not 
be identical with one of the two, yet it does follow 
that we can get a case in which it is not identical 
with mine and I need only assume that the case I 
am taking is such a case. 

From this it follows that we must distinguish that 
sense of the word " see " in which we can be said to 
" see " a physical object, from that sense of the word 
in which " see " means merely to directly apprehend 
a visual sensible. In a proposition of the form 
" I see A," where A is a name or description of 
some physical object, though, if this proposition 



1 88 THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 

is to be true, there must be some visual sensible, 
B, which I am directly apprehending, yet the 
proposition " I see A " is certainly not always, and 
probably never, identical in meaning with the 
proposition " I directly apprehend B." In asserting 
" I see A " we are asserting not only that we 
directly apprehend some sensible but also some- 
thing else about this sensible — it may be only 
some proposition of the form, " and this sensible 
has certain other properties," or it may be some 
proposition of the form " and / know this sensible 
to have certain other properties." Indeed we have 
not only to distinguish that sense of the word 
11 perceive " in which it is equivalent to " directly 
apprehend," from one sense in which we can be 
said to perceive a physical object ; we have also 
to distinguish at least two different senses in which 
we can be said to perceive physical objects, 
different both from one another and from " directly 
apprehend." For it is obvious that though I 
should be said to be now seeing the half-crown, 
there is a narrower, and more proper, sense, in 
which I can only be said to see one side of it — not 
its lower side or its inside, and not therefore the 
whole half-crown. 

The other principle, which we can lay down to 
start with is (P) that my knowledge of all the five 
propositions (a) to (e), is based, in the last resort, 
on experiences of mine consisting in the direct 
apprehension of sensibles and in the perception of 
relations between directly apprehended sensibles. 
It is based on these, in at least this sense, that I 
should never have known any of these propositions 
if I had never directly apprehended any sensibles 
nor perceived any relations between them. 

What, in view of these two principles, can be 
the sense in which my five propositions are true ? 

(i) It seems to me possible that the only true 



THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 189 

interpretation which can be given to any of them 
is an interpretation of a kind which I can only 
indicate rather vaguely as follows : Namely, that 
all of them express only a kind of fact which we 
should naturally express by saying that, a/ certain 
conditions were fulfilled, I or some other person, 
should directly apprehend certain other sensibles. 
For instance the only true thing that can be meant 
by saying that I really see coins may be some such 
thing as that, if I were to move my body in certain 
ways, I should directly apprehend other sensibles, 
e.g. tactual ones, which I should not directly 
apprehend as a consequence of these movements, 
if these present visual experiences of mine were 
mere hallucinations or experiences of "images." 
Again, the only true thing that can be meant by 
saying that the upper sides of the coins are really 
approximately circular may be some such thing as 
that, if I were looking straight at them, I should 
directly apprehend circular sensibles. And similarly, 
the only true interpretation of (c) may be some such 
fact as that, if I were to turn the coins over, or 
break them up, I should have certain sensations, of 
a sort I can imagine very well ; of (d) that if I were 
at an equal distance from the half-crown and the 
florin, the sensible, I should then see corresponding 
to the half-crown would be bigger than that corres- 
ponding to the florin, whereas it is now smaller ; of (e) 
that, if, when my eyes were closed, they had been 
open instead, I should have seen certain sensibles. 

It is obvious, indeed, that if any interpretation on 
these lines is the only true interpretation of our five 
propositions, none of those which I have vaguely 
suggested comes anywhere near to expressing it in 
its ultimate form. They cannot do so for the simple 
reason that, in them, the conditions under which I 
should experience certain other sensibles are them- 
selves expressed in terms of physical objects, and not 



i 9 o THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 

in terms of sensibles and our experience of them. 
The conditions are expressed in such terms as " if I 
were to move my body," " if I were to look straight 
at the coins," "if I were to turn the coins over," 
etc. ; and all these are obviously propositions, which 
must themselves again be interpreted in terms of 
sensibles, if our original five propositions need to be 
so. It is obvious, therefore, that any ultimate 
interpretation of our five propositions, on these 
lines, would be immensely complicated ; and I 
cannot come anywhere near to stating exactly what it 
would be. But it seems to me possible that some 
such interpretation could be found, and that it is the 
only true one. 

The great recommendation of this view seems 
to me to be that it enables us to see, more clearjy 
than any other view can, how our knowledge of 
physical propositions can be based on our experi en e 
of sensibles, in the way in which principle (P) 
asserts it to be. If, when I know that the coins 
are round, all that I know is some such thing as 
that if, after experiencing the sensibles I do now 
experience, I were to experience still others, I 
should finally experience a third set, we can 
understand, as clearly as we can understand how 
any knowledge can be obtained by induction at all, 
how such a knowledge could be based on our 

Previous experience of sensibles, and how it could 
e verified by our subsequent experience. 
On the other hand, apart from the difficulty of 
actually giving any interpretation on these lines, 
which will meet the requirements, the great ob- 
jection to it seems to me to be this. It is obvious 
that, on this view, though we shall still be allowed 
to say that the coins existed before I saw them, are 
circular etc., all these expressions, if they are to*be 
true, will have to be understood in a Pickwickian 
sense. When I know that the coins existed before 



THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 191 

I saw them, what I know will not be that anything 
whatever existed at that time, in the sense in whicn 
those elliptical patches of colour exist now. All that 
I know will be simply that, since the elliptical patches 
exist now, it is true, that, ^/"certain unrealised con- 
ditions had been realised, I should have had certain 
sensations that I have not had ; or, if certain con- 
ditions, which may or may not be realised in the future, 
were to be so, I should have certain experiences. 
Something like this will actually be the only true thinj 
that can be meant by saying that the coins existe< 
before I saw them. In other words, to say of a 
physical object that it existed at a given time will 
always consist merely in saying of some sensible, 
not that it existed at the time in question, but some- 
thing quite different and immensely complicated 
And thus, though, when I know that the coins 
exist, what I know will be merely some proposition 
about these sensibles which I am directly appre- 
hending, yet this view will not contradict principle 
(a) by identifying the coins with the sensibles. For 
it will say that to assert a given thing of the coins is 
not equivalent to asserting the same thing of the 
sensibles, but only to asserting of them something 
quite different 

The fact that these assertions that the coins exist, 
are round, etc., will, on this view, only be true in 
this outrageously Pickwickian sense, seems to me to 
constitute the great objection to it But it seems 
to me to be an objection only, so far as I can 
see, because I have a " strong propensity to believe M 
that, when I know that the coins existed before I 
saw them, what I know is that something existed at 
that time, in the very same sense in which those 
elliptical patches now exist. And, of course, this 
belief may be a mere prejudice. It may be that 
when I believe that I now have, in my body, blood 
and nerves and brain, what I believe is only true, if 



192 THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 

it does not assert, in the proper sense of the word 
"existence," the present existence of anything what- 
ever, other than sensibles which I directly apprehend, 
but only makes assertions as to the kind of ex- 

Sciences a doctor would have, if he dissected me. 
ut I cannot feel at all sure that my belief, that, 
when I know of the present existence of these 
things (as I think I do), I am knowing of the 
present existence (in the proper sense) of things 
other than any sensibles which I or any one else 
am now directly apprehending, is a mere prejudice. 
And therefore I think it is worth while to consider 
what, if it is not, these things, of whose existence I 
know, can be. 

{2) It is certain that if, when I know that that 
half-crown existed before I saw it, I am knowing 
that something existed at that time in other than a 
Pickwickian sense, I only know this something by 
description \ and it seems pretty clear that the 
description by which I know it is as the thing which 
has a certain connection with this sensible which 
I am now directly apprehending. But what 
connection ? We cannot simply say, as many 
people have said, that by "that half-crown" I mean 
the thing which caused my experience of this 
sensible; because events which happen between 
the half-crown and my eyes, and events in my eyes, 
and optic nerves, and brains are just as much causes 
of my experiences as the half-crown itself. But it 
may perhaps be the case that the half-crown has 
some particular kind of causal relation to my ex- 
perience, which these other events have not got — a 
kind which may be expressed, perhaps, by saying 
that it is its "source." And hence, when I know 
that that half-crown is circular, I may perhaps be 
knowing that the source of this experience is 
circular. 

But what sort of a thing can this " source " be ? 



THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA i 9 j 

One kind of view, which I think is very commonly 
held, is that it is something " spiritual " in its nature, 
or something whose nature is utterly unknown to 
us. And those who hold this view are apt to add, 
that it is not really " circular/' in any sense at all ; 
nor is the " source " of my half-crown experience, in 
any sense at all, " bigger " than that of my florin 
experience. But if this addition were seriously 
meant, it would, of course, amount to saying that 
propositions {b) and (d) are not true, in any sense at 
all; and I do not think that those who make it, 
really mean to say this. I think that what they 
mean is only that the only sense in which those 
11 sources" are circular, and one bigger than the 
other, is one in which to say this merely amounts to 
saying that the sensibles, wnich they would cause us 
to experience, under certain conditions, would be 
circular, and one bigger than the other. In other 
words, in order to give a true interpretation to the 
propositions that the coins are circular and one 
Digger than the other, they say that we must inter- 
pret them in the same kind of way in which view 
(i) interpreted them; and the only difference 
between their view and view (i), is that, whereas 
that said that you must give a Pickwickian inter- 
pretation both to the assertion that the coins exist, 
and to the assertion that they are circular, they say 
that you must not give it to the former assertion, 
and must to the latter. 

To this view my objection is only that any reason 
there may be for saying that the "sources" exist in 
other than a Pickwickian sense, seems to me to be 
also a reason for saying that they are " circular " in 
a sense that is not Pickwickian. I have just as 
strong a propensity to believe that they are really 
circular, in a simple and natural sense, as that they 
exist in such a sense: and I know of no better 
reason for believing either. 

N 



194 THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 

(3) It may be suggested, next, that these "sources," 
instead of being something spiritual in their nature 
or something of a nature utterly unknown, consist 
simply of sensibles, of a kind which I have 
previously tried to define; namely of all those 
sensibles, which anybody would, under the actual 
physical conditions, experience in sensations proper 
of which the half-crown and the florin were the 
source, if their bodies were in any of the positions 
relatively to those coins, in which they would get 
sensations from them at all. We saw before that it 
seems possible that all these sensibles do really 
exist at times when they are not experienced, and 
that some people, at all events, seem to have a 
strong propensity to believe that they do. And in 
favour of the view that some such huge collection 
of sensibles is the upper side of the half-crown, is 
the fact that we do seem to have a strong 
propensity to believe that any particular sensible, 
which we directly apprehend in looking at the 
upper side of the half-crown, and of our direct 
apprehension of which the upper side is the source, 
is in the place in which the upper side is. And 
that some sense might be given to the expression 
"in the same place as," in which it could be true 
that sensibles of all sorts of different shapes and 
sizes, and of all sorts of different colours, were in 
the same place at the same time, seems to me to be 
possible. But the objection to this view seems to 
me to be the same as to the last ; namely that if the 
upper side of the half-crown were identical with 
such a collection of sensibles, then the only sense in 
which it could be said to be "circular," or bigger 
than that of the florin, would certainly be very 
Pickwickian, though not the same as on that 
view. 

(4) If, for the reasons given, we reject both (i), 
(2), and (3) as interpretations of our five pro- 



THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 195 

positions, the only alternative I can think of that 
remains, is one which is roughly identical, so far as 
I can see, with Locke's view. It is a view which 
asserts that the half-crown and the florin really did 
exist (in the natural sense) before I saw them ; that 
they really are approximately circular (again in the 
natural sense); that, therefore, they are not com- 
posed of sensibles which I or others should directly 
apprehend under other conditions ; and that therefore 
also neither these sensibles (even if such do now 
exist) nor those which I am now directly appre- 
hending are in the place in which the coins are. It 
holds, therefore, that the coins do really resemble 
some sensibles, in respect of the " primary " qualities 
which these have; that they really are round, and 
one larger than the other, in much the same sense 
in which some sensibles are round and some larger 
than others. But it holds also that no sensibles 
which we ever do directly apprehend, or should 
directly apprehend, if at a given time we were in 
other positions, are parts of those coins ; and that, 
therefore, there is no reason to suppose that any 
parts of the coins have any of the "secondary 
qualities "—colour, etc. — which any of these sensibles 
nave. 

On this view, it is plain, there is nothing to 
prevent us from holding that, as suggested in I (3), 
all sorts of unexperienced sensibles do exist We 
are only prevented from holding that, if they do, 
those which have the same source all exist in the 
same place as their source. And the natural view 
to take as to the status of sensibles generally, 
relatively to physical objects, would be that none of 
them, whether experienced or not, were ever in the 
same place as any physical object That none, 
therefore, exist " anywhere" in physical space; 
while, at the same time, we can also say, as argued 
in I (2), that none exist " in the mind," except in 



196 THE STATUS OF SENSE-DATA 

the sense that some are directly apprehended by 
some minds. And the only thing that would need 
to be added, is that some, and some only, resemble 
the physical objects which are their source, in respect 
of their shape. 

To this view I can see no objection except the 
serious one that it is difficult to answer the 
Questions: How can I ever come to know that 
tnese sensibles have a " source " at all ? And how 
do I know that these "sources" are circular? It 
would seem that, if I do know these things at all, 
I must know immediately, in the case of some 
sensibles, both that they have a source and what the 
shape of this source is. And to this it may be 
objected that this is a kind of thing which I 
certainly cannot know immediately. The argument 
in favour of an interpretation of type (i) seems to 
me to rest wholly on the assumption that there are 
only certain kinds of facts which I can know 
immediately ; and hence that if I believe I know a 
fact, which is not of this kind, and which also I 
cannot have learnt immediately, my belief must be 
a mere prejudice. But I do not know how it can 
be shown that an assertion of the form : Facts of 
certain kinds are the only ones you can know 
immediately ; is itself not a prejudice. I do not 
think, therefore, that the fact that, if this last view 
were true, we should have to admit that we know 
immediately facts of a kind which many people 
think we cannot know immediately, is a conclusive 
objection to it 



THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 

The fourth chapter of Mr. Bradley's Appearance 
and Reality is a chapter headed " Space and Time," 
and he begins the chapter as follows : — 

M The object of this chapter is far from being an 
attempt to discuss fully the nature of space or of 
time It will content itself with stating our main 
justification for regarding them as appearances. It 
will explain why we deny that, in the character 
which they exhibit, they either have or belong to 
reality."* 

Here, it will be seen, Mr. Bradley states that, in 
his opinion, Time, in a certain character neither has 
nor belongs to reality; this is the conclusion he 
wishes to maintain. And to say that Time has not 
reality^ would seem to be plainly equivalent to 
saying that Time is not real. However, if anybody 
should doubt whether the two phrases are meant to 
be equivalent, the doubt may be easily set at rest 
by a reference to the concluding words of the same 
chapter, where Mr. Bradley uses the following very 
emphatic expression : " Time," he says, " like 
space, has most evidently proved not to be real, but 
to be a contradictory appearance" (p. 43). Mr. 
Bradley does, then, say here, in so many words, 
that Time is not real. But there is one other 
difference between this statement at the end of the 
chapter, and the statement at the beginning of it, 

# Appearand and Reality (2nd edn.), p. 35. The Italics are mine. 



198 THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 

which we must not forget to notice. In the state- 
ment at the beginning he carefully qualifies the 
assertion " Time neither has nor belongs to reality " 
by saying " Time, in the character which it exhibits, 
neither has nor belongs to reality," whereas in the 
final statement this qualification is not inserted ; 
here he says simply "Time is not real." This 
qualification, which is inserted in the one place and 
omitted in the other, might, of course, be meant to 
imply that, in some other character — some character 
which it does not exhibit — Time has reality and 
does belong to it And I shall presently have 
something to say about this distinction between 
Time in one character and Time in another, be- 
cause it might be thought that this distinction is the 
explanation of the difficulty as to Mr. Bradley's 
meaning, which I am going to point out 

However, so far it is clear that Mr. Bradley holds 
that in some sense, at all events, the whole propo- 
sition "Time is not real" can be truly asserted. 
And, now, I want to quote a passage in which he 
says things which, at first sight, seem difficult to 
reconcile with this view. This new passage is a 
passage in which he is not talking of Time in 
particular, but of "appearances" in general. But, 
as we have seen, he does regard Time as one 
among appearances, and I think there is no doubt 
that what he here declares to be true of all ap- 
pearances is meant to be true of Time, among the 
rest. This new passage is as follows : — 

"For the present," he says,* "we may keep a fast 
hold upon this, that appearances exist That is 
absolutely certain, and to deny it is nonsense. And 
whatever exists must belong to reality. This is also 
quite certain, and its denial once more is self- 
contradictory* Our appearances, no doubt, may be 
a beggarly show, and their nature to an unknown 

'Oft.ci*. pp. 131-2 



THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 199 

extent may be something which, as it is, is not trufe 
of reality* That is one thing, and it is quite an- 
other thing to speak as if these facts had no actual 
existence, or as if there could be anything but 
reality to which they might belong. And I must 
venture to repeat that such an idea would be sheer 
nonsense. What appears, for that sole reason, most 
indubitably is; and there is no possibility of con- 
juring its being away from it" 

That is the passage which seems to me to raise a 
difficulty as to his meaning when contrasted with 
the former passage. And the reason why it seems 
to me to raise one is this. In the former passage 
Mr. Bradley declared most emphatically that Time 
is not real ; he said : " Time has most evidently 
proved not to be real. 1 ' Whereas in this one he 
seems to declare equally emphatically that Time 
does exist, and is. And his language here again is 
as strong as possible. He says it is sheer nonsense 
to suppose that Time does not exist, is not a fact, 
does not belong to reality. It looks, therefore, as if 
he meant to make a distinction between "being 
real" on the one hand, and "existing," " being a 
fact," and "being" on the other hand — as if he 
meant to say that a thing may exist, and be, and be 
a fact, and yet not be real.. And I think there is, 
at all events, some superficial difficulty in under- 
standing this distinction. We might naturally think 
that to say "Time exists, is a fact, and is," is 
equivalent to saying that it is real. What more, we 
might ask, can a man who says that Time is real 
mean to maintain about it than that it exists* is a 
fact, and is ? All that most people would mean by 
saying that time is real could, it would seem, be 
expressed by saying "There is such a thing as 
Time." And it might, therefore, appear from this 
new passage as if Mr. Bradley fully agreed with the 
view that most people would express by saying 



aoo THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 



44 Time is real " — as if he did not at all mean to 
contradict anything that most people believe about 
Time. But, if so, then what are we to make of his 
former assertion that, nevertheless, Time is not real ? 
He evidently thinks that, in asserting this, he is 
asserting something which is not mere nonsense; 
and he certainly would not have chosen this way of 
expressing what he means, unless he had supposed 
that what he is here asserting about Time ts in- 
compatible with what people often mean when they 
say "Time is real." Yet, we have seen that he 
thinks that what he is asserting is not incompatible 
with the assertions that Time is, and is a fact, and 
exists. He must, therefore, think that when people 
say "Time is real" they often, at least, mean 
something more than merely that there is such a 
thing as Time, something therefore, which may be 
denied, without denying this. All the same, there 
is, I think, a real difficulty in seeing that they ever 
do mean anything more, and, if they do, what more 
it is that they can mean. 

The two expressions " There is such a thing as 
so and so " and " So and so is real " are certainly 
sometimes and quite naturally used as equivalents, 
even if they are not always so used. And Mr. 
Bradley's own language implies that this is sa 
For, as we have seen, in the first passage, he seems 
to identify belonging to reality with being real 
The conclusion which he expresses in one place by 
saying that Time does not belong to reality he 
expresses in another by saying that it is not real ; 
whereas in the second passage he seems to identify 
the meaning of the same phrase "belonging to 
reality" with existing ; he says that whatever exists 
must belong to reality, and that it is self-contra- 
dictory to deny this. But if both being real and 
existing are identical with belonging to reality, it 
would seem they must be identical with one another. 



THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY aoi 

And, indeed, in another passage in the Appendix to 
the 2nd Edition (p. 555) we find Mr. Bradley 
actually using the following words : " Anything/' he 
says, "that in any sense is % qualifies the absolute 
reality and so is real" Moreover, as we have seen, 
he declares it to be nonsense to deny that Time is ; 
he must, therefore, allow that, in a sense, at all 
events, it is nonsense to deny that Time is reaL 
And yet this denial is the very one he has made. 
Mr. Bradley, therefore, does seem himself to allow 
that the word " real " may, sometimes at all events, 
be properly used as equivalent to the words " exists," 
41 is a fact," "is." And yet his two assertions cannot 
both be true, unless there is some sense in which the 
whole proposition " Tine is real " is not equivalent 
to and cannot be inferred from "Time is," or "Time 
exists," or " Time is a fact" 

It seems, then, pretty clear that Mr. Bradley 
must be holding that the statement " Time is real " 
is in one sense, not equivalent to "Time exists"; 
though he admits that, in another sense, it is. And 
I will only quote one other passage which seems to 
make this plain. 

"If," he says later on (p. 206) "Time is not 
unreal, I admit that our Absolute is a delusion; 
but, on the other side, it will be urged that time 
cannot be mere appearance. The change in the 
finite subject, we are told, is a matter of direct 
experience; it is a fact, and hence it cannot be 
explained away. And so much of course is indubit- 
able. Change is a fact and, further, this fact, as 
such, is not reconcilable with the Absolute. And, if 
we could not in any way perceive how the fact can 
be unreal, we should be placed, I admit, in a hope- 
less dilemma . . . But our real position is very 
different from this. For time has been shown to 
contradict itself, and so to be appearance. With 
this, its discord, we see at once, may pass as an 



202 THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 

element into a wider harmony* And with this, the 
appeal to fact at once becomes worthless." 

" It is mere superstition to suppose that an appeal 
to experience can prove reality. That I find some* 
thing in existence in the world or in my self, shows 
that this something exists, and it cannot show more. 
Any deliverance of consciousness — whether original 
or acquired — is but a deliverance of consciousness. 
It is in no case an oracle and a revelation which we 
have to accept It is a fact, like other facts, to be 
dealt with ; and there is no presumption anywhere 
that any fact is better than appearance." 

Here Mr. Bradley seems plainly to imply that to 
be " real " is something more and other than to be a 
feet or to exist. This is the distinction which I 
think he means to make, and which, I think, is tht 
real explanation of his puzzling language, and this 
is the distinction which I am going presently to 
discuss. But I want first to say something as to 
that other distinction, which I said might be sup- 
posed to be the explanation of the whole difficulty — 
the distinction implied by the qualification " Time, 
in the character which it exhibits " ; the suggestion 
that, when we talk of " Time," we may sometimes 
mean Time in one character, sometimes in another, 
and that what is true of it in the one character may 
not be true of it in the other. It might, I think, be 
suggested that this is the explanation of the whole 
difficulty. And I want briefly to point out why I 
think it cannot be the only explanation. 

Stated very badly and crudely, the difficulty which 
requires explanation is this : Mr. Bradley says, "It 
is sheer nonsense to say Time is not real." But 
this thing which he says it is sheer nonsense to say 
is the very thing which he himself had formerly 
said. He had said, "Time has most evidently 
proved not to be real." Now, Mr. Bradley certainly 
does not mean to say that this proposition of his 



THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 203 

own is sheer nonsense ; and yet he says, in words, 
that it is sheer nonsense. This is the difficulty. 
What is the explanation? Quite obviously, the 
explanation can only take one possible form. Mr. 
•Bradley must be holding that the words " Time is 
real " may have two different senses. In one sense, 
the denial of them is sheer nonsense ; in the other 
sense, so far from being sheer nonsense, denial of 
them is, according to him, evidently true. Now, 
what are these two different senses, between which 
the difference is so enormous ? It is here that the 
two different explanations come in. 

The first and, as I think, the wrong explanation 
(though I think Mr. Bradley's words do give some 
colour to it) is this. It might be said : "The whole 
business is perfectly easy to explain. When Mr. 
Bradley says that Time is not real, what he means 
is that Time, in the character which it exhibits, is 
not real. Whereas, when he says, Time does exist, 
is a fact, and is, and that it is nonsense to deny this, 
what he means is that Time does exist, in same 
ether character — some character other than that 
which it exhibits. He does not mean to make any 
distinction, such as you suppose, between two 
meanings of the word 'real' — the one of them 
merely equivalent to 'exists,' 'is,' 'is a fact, 9 and 
the other meaning something very different from 
this. The only distinction he means to make is a 
distinction between two meanings of ' Time ' or of 
the whole sentence 'Time is real.' He distinguishes 
between the meaning of this sentence, when it 
means, ' Time in the character which it exhibits, is 
real,' which meaning, be says, is evidendy false; 
and its meaning when it means, 'Time in sotke 
other character, is real,' and this meaning, he says, 
is evidently true. This is the complete explanation 
of your supposed puzzle, which is, in fact, therefore, 
very easy to solve." 



204 THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 

This, I think, might be offered as an explanation 
of Mr. Bradley's meaning. And it must be ad- 
mitted that it would furnish a complete explanation 
of the particular puzzle I have just stated, it would 
completely absolve Mr. Bradley from the charge of 
inconsistency ; and would show that where he ap- 
pears to contradict himself about the reality of 
Time, the contradiction is verbal only and not real. 
We might, indeed, object to this distinction between 
Time in one character and Time in another ; on the 
ground that anything which has not got the charac- 
ter which Time exhibits, but only some other 
character, ought not to be called Time at all. We 
are, indeed, perfectly familiar with the conception 
that one and the same thing may at one time 
possess a character which it does not possess at 
another, so that what is true of it at one time may 
not be true of it at another. We are, that is, 
familiar with the idea of a thing changing its charac- 
ter. But Time itself as a whole obviously cannot 
change its character in this sense. Mr. Bradley 
cannot mean to say that it possesses the character 
14 which it exhibits " and in which it is unreal at one 
time, and possesses some other character, in which 
it is real, at some other time. And hence we might 
say it is certainly wrong to speak as if Time itself 
could have two incompatible characters; since 
nothing can have two incompatible characters, 
unless it has them at different times. And this is 
an objection which does seem to apply to Mr. 
Bradley's doctrine in any case, since he does in any 
case seem to imply this distinction between Time in 
one character and Time in another, whether this 
distinction is the complete explanation of our par- 
ticular puzzle or not. Vet this objection would not 
necessarily be more than an objection to Mr. 
Bradley's words; it would not necessarily be an 
objection to his meaning. Where he seems to 



THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 105 

imply that Time, in some character other than that 
which it exhibits, may be fully real, he may only 
mean that something completely different from 
Time, but which does in some sense correspond to 
it, is fully real; and if he does mean this, our 
objection would only amount to an objection to his 
giving the name of "Time" to this supposed 
counterpart of Time ; we might say, and I think 
justly, that it is misleading to speak of this counter- 
part of Time as if it were Time itself in some other 
character ; but this would go no way at all to show 
that there may not really be such a counterpart of 
Time, which is real, while Time itself is unreal 
We might ask, too, what this supposed counterpart 
of Time is like, or (to put it in Mr. Bradley's way} 
what the precise character is, in which Time is real r 
And I think Mr. Bradley would admit that he 
cannot tell us. But this, you see, would also be no 
objection to his actual doctrine. He might quite 
well know, and be right in saying, that there is and 
must be a real counterpart of Time, completely 
different in character from Time, as we know it, 
even though he has not the least idea what this 
counterpart is like. 

We must, therefore, admit that this proposed 
explanation of our puzzle would be a complete 
explanation of it It would completely vindicate 
Mr. Bradley from the charge of inconsistency, and 
would give us, as his doctrine, a doctrine to which 
we have hitherto found no objection except verbal 
ones. 

But, nevertheless, I think it is a wrong ex- 
planation, and I want to explain why. If we were 
to suppose that this distinction between Time in 
one character and Time in another were the only 
one on which Mr. Bradley meant to rely, we should 
have as his doctrine this : We should have to sup- 
pose him to affirm most emphatically that Time, in 



2o6 THE CONCEPTION OF 

the character which it exhibits, neither is real, nor 
exists, nor is a fact, nor is. We should have to 
suppose him to be using all these four expressions 
always as strict equivalents, and to mean that it is 
only in its other character that Time either exists, 
or is a fact, or is. And if he did mean this, there 
would, of course, be no doubt whatever that he does 
mean to contradict the common view with regard to 
Time ; since, of course, what most people mean by 
11 Time " is what he chooses to call " Time in the 
character which it exhibits. 1 ' Yet, his language, 
even in the passages that I quoted, seems to me to 
indicate that he does not mean this. I think, on 
the contrary, he means to affirm emphatically that 
Time even in the character which it exhibits, does 
exist, is a fact, and indubitably tr, though it is not 
real in that character. In the second passage, for 
instance, where he insists so emphatically that ap- 
pearances do exist, are facts, and indubitably are, 
he is, I think, plainly talking of appearances, in the 
character which they exhibit — or, as he there puts 
it, their nature, as it is — he does, I think, mean that 
appearances, even in this character, are facts, exist, 
and are, though, in this character, they are not 
"true of reality." And, so again in the third 
passage, where he says, Change is a fact, and this 
fact, as such, is not reconcilable with the Absolute ; 
this language is surely quite inexcusable, unless he 
means that Change, as such— change, in the charac- 
ter which it exhibits — change, as it is, is a fact : 
though, of course, he holds that in this character it 
certainly is not real I think, therefore, we have to 
assume that Mr. Bradley means to make a dis- 
tinction not merely between Time, in one character, 
and Time in another, but also between " real," in 
one sense, and " real " in another. His meaning is 
not so simple as it would be, if he were merely 
making a distinction between Time in one character 



THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 207 

and Time in another, and it is not, after all, at all 
plain whether he means to contradict what ordinary 
people hold about Time or not He does not mean 
to assert that Time, as such, neither is real, nor 
exists, nor is a fact, nor is; but, on the contrary, 
that Time, even as such, does exist, is a fact, and 
is ; but, nevertheless, is not real This, at least, is 
what I am going- to assume him to mean. And on 
this assumption, we are brought face to face with 
the question as to the meaning of the word " real," 
and also as to the meaning of these other words 
" exists," " is a fact," and " is." Mr. Bradley seems 
to admit, we have seen, that " real " may sometimes 
be properly used as merely equivalent to these other 
phrases. We are, however, now supposing that he 
also holds that in another sense they are not equiva- 
lent, but that "real" means something more than 
the others, so that it is quite consistent to maintain 
that Time is not "real," and yet does exist, is a 
feet, and is. In holding this I think he is mistaken ; 
and what I want to do is to explain, as clearly as I 
can, what sort of a mistake I take him to be making, 
and what seems to me to be the source of this mis- 
take. I may, perhaps, be quite wrong in thinking 
that Mr Bradley has made this mistake, and that it 
is in any degree the source of the distinction he 
seems to draw between "reality" and " existence." 
To maintain that it is so is no part of my main 
object. My main object is simply to make clear 
the nature of this particular mistake, whether com- 
mittted by Mr. Bradley or not, and that it is a 
mistake ; because it seems to me that it is a mistake 
which it is very easy to make, and very important 
to avoid. I am, of course, not concerned at all to 
discuss the question whether Time is real or not, 
but only to discuss the question what sort of things 
would have to be true, if it were unreal, and whether 



208 THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 

if those things were true it could still be true that 
Time either exists, or is, or is a fact. 

Now, to begin with, I think I know pretty well, 
in part at least, what Mr. Bradley means when he 
says that it is unreal. I think that part at least of 
what he means is just what he ought to mean — just 
what anyone else would mean if he said that Time 
was unreal, and what any ordinary person would 
understand to be meant, if he heard those words. 
But I can conceive that, when I have explained as 
well as I can what this is that he ought to mean, 
some people may be inclined to dispute whether he 
means any such thing at all. They may say that 
he is using the word "real" exclusively in some 
highly unusual and special sense, so that in asserting 
that " Time is unreal " he is by no means denying 
any part of what ordinary people would mean by 
saying that "Time is real." And that some special 
sense may come in to his meaning I am prepared to 
admit 1 do think it is possible that part of what 
Mr. Bradley is asserting may be something which 
no unsophisticated person would think of expressing 
in the same way, and I will admit, therefore, that he 
does not, very likely, mean by "Time is unreal w 
inertly what other people would mean by this 
phrase, but something else as well. What, how- 
ever, I cannot help thinking is that, even if he 
means something more, he does mean what ordinary 
people would mean as well : that what they would 
mean is at least apart of his meaning. And if even 
this is disputed, if it is maintained that he is using 
the words exclusively in some special sense, I own I 
do not know how to argue the auestion. If any- 
body really does take the view that, when he says 
"Time is unreal, 1 ' absolutely all that he means is 
something which is in no way incompatible with 
what most people would mean by saying " Time is 
real/ 1 I do not know how to show that this view is 



THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 209 

wrong. I can only say that if this had been all 
that he meant, I cannot believe that he would have 
expressed his view in the form "Time is unreal" 
The only further argument I shall bring in favour 
of my view that he does mean what he ought to 
mean will take the form of an answer to one possible 
argument which might be brought against it When 
I have explained what he ought to mean by saying 
that " Time is unreal," it will be quite clear that this 
is something which is in fact incompatible with the 
truth of the propositions that Time is, or exists, or 
is a fact And it might be urged that the fact that 
it is thus incompatible is a strong argument against 
the view that Mr. Bradley does mean what he 
ought to mean, since, if he had meant it, he could 
hardly have failed to perceive that what he meant 
was inconsistent with these propositions, whereas, 
as we have seen, he certainly does not perceive this. 
I have an answer to that argument, which consists 
in giving an explanation, which I think a plausible 
one, as to how he could come to think that the 
propositions are not inconsistent, when in fact they 



What, then, ought Mr. Bradley to mean by 
44 Time is unreal" ? What would most people mean 
by this proposition ? I do not think there is much 
difficulty in discovering what sort of thing they 
would mean by it Of course, Time, with a big T, 
seems to be a highly abstract kind of entity, and to 
define exactly what can be meant by saying of an 
entity of that sort that it is unreal does seem to 
offer difficulties. But if you try to translate the 
proposition into the concrete, and to ask what it 
implies, there is, I think, very little doubt as to the 
sort of thing it implies. The moment you try to do 
this, and think what it really comes to, you at once 
begin thinking of a number of different kinds of 
propositions, all of which plainly must be untrue, if 
o 



210 THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 

Time is unreal If Time is unreal, then plainly 
nothing ever happens before or after anything else ; 
nothing is ever simultaneous with anything else ; it 
is never true that anything is past ; never true that 
anything will happen in the future ; never true that 
anything is happening now ; and so on. You can 
at once think of a considerable number of kinds of 
propositions (and you could easily add to the list), 
the falsehood of all of which is plainly implied by 
saying that Time is unreal. And it is clear, also, 
that to say that the falsehood of all propositions of 
these kinds is implied is equivalent to saying that 
there are no facts of certain corresponding kinds — 
no facts which consist in one event happening before 
another ; none which consist in an event being past 
or future, and so on. That is to say, what " Time 
is unreal" implies is that, in the case of a large 
number of different properties which are such that, 
if they did belong to anything, what they belonged 
to would be facts having some common character- 
istic, which we might express by calling them 
" temporal facts," the properties in question do, in 
fact, belong to nothing. It implies that the property 
of being a fact which consists in one event following 
another belongs to nothing; that that of being a 
past event belongs to nothing, and so on. And 
why it implies that all those different special proper- 
ties belong to nothing is, I think we may say, 
because what it means is that the general property 
which I have called that of being a " temporal fact " 
belongs to nothing. To say that the property of 
being a temporal fact belongs to nothing does imply 
that such special properties as that of being a fact 
which consists in one event following another, or 
that of being a fact which consists in something 
being past, also belong to nothing ; in exactly the 
same way as to say that the property of being 
" coloured " belongs to nothing implies with regard 



THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 211 

to the special properties "being red," "bqing blue," 
etc., that they also belong to nothing. We may, 
then, I think, say that what "Time is unreal" 
means is simply " The property of being a temporal 
fact belongs to nothing, " or, to express this in the 
way in which it would be expressed in ordinary life, 
" There are no temporal facts." And this being so, 
we have explained the usage of "unreal," where it 
is predicated of Time with a capital T, by reference 
to a much more common and perfectly familiar 
usage of the term. The use of " is unreal " in the 
phrase "Time is unreal" has been defined by 
reference to its use in the phrase " Temporal facts 
are unreal." And its use in this phrase is, so far as 

I can see, exactly the same as in hosts of phrases 
with which we are perfectly familiar ; it is, I think, 
the commonest and by far the most important use 
of the term " unreal." The use is that in which we 
use it when we say, "Unicorns are unreal," 

II Griffins are unreal," "Chimaeras are unreal," and 
so on. It is the usage in which unreal is equivalent 
to "imaginary"; and in which to say "Unicorns 
are unreal" means the same as "There are no 
unicorns " or " Unicorns do not exist" In just the 
same way the proposition "Temporal facts are 
unreal," into which we have translated "Time is 
unreal," means the same as " There are no temporal 
facts," or "Temporal facts do not exist," or "Tempo- 
ral facts are imaginary." 

I think, then, that what Mr. Bradley ought to 
mean by "Time is unreal" can be defined by 
reference to one particular usage of the word " real " 
— or, if you like to put it that way, to one particular 
one among the conceptions for which the term 
"reality" may stand. And this particular con- 
ception seems to me to be by far the commonest 
and most important of those for which the term 
does stand. I want, therefore, before going on, to 



212 THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 

dwell a little upon its nature; although I daresay 
that all that I have to say is perfectly familiar and 
perfectly well understood by every one here. Of 
course, it has often been said before, but I think it 
is still very far from being generally understood 

I think, perhaps, the point I want to insist on can 
be brought out in this way. I have just said that 
we have pointed out one particular one, and that 
the most important, among the conceptions for 
which the term " reality " may stand ; and that is an 
excusable way of saying what we have done. But 
it would, I think, be more correct to say that we 
have pointed out one particular, and that the most 
important, usage of the terms " real " and " unreal," 
and that one of the peculiarities of this usage is that 
it is such that the terms "real" and "unreal" 
cannot, when used in this way, be properly said to 
stand for any conception whatever. I will try to 
explain what I mean. We have said that what 
" Lions are real" means is that some particular 
property or other — I will say, for the sake of 
brevity, the property of being a lion, though that is 
not strictly accurate, does in fact belong to some- 
thing — that there are things which have it, or, to 
put it in another way, that the conception of being 
a lion is a conception which does apply to some 
things — that there are things which fall under it 
And similarly what " Unicorns are unreal" means 
is that the property of being a unicorn belongs to 
nothing. Now, if this is so, then it seems to me, in 
a very important sense, "real" and "unreal" do 
not in this usage stand for any conceptions at all. 
The only conceptions which occur in the proposition 
" Lions are real " are, on this interpretation, plainly, 
(i) the conception of being a lion, and (2) the 
conception of belonging to something, and perfectly 
obviously " real " does not stand for either of these. 
In the case of the first that is obvious ; but it is 



THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 213 

worth while pointing out that it is also true of the 
second 

For if "is real" did stand for "belongs to some- 
thing/' then the proposition " Lions are real " would 
stand, not for the assertion that the property of 
" being a lion " belongs to something, but for the 
assertion that lions themselves are properties which 
belong to something ; and it is quite obvious that what 
we mean to assert is not any such nonsense as this. 
"Real," therefore, does not, in this proposition, 
stand for the conception of "belonging to some- 
thing ; " nor yet, quite plainly, does it stand for the 
conception of "being a lion/' And hence, since 
these are the only two conceptions which do occur 
in the proposition, we may, I think, say that "real," 
in this usage, does not stand for any conception at 
all To say that it did would be to imply that it 
stdod for some property of which we are asserting 
that everything which has the property of " being a 
lion " also has this other property. But we are not, 
in fact, asserting any such thing. We are not 
asserting of any property called " reality " that it 
belongs to lions, as in the proposition " Lions are 
mammalian" we are asserting of the property of 
" being a mammal " that it belongs to lions. The 
two propositions " Lions are real ' and " Lions are 
mammalian/' though grammatically similar, are in 
reality of wholly different forms ; and one difference 
between them may be expressed by saying that 
whereas " mammalian " does stand for a property or 
conception, the very point of this usage of " real " is 
that it does not. 

To return to Mr. Bradley. "Time is unreal" 
ought to mean, according to me, "Temporal facts 
are unreal," in the sense I have tried to explain. 
And I cannot help thinking that this which he ought 
to mean is, in part at least, what Mr. Bradley does 
mean when he says "Time is unreal," though 



ai 4 THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 

possibly he also means something else as well. 
But if so, it is quite clear, I think, that what he 
means is inconsistent with its being true that Time 
exists or that there is such a thing as Time. To 
say that Time exists or that there is such a thing, is 
to assert at least, that there are some temporal 
facts : it may assert more than this, but it does 
assert this, at least And this, we have seen, Is 
exactly what is denied when it is said that Time is 
unreal "Time is unreal" just means "Temporal 
facts are unreal," or " there are no temporal facts," or 
"Temporal facts do not exist" And just this is 
also what is meant by "Time does not exist" or 
"There is no such thing as Time." There is, in 
fact, nothing else for these expressions to mean. 
What, therefore, Mr. Bradley ought to mean and 
(according to me) does mean by " Time is unreal " 
is, in fact, inconsistent with what he ought to mean 
by "Time exists" or by "Time is." And yet 
plainly he does not think that it is so. Is it possible 
to explain why he should have failed to perceive the 
inconsistency ? 

I think his failure can be explained as follows. 
It may have been noticed that, in the passages I 
quoted from him, he insists in one place, that to 
deny that appearances exist is not merely false but 
self -contradictory, and in another appeals to the 
principle that " any deliverance of consciousness is 
but a deliverance of consciousness" in support of 
his contention that what is a fact need, nevertheless, 
not be real. And the fact that he does these two 
things does, I think, give colour to the suggestion 
that the reason why he thinks that what is unreal 
may yet exist, and be a fact, and be, is the following* 
It is undoubtedly the case that, even if temporal 
facts are unreal, i.e., there are no such things, we 
can and do think of them, just as it is undoubtedly 
the case that, though unicorns are unreal, we can 



THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY ti5 

and do imagine them. In other words, "temporal 
facts 1 ' and "unicorns" are both quite certainly 
11 deliverances of consciousness, 11 at least in the 
sense that they are "objects of thought"; being 
"objects of thought " they are, in a wide sense, 
"appearances" also, and I cannot help thinking 
that Mr. Bradley supposes that, merely because, 
they are so, they musi at least be. "How" (I 
imagine he would ask) "can a thing 'appear 1 or 
even 'be thought of unless it is there to appear 
and to be thought of ? To say that it appears or is 
thought of, and that yet there is no such thing, is 
plainly self-contradictory. A thing cannot have a 
property, unless it is there to have it, and, since 
unicorns and temporal facts do have the property of 
being thought of, there certainly must be such 
things. When I think of a unicorn, what I am 
thinking of is certainly not nothing; if it were 
nothing, then, when I think of a griffin, I should 
also be thinking of nothing, and there would be no 
difference between thinking of a griffin and thinking 
of a unicorn. But there certainly is a difference ; 
and what can the difference be except that in the 
one case what I am thinking of is a unicorn, and in 
the other a griffin ? And if the unicorn is what I 
am thinking of, then there certainly must be a 
unicorn, in spite of the fact that unicorns are unreal. 
In other words, though in one sense of the words 
there certainly are no unicorns — that sense, namely, 
in which to assert that there are would be equivalent 
to asserting that unicorns are real — yet there must 
be some other sense in which there are such things ; 
since, if there were not, we could not think of 
them." 

Perhaps, it may be thought that the fallacy in- 
volved in this argument is too gross for it to be 
possible that Mr. Bradley should have been guilty 
of it, But there are other passages in Appearance 



216 THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 

and Reality — particularly what he says about Error 
— which look to me as if he certainly was guilty of 
it I suppose it will be quite obvious to everyone 
here that it is- a fallacy ; that the fact that we can 
think of unicorns is not sufficient to prove that, in 
any sense at all, there are any unicorns. Yet, I am 
not sure that I know myself what is the mistake 
involved in thinking that it is sufficient, and I am 
going, therefore, to try to put as clearly as I can, 
what I think it is, in the hope that somebody may 
be able, if I am wrong, to correct me. 

The main mistake, I suppose, is the mistake of 
thinking that the proposition " Unicorns are thought 
of" is a proposition of the same form as " Lions are 
hunted " ; or the proposition " I am thinking of a 
unicorn " of the same form as " I am hunting a 
lion " ; or the proposition " Unicorns are objects of 
thought " of the same form as " Lions are objects 
of the chase." Of the second proposition in each of 
these three pairs, it is in fact the case that it could 
not be true unless there were lions — at least one. 
Each of them does, in fact, assert both with regard 
to a certain property — which we will call that of 
11 being a lion " — that there are things which possess 
it, and also with regard to another — that of being 
hunted — that some of the things which possess the 
former possess this property too. But it is obvious 
enough to common sense that the same is by no 
means true of the first proposition in each pair, in 
spite of the fact that their grammatical expression 
shows no trace of the difference. It is perfectly 
obvious that if I say " I am thinking of a unicorn," 
I am not saying both that there is a unicorn and 
that I am thinking of it, although, if I say " 1 am 
hunting a lion," I am saying both that there is a 
lion, and that I am hunting it. In the former case, 
I am not asserting that the two properties of being 
a unicorn and of being thought of by me both 



THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 217 

belong to one and the same thing ; whereas, in the 
latter case, I am asserting that the two properties of 
being a lion and of being hunted by me do belong 
to one and the same thing. It is quite clear that 
there is in fact, this difference between the two 
propositions; although no trace of it appears in 
their verbal expression. And why we should use 
the same form of verbal expression to convey such 
different meanings is more than I can say. It 
seems to me very curious that language, in this, as 
in the other instance which we have just considered 
of u Lions are real " and " Lions are mammalian," 
should have grown up just as if it were expressly 
designed to mislead philosophers ; and I do not 
know why it should have. Yet, it seems to me 
there is no doubt that in ever so many instances it 
has. Moreover, exactly what is meant by saying 
" I am thinking of a unicorn" is not by any means 
clear to me. I think we can assert at least this : In 
order that this proposition should be true, it is 
necessary (1) that I should be conceiving, with 
regard to a certain property, the hypothesis that 
there is something which possesses it, and (2) that 
the property in question should be such that, if 
anything did possess it there would be a unicorn. 
Although this is plainly true, it does not give us 
completely what is meant by the statement, " I am 
thinking of a unicorn " ; and I do not know what 
the complete meaning is. It is certainly not that I 
am conceiving with regard to the property of 
"being a unicorn," that there is something which 
possesses it ; since I may be thinking of a unicorn, 
without ever having conceived the property of 
M being a unicorn " at all. Whatever it does mean, 
the point which concerns us is that it is certainly 
not necessary for its truth, that the property of being 
a unicorn should, in fact, belong to anything what- 
ever, or, therefore, that there should in any sense 



ti8 THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 

whatever be a unicorn. And the fallacy I am at- 
tributing to Mr. Bradley is that of supposing that, 
in some sense, it must imply this latter. 

This, then, is what I imagine to be at least one 
of the reasons which have led Mr. Bradley to 
suppose that the proposition "Time is unreal/ 9 
must be consistent with the proposition " There is 
such a thing as Time." Put shortly, it is that he 
sees (what is perfectly true) that " Time is unreal " 
must be consistent with u We do think of Time ; n 
he thinks (falsely) that " We do think of Time " 
must imply, in some sense, " There is such a thing 
as Time ; " and finally, infers (correctly) from this 
true and this false premiss, that there must be some 
sense of the proposition " There is such a thing as 
Time " which is consistent with " Time is unreaL" 

It follows, then, that if Mr. Bradley means what 
he ought mean both by "Time is unreal" and by 
11 Time exists," he is contradicting himself when he 
combines these two propositions. And I have said 
I feel convinced that he does mean what he ought 
to mean by the former. But I feel a good deal of 
doubt as to whether, all the same, he is contradicting 
himself, because it does seem to me doubtful 
whether he means what he ought to mean by the 
latter. The kind of thing which I imagine may be 
happening to him when he insists so strougly that 
Time does exist, is a fact, and is, is that, properly 
speaking, he is not attaching to these phrases any 
meaning whatever — not, therefore, that which they 

Eroperly bear. It seems to me very possible that 
e has so strongly convinced himself of the false 
proposition that there must be some sense in which, 
if I think of a unicorn, there must be a unicorn, that 
wherever he knows the former proposition holds, he 
allows himself to use the latter form of words, 
without attaching any meaning to them. What he 
is really asserting so emphatically may, I think, be 



THE CONCEPTION OF REALITY 219 

not anything which his words stand for, but simply 
this verbal proposition that there must be some sense 
in which they are true. 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

I want to raise some childishly simple questions as 
to what we are doing when we make judgments of 
a certain kind, which we all do in fact exceedingly 
commonly make. The kind of judgments I mean 
are those which we make when, with regard to 
something which we are seeing, we judge such 
things as "That is an inkstand," "That is a table- 
cloth," "That is a door," etc., etc. ; or when, with 
regard to something which we are feeling with 
our hands, we judge such things as "This is 
cloth," "This is a finger," "This is a coin," etc., 
etc. 

It is scarcely possible, I think, to exaggerate the 
frequency with which we make such judgments as 
these, nor yet the certainty with which we are able 
to make vast numbers of them. Any man, who is 
not blind, can, at almost any moment of his waking 
life, except when he is in the dark, make a large 
number of judgments of the first kind, with the 
greatest certainty. He has only to look about him, 
if he is indoors, to judge with regard to various 
things which he is seeing, such things as " That is 
a window," "That is a chair," "This is a book"; 
or, if he is out-of-doors, such things as " That is a 
house," " That is a motor-car," " That is a man," or 
"That is a stone," "That is a tree," "That is a 
cloud." And all of us, who are not blind, do in fact 
constantly make such judgments, even if, as a rule, 
we only make them as parts of more complicated 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 221 

judgments. What I mean is that, when we make 
such judgments as " Hullo! that clock has stopped/ 1 
or " This chair is more comfortable than that one," 
or "That man looks like a foreigner," judgments of 
the simpler kind with which I am concerned are, so 
far as I can see, actually a part of what we are 
judging. In judging "That clock has stopped," 
part of what I am actually judging is, so far as I 
can see, " That is a clock ; " and similarly if I judge 
" That tree is taller than this one," my judgment 
actually contains the two simpler judgments " That 
is a tree," and "This is a tree." Perhaps most 
judgments which we make, of the kind I mean, are, 
in this way, only parts of more complicated judg- 
ments : I do not know whether this is so or not 
But in any case there can be no doubt that we 
make them exceedingly commonly. And even a 
blind man, or a man in the dark, can and does, very 
frequently, make judgments of the second kind — 
judgments about things which he is feeling with his 
hands. All of us, for instance, at almost any 
moment of our waking life, whether we are in the 
dark or not, have only to feel certain parts of our 
own bodies or of our clothes, in order to make, with 
Teat certainty, such judgments as "This is a 
inger," "This is a nose," "This is cloth." And 
similarly I have only to feel in my pockets to judge, 
with regard to objects which I meet with there, 
such things as " This is a coin," " This is a pencil," 
"This is a pipe." 

Judgments of this kind would, I think, commonly, 
and rightly, be taken to be judgments, the truth of 
which involves the existence of material things or 
physical objects. If I am right in judging that this 
is an inkstand, it follows that there is at least one 
inkstand in the Universe; and if there is an ink- 
stand in the Universe, it follows that there is in it 
at least one material thing or physical object This 



222 SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

may, of course, be disputed. Berkeley, if I under- 
stand him rightly, was clearly of opinion that there 
was no inconsistency in maintaining that there were 
in the Universe thousands of inkstands and trees 
and stones and stars, and that yet there was in it 
no such thing as matter. And perhaps the defini- 
tion of matter, which he adopted, was such that 
there really was no inconsistency in maintaining this. 
Perhaps, similarly, other philosophers have some- 
times adopted definitions of the expressions 
11 material things 91 and "physical objects," which 
were such that all the judgments of this kind that 
we make might quite well be true, without its being 
true that there are in the Universe any material 
things whatever. Perhaps, even, there may be 
some justification for adopting definitions of those 
terms which would yield the surprising result that 
we may, with perfect consistency, maintain that the 
world is full of minerals and vegetables and animals, 
of all sorts of different kinds, and that yet there is 
not to be found in it a single material thing. I do 
not know whether there is or is not any utility in 
using the terms " material thing" or "physical 
object " in such a sense as this. But, whether there 
is or not, I cannot help thinking that there is ample 
justification for using them in another sense — a 
sense in which from the proposition that there are 
in the Universe such things as inkstands or fingers 
or clouds, it strictly follows that there are in it at 
least as many material things, and in which, there- 
fore, we can not consistently maintain the existence 
of inkstands, fingers, and clouds, while denying 
that of material things. The kinds of judgment 
which I have mentioned, and thousands of others 
which might easily be mentioned, are obviously all 
of the same sort in one very important respect — a 
respect in which, for instance, such judgments as 
" This is an emotion," " This is a judgment," " This 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 223 

is a colour," are not of the same sort as they are. 
And it seems to me that we are certainly using the 
term " material thing " in a correct and useful way, 
if we express this important common property 
which they have, by saying that of each of them 
the same can truly be said as was said of the judg- 
ment " That is an inkstand " : that, just as from the 
proposition " There is an inkstand " it follows that 
there is at least one material thing, so from the 
proposition " There is a tablecloth," it follows that 
there is at least one material thing; and similarly 
in all the other cases. We can certainly use the 
expression "Things such as inkstands, tablecloths, 
fingers, clouds, stars, etc.," to mean things such as 
these in a certain very important respect, which we 
all understand, though we may not be able to define 
it. And the term " material thing " certainly is and 
can be correctly used to mean simply things such 
as these in that respect — whatever it may be. 
Some term is certainly required to mean merely 
things such as these in that important respect ; ana, 
so far as I can see, there is no term which can be 
naturally used in this sense except the term 
"material things" and its equivalents. Thus 
understood, the term "material thing" certainly 
does stand for an important notion, which requires 
a name. 

And, if we agree to use the term in this sense, 
then it is obvious that no more can be necessary for 
the truth of the assertion that there are material 
things, than is necessary for the truth of 
judgments of the kind with which I propose to 
deal. But no more can be necessary for the truth 
of these judgments than is actually asserted in or 
logically implied by them. And if we approach the 
question what is necessary for the truth of the 
assertion that there are material things, by asking 
what it is that we actually assert when we make 



aa 4 SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

such judgments as these, certain reasons for doubting 
how much is necessary are, I think, brought out 
much more clearly, than if we approach the question 
in any other way. Many philosophers have told us 
a very great deal as to what they suppose to be 
involved in the existence of material things ; and 
some, at least, among them seem to have meant by 
" material things " such things as inkstands, fingers 
and clouds. But I can think of only one type of 
view as to the constitution of material things, which 
is such that it is tolerably clear what answer those 
who hold it would give to the simple question ; 
What is it that I am judging, when I judge, as I 
now do, that that is an ink-stand? The type of 
view I mean is that to which the view that Mill 
suggests, when he explains what he means by saying 
that Matter is a Permanent Possibility of Sensation, 
and also the view or views which Mr. Russell seems 
to suggest in his " Our Knowledge of the External 
World," seem to belong. In the case of views of 
this kind, it is, I think, tolerably clear what answer 
those who hold them would give to all the questions 
I want to raise about judgments of the kind I have 
described. But it does not seem to me at all certain 
that any view of this type is true; and certainly 
many philosophers have held and do hold that au 
views of this type are false. But in the case of 
those who do hold them to be false, I do not know, 
in any single case, what answer would be given to 
all the questions which I want to raise. In the case 
of philosophers, who do not accept any view of the 
Mill-Russell type, none, so far as I know, has made 
it clear what answer he would give to all my 
questions : some have made it clear what answer 
they would give to some of them ; but many, I think, 
have not even made it clear what answer they would 
give to any. Perhaps there is some simple and 
satisfactory answer, which has escaped me, that such 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 225 

philosophers could give to all my questions ; but I 
cannot help thinking that assumptions as to the 
nature of material things have too often been made, 
without its even occurring to those who made them 
to ask, what, if they were true, we could be judging 
when we make such judgments as these ; and that, 
if this question had been asked, it would have become 
evident that those assumptions were far less certain 
than they appeared to be. 

I do not know that there is any excuse whatever 
for calling all judgments of the kind I mean " judg- 
ments of perception." All of them are, of course, 
judgments about things which we are at the moment 
perceiving, since, by definition, they are judgments 
about things which we are seeing or feeling with our 
hands; and all of them are, no doubt, also based 
upon something which we perceive about the thing 
in question. But the mere fact that a judgment is 
both about a thing which I am perceiving, and also 
based upon something which I perceive about that 
thing, does not seem to be a sufficient reason for 
calling it a judgment of perception ; and I do not 
know that there is any other reason than this for 
calling all judgments of the kind 1 mean judgments 
of perception. I do not want therefore, to assert 
that all of them are so. But it seems to me quite 
plain that enormous numbers of them are so, in a 
perfectly legitimate sense. This judgment, which I 
now make, to the effect that that is a door, seems 
to me quite plainly to be a judgment of perception, 
in the simple sense that I make it because I do, 
in fact, see that that is a door, and assert in it no 
more than what I see ; and what I see I, of course, 
perceive. In every case in which I judge, with 
regard to something which I am seeing or feeling 
with my hands, that it is a so-and-so, simply because 
I do perceive, by sight or touch, that it is in fact a 
thing of that kind, we can, I think, fairly say that 
p 



226 SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

the judgment in question is a judgment of perception. 
And enormous numbers of judgments of the kind I 
mean are, quite plainly, judgments of perception in 
this sense. They are not all, for the simple reason 
that some of them are mistaken. I may, for instance, 
judge, with regard to an animal which I see at a 
distance, that it is a sheep, when in fact it is a pig. 
And here my judgment is certainly not due to the 
fact that I see it to be a sheep; since I cannot 
possibly see a thing to be a sheep, unless it is one. 
It, therefore, is not a judgment of perception in this 
sense. And moreover, even where such a judgment 
is true, it may not always be a judgment of percep- 
tion, for the reason that, whereas I only see the 
thing in question, the kind of thing which I judge it 
to be is of such a nature, that it is impossible for 
any one, by sight alone, to perceive anything to be 
of that kind. How to draw the line between 
judgments of this kind, which are judgments of 
perception, and those which are not, I do not know. 
That is to say, I do not know what conditions must 
be fulfilled^ in order that I may be truly said to be 
perceiving, by sight or touch, such things as that 
that is a door, this is a finger, and not merely 
inferring them. Some people may no doubt think 
that it is very unphilosophical in me to say that we 
ever can perceive such things as these. But it 
seems to me that we do, in ordinary life, constantly 
talk of seeing such things, and that, when we do so, 
we are neither using language incorrectly, nor 
making any mistake about the facts — supposing 
something to occur which never does in fact occur. 
The truth seems to me to be that we are using the 
term "perceive" in a way which is both perfectly 
correct and expresses a kind of thing which con- 
stantly does occur, only that some philosophers have 
not recognised that this is a correct usage of the 
term and have not been able to define it I am not, 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 227 

therefore, afraid to say that I do now perceive that 
that is a door, and that that is a finger. Only, of 
course, when I say that I do, I do not mean to 
assert that part of what I "perceive," when I 
"perceive" these things, may not be something 
which, in an important sense, is known to me only 
by inference. It would be very rash to assert that 
44 perception," in this sense of the word, entirely 
excludes inference. All that seems to me certain 
is that there is an important and useful sense of 
the word "perception," which is such that the 
amount and kind of inference, if inference there be, 
which is involved in my present perception that 
that is a door, is no bar to the truth of the assertion 
that I do perceive that it is one. Vast numbers, 
then, of the kind of judgments with which I propose 
to deal seem to me to be, in an important and legiti- 
mate sense, judgments of perception ; although I 
am not prepared to define, any further than I have 
done, what that sense is. And though it is true 
that the questions which I shall raise apply just as 
much to those of them which are not judgments of 
perception as to those which are, it is, of course, 
also true that they apply just as much to those 
which are as to those which are not ; so that I shall 
be really dealing with a large and important class 
among judgments of perception. 

It is true that, if certain views which, if I under- 
stand them rightly, some philosophers have seriously 
entertained, were true ones, it would be quite 
impossible that any of them should be judgments of 
perception. For some philosophers seem to me to 
nave denied that we ever do in fact know such 
things as these, and others not only that we ever 
know them but also that they are ever true. And, 
if, in fact, I never do know such a thing, or if it is 
never true, it will of course, follow that I never 
perceive such a thing; since I certainly cannot, in this 



228 SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

sense, perceive anything whatever, unless I both 
know it and it is true. But it seems to me a 
sufficient refutation of such views as these, simply 
to point to cases in which we do know such things. 
This, after all, you know, really is a finger : there is 
no doubt about it : I know it, and you all know it. 
And I think we may safely challenge any philoso- 
pher to bring forward any argument in favour either 
of the proposition that we do not know it, or of the 
proposition that it is not true, which does not at 
some point, rest upon some premiss which is, 
beyond comparison, less certain than is the proposi- 
tion which it is designed to attack. The questions 
whether we do ever know such things as these, and 
whether there are any material things, seem to me, 
therefore, to be questions which there is no need to 
take seriously : they are questions which it is quite 
easy to answer, with certainty, in the affirmative. 
What does, I think, need to be taken seriously, and 
what is really dubious, is not the question, whether 
this is a finger, or whether I know that it is, but the 
question what, in certain respects, I am knowing, 
when I know that it is. And this is the question to 
which I will now address myself. 

To begin with there is one thing which seems to 
me to be very certain indeed about such judgments. 
It is unfortunately a thing which I do not know how 
properly to express. There seem to me to be 
objections to every way of expressing it which I can 
think of. But I hope I may be able to make my 
meaning clear, in spite of the inadequacy of my 
expression. The thing I mean is a thing which 
may to some people seem so obvious as to be 
scarcely worth saying. But I cannot help thinking 
that it is not always clearly recognised, and even 
that some philosophers, to judge from what they say, 
might perhaps dispute it. It seems to me to be 
an assumption which is silently made in many 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 229 

treatments of the subject, and, as I say, it seems to 
me to be very certain indeed But I think it is at 
all events worth while to try to make the assumption 
explicit, in case it should be disputed. If it really 
is not true, then the other questions to which I shall 
go on, and which seem to me really dubious and 
difficult, do not, I think, arise at all. 

I will try to express this fundamental assumption, 
which seems to me so very certain, by saying it is 
the assumption that, in all cases in which I make a 
judgment of this sort, I have no difficulty whatever 
in picking out a thing, which is, quite plainly, in a 
sense in which nothing else is, the thing about 
which I am making my judgment ; and that yet, 
though this thing is the thing about which I am 
judging, I am, quite certainly, not, in general, 
judging with regard to it, that it is a thing of that 
kind for which the term, which seems to express 
the predicate of my judgment, is a name. Thus, 
when I judge, as now, that That is an inkstand, I 
have no difficulty whatever in picking out, from 
what, if you like, you can call my total field of 
presentation at the moment, an object, which is 
undoubtedly, in a sense in which nothing else is, the 
object about which I am making this judgment ; 
and yet it seems to me quite certain that of this 
object I am not judging that it is a whole inkstand. 
And similarly when I judge, with regard to some- 
thing which I am feeling in my pocket, " This is a 
coin," I have no difficulty in picking out, from my 
field of presentation, an object, which is undoubtedly 
the object with which my judgment is concerned ; 
and yet I am certainly not judging with regard to 
this object that it is a whole coin. I say that always, 
when I make such a judgment, I can pick out the 
one, among the objects presented to me at the time, 
about which I am making it ; but I have only said 
that in general I am not judging with regard to this 



230 SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

object that it is a thing of the kind, for which the 
term, which seems to express the predicate of my 
judgment, is a name. And I have limited my 
second proposition in this way, because there are 
cases, in which it does not, at first sight, seem quite 
so certain that I am not doing this, as in the two 
instances I have just given. When, for instance, I 
judge with regard to something, which I am seeing, 
" This is a soap-bubble," or " This is a drop of 
water," or even when I judge "This is a spot of 
ink," it may not seem quite so plain, that I may not 
be judging, with regard to the very object presented 
to me, that it is, itself, a whole soap-bubble, a whole 
drop of water, or a whole spot of ink, as it always 
is, in the case of an inkstand, or a coin, that I never 
take the presented object, about which I am judging, 
to be a whole inkstand, or a whole coin. The sort 
of reason why I say this will, of course, be obvious 
to any one, and it is obviously of a childish order. 
But I cannot say that it seems to me quite obvious 
that in such a case I am not judging of the 
presented object that it is a whole drop of water, in 
the way in which it does seem to be obvious that I 
am not judging of this presented object that it is an 
inkstand. That is why I limit myself to saying that, 
in general, when I judge " That is a so-and-so " I 
am not judging with regard to the presented object, 
about which my judgment is that it is a thing of the 
kind in question. As much as this seems to me to 
be a thing which any child can see. Nobody will 
suppose, for a moment, that when he judges such 
things as " This is a sofa," or " This is a tree," he is 
judging, with regard to the presented object about 
which his judgment plainly is, that it is a whole sofa 
or a whole tree : he can, at most, suppose that he is 
judging it to be a part of the surface of a sofa or a 
part of the surface of a tree. And. certainly in the 
case of most judgments of this kind which we make, 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 231 

whether in the case of all or not, this is plainly the 
case : we are not judging, with regard to the 
presented object about which our judgment plainly 
is, that it is a thing of the kind, for which the term 
which appears to express the predicate of our 
judgment, is a name. And that this should be true 
of most judgments of this kind, whether of all or not, 
is quite sufficient for my purpose. 

This much, then, seems to me to be very certain 
indeed. But I will try to make clearer exactly what 
I mean by it, by mentioning a ground on which I 
imagine it might perhaps be disputed. 

The object of which I have spoken as the object, 
about which, in each particular case, such a judg- 
ment as this always is a judgment, is, of course, 
always an object of the kind which some philoso- 
phers would call a sensation, and others would call 
a sense-datum. Whether all philosophers, when 
they talk of sensations, mean to include among 
them such objects as these, I do not know. Some, 
who have given a great deal of attention to the 
subject, and for whom I have a great respect, talk 
of sensations in such a way, that I cannot be sure 
what they are talking about at all or whether there 
are such things. But many, I think, undoubtedly 
do mean to include such subjects as these. No 
doubt, in general, when they call them sensations, 
they mean to attribute to them properties, which 
it seems to me extremely doubtful whether they 
possess. And perhaps even those who call them 
sense-data, may, in part, be attributing to them 
properties which it may be doubtful whether they 
possess. If we want to define a sensation or a 
sense-datum, in a manner which will leave it not 
open to doubt what sort of things we are talking of, 
and that there are such things, I do not know that 
we can do it better than by saying that sense-data 
are the sort of things, about which such judgments 



232 SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

as these always seem to be made — the sort of things 
which seem to be the real or ultimate subjects of all 
such judgments. Such a way of defining how the 
term " sense-datum " is used, may not seem very 
satisfactory ; but I am inclined to think it may be 
as satisfactory as any which can be found And it 
is certainly calculated to obviate some misunder- 
standings which may arise ; since everybody can 
see, I think, what the thing is which I am describing 
as the thing about which he is making his judgment, 
when he judges "That is an inkstand/' and that 
there is such a thing, even if he does not agree that 
this description applies to it. 

I can, in fact, imagine that some of those who 
would call this thing a sensation would deny that 
my judgment is about it at all. It would sometimes 
be spoken of as the sensation which mediates my 
perception of this inkstand in this instance. And 
I can imagine that some of those who would so 
speak of it might be inclined to say that when I 
judge " This is an inkstand," my judgment is about 
this inkstand which I perceive, and not, in any 
sense at all, about the sensation which mediates my 
perception of it They may perhaps imagine that 
the sensation mediates my perception of the ink- 
stand only in the sense that it brings the inkstand 
before my mind in such a way that, once it is before 
my mind, I can make a judgment about it, which is 
not a judgment about the mediating sensation at 
all ; and that such a judgment is the one I am 
actually expressing when I say "This is an ink- 
stand." Such a view, if it is held, seems to me to 
be quite certainly false, and is what I have intended 
to deny. And perhaps I can put most clearly the 
reason why it seems to me false, by saying that, if 
(which may be doubted) there is anything which is 
this inkstand, that thing is certainly not given to 
me independently of this sense-datum, in such a 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 233 

sense that I can possibly make a judgment about 
it which is not a judgment about this sense-datum. 
I am not, of course, denying that I do perceive this 
inkstand, and that my judgment is, in a sense, a 
judgment about it. Both these things seem to me 
to be quite obviously true. I am only maintaining 
that my judgment is also, in another sense, a judg- 
ment about this sense-datum which mediates my 
perception of the inkstand. Those who say that 
this sense-datum does mediate my perception of the 
inkstand, would, of course, admit that my percep- 
tion of the inkstand is, in a sense, dependent upon 
the sense-datum ; that it is dependent is implied in 
the mere statement that it is mediated by it But 
it might be maintained that it is dependent on it 
only in the sense in which, when the idea of one 
object is called up jn my mind, through association, 
by the idea of another, the idea which is called up 
is dependent on the idea which calls it up. What 
I wish to maintain, and what seems to me to be 
quite certainly true, is that my perception of this 
inkstand is dependent on this sense-datum, in a 
quite different and far more intimate sense than 
this. It is dependent on it in the sense that, if 
there is anything which is this inkstand, then, in 
perceiving that thing, I am knowing it only as the 
thing which stands in a certain relation to this 
sense-datum. When the idea of one object is 
called up in my mind by the idea of another, I do 
not know the second object only 2^ the thing which 
has a certain relation to the first : on the contrary, 
I can make a judgment about the second object, 
which is not a judgment about the first. And 
similarly in the case of two sense-data which are 
presented to me simultaneously, I do not know the 
one only as a thing which has a certain relation to 
the other. But in the case of this sense-datum and 
this inkstand the case seems to me to be plainly 



234 SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

quite different. If there be a thing which is this 
inkstand at all, it is certainly only known to me as 
the thing which stands in a certain relation to this 
sense-datum. It is not given to me, in the sense 
in which this sense-datum is given. If there be 
such a thing at all, it is quite certainly only known 
to me by description, in the sense in which Mr. 
Russell uses that phrase ; and the description by 
which it is known is that of being the thing which 
stands to this sense-datum in a certain relation. 
That is to say, when I make such a judgment as 
" This inkstand is a good big one " ; what I am 
really judging is : " There is a thing which stands 
to this in a certain relation, and which is an ink- 
stand, and that thing is a good big one" — where 
"this" stands for this presented object. I am 
referring to or identifying the thing which is this 
inkstand, if there be such a thing at all, only as the 
thing which stands to this sense-datum in a certain 
relation ; and hence my judgment, though in one 
sense it may be said to be a judgment about the 
inkstand, is quite certainly also, in another sense, a 
judgment about this sense-datum. This seems to 
me so clear, that I wonder how anyone can deny 
it ; and perhaps nobody would. But I cannot help 
thinking that it is not clear to everybody ; partly 
because, so far as I can make out, nobody before 
Mr. Russell had pointed out the extreme difference 
there is between a judgment about a thing known 
only by description to the individual who makes 
the judgment, and a judgment about a thing not 
known to him only in this way ; and partly because 
so many people seem still utterly to have failed to 
understand what the distinction is which he ex- 
presses in this way. I will try to make the point 
clear, in a slightly different way. Suppose I am 
seeing two coins, lying side by side, and am not 
perceiving them in any other way except by sight. 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 235 

It will be plain to everybody, I think, that, when I 
identify the one as "This one" and the other as 
"That one," I identify them only by reference to 
the two visual presented objects, which correspond 
respectively to the one and to the other. But what 
may not, I think, be realised, is that the sense in 
which I identify them by reference to the corre- 
sponding sense-data, is one which involves that 
every judgment which I make about the one is a 
judgment about the sense-datum which corresponds 
to it, and every judgment I make about the other, 
a judgment about the sense-datum which corre- 
sponds to it : I simply cannot make a judgment 
about either, which is not a judgment about the 
corresponding sense-datum. But if the two coins 
were given to me, in the sense in which the two 
sense-data are, this would certainly not be the case. 
I can identify and distinguish the two sense-data 
directly, this as this one, and that as that one : I do 
not need to identify either as the thing which has 
this relation to this other thing. But I certainly 
cannot thus directly identify the two coins. I have 
not four things presented to me (1) this sense* 
datum, (2) that sense-datum, (3) this coin, and (4) 
that coin, but two only — this sense-datum and that 
sense-datum. When, therefore, I judge " This is a 
coin," my judgment is certainly a judgment about 
the one sense-datum, and when I judge " And that 
is also a coin," it is certainly a judgment about the 
other. Only, in spite of wnat my language might 
seem to imply, I am certainly not judging either of 
the one sense-datum that it is a whole coin, nor yet 
of the other that it is one. 

This, then, seems to me fundamentally certain 
about judgments of this kind. Whenever we make 
such a judgment we can easily pick out an object 
(whether we call it a sensation or a sense-datum, or 
not), which is, in an easily intelligible sense, ths 



236 SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

object which is the real or ultimate subject of our 
judgment ; and yet, in many cases at all events, 
what we are judging with regard to this object is 
certainly not that it is an object of the kind, for 
which the term which appears to express the predi- 
cate of our judgment is a name. 

But if this be so, what is it that I am judging, in 
all such cases, about the presented object, which is 
the real or ultimate subject of my judgment ? It is 
at this point that we come to questions which seem 
to me to be really uncertain and difficult to answer. 

To begin with, there is one answer which is 
naturally suggested by the reason I have given for 
saying that, in this case, it is quite obvious that I 
am not judging, with regard to this presented object, 
that it is an inkstand, whereas it is not in the same 
way, quite obvious that, in making such a judgment 
as " This is a soap-bubble " or " This is a drop of 
water," I may not be judging, of the object about 
which my judgment is, that that very object really is 
a soap-bubble or a drop of water. The reason I 
gave is that it is quite obvious that I do not take 
this presented object to be a whole inkstand : that, 
at most, I only take it to be part of the surface of 
an inkstand. And this reason naturally suggests 
that the true answer to our question may be that 
what I am judging of the presented object is just 
that it is a part of the surface of an inkstand. This 
answer seems to me to be obviously on quite a 
different level from the suggestion that I am judging 
it really to be an inkstand It is not childishly 
obvious that I am not judging it to be part of the 
surface of an inkstand, as it is that I am not judging 
it to be an inkstand — a whole one. 

On this view, when I say such things as " That 
is an inkstand," " That is a door," " This is a coin," 
these expressions would really only be a loose way 
of saying " That is part of tne surface of an ink- 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 237 

stand/' "That is part of the surface of a door," 
"This is part of the surface of a coin." And there 
would, I think, plainly be nothing surprising in the 
fact that we should use language thus loosely. 
What, at first sight, appears to be a paradox, namely 
that, whereas I appear to be asserting of a given 
thing that it is of a certain kind, I am not really 
asserting of the thing in question that it is of that 
kind at all, would be susceptible of an easy ex- 
planation. And moreover, if this view were true, 
it would offer an excellent illustration of the 
difference between a thing known only by description 
and a thing not so known, and would show how 
entirely free from mystery that distinction is. On 
this view, when I judge " That inkstand is a good 
big one " I shall in effect be judging : " There is 
one and only one inkstand of which this is part of 
the surface, and the inkstand of which this is true is 
a good big one." It would be quite clear that the 
part of the surface of the inkstand was given to me 
in a sense in which the whole was not, just as it is 
in fact clear that I do now " see " this part of the 
surface of this inkstand, in a sense in which I do 
not " see " the whole ; and that my judgment, 
while it is, in fact, about both the whole inkstand, 
and also about one particular part of its surface, is 
about them in two entirely different senses. 

This view is one, which it is at first sight, I 
think, very natural to suppose to be true. But 
before giving the reasons, why, nevertheless, it 
seems to me extremely doubtful, I think it is 
desirable to try to explain more precisely what I 
mean by it The word "part" is one which is 
often used extremely vaguely in philosophy ; and I 
can imagine that some people would be willing to 
assent to the proposition that this sense-datum rtally 
is, in some sense or other, a "part 1 ' of this ink- 
stand, and that what I am judging with regard to 



238 SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

it, when I judge " This is an inkstand," is, in effect, 
41 There is an inkstand, of which this is a part," who 
would be far from allowing that this can possibly be 
what I am judging, when once they understand 
what the sense is in which I am here using the word 
" part." What this sense is, I am quite unable to 
define ; but I hope I may be able to make my 
meaning sufficiently clear, by giving instance^ of 
things which are undoubtedly "parts" of other 
things in the sense in question. There is, it seems 
to me, a sense of the word " part," in which we all 
constantly use the word with perfect precision, and, 
which, therefore, we all understand very well, how- 
ever little we may be able to define it It is the 
sense in which the trunk of any tree is undoubtedly 
a part of that tree ; in which this finger of mine is 
undoubtedly a part of my hand, and my hand a part 
of my body. This is a sense in which every part of 
a material thing or physical object is itself a material 
thing or physical object ; and it is, so far as I can 
see, the only proper sense in which a material thing 
can be said to have parts. The view which I wish 
to discuss is the view that I am judging this 
presented object to be a part of an inkstand, in this 
sense. And the nature of the view can perhaps be 
brought out more clearly, by mentioning one 
important corollary which would follow from it I 
am, of course, at this moment, seeing many parts of 
the surface of this inkstand. But all these parts, 
except one, are, in fact, themselves parts of that 
one. That one is the one of which we should 
naturally speak as " the part of the surface that I 
am now seeing " or as <( this part of the surface of 
this inkstand." There is only one part of the 
surface of this inkstand, which does thus contain, as 
parts, all the other parts that I am now seeing. 
And, if it were true that I am judging this presented 
object to be a part of the surface of an inkstand at 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 239 

all, in the sense I mean, it would follow that this 
presented object must, if my judgment " This is an 
inkstand" be true (as it certainly is}, be identical 
with this part, which contains all the other parts 
which I am seeing ; since there is plainly no other 
part with which it could possibly be identified 
That is to say, if I am really judging of this 
presented object that it is part of the surface of an 
inkstand, in the sense I mean, it must be the case 
that everything which is true of what I should call 
" this part of the surface of this inkstand " is, in 
fact, true of this presented object 

This view, therefore, that what we are judging 
of the ultimate subject of our judgment, when we 
judge "This is a so-and-so, 1 ' is, in general, merely 
that the subject in question is a part of a thing of 
the kind in question, can, I think, be most clearly 
discussed, by asking whether, in this case, this 
presented object can really be identical with this 
part of the surface of this inkstand. If it can't, then 
most certainly I am not judging of it that it is a 
part of the surface of an inkstand at all. For my 
judgment, whatever it is, is true. And yet, if this 
presented object is not identical with this part of the 
surface of this inkstand, it certainly is not a part of 
an inkstand at all ; since there is no other part, 
either of this inkstand or of any other, with which 
it could possibly be supposed to be identical. 

Can we, then, hold that this sense-datum really 
is identical with this part of the surface of this 
inkstand? That everything which is true of the 
one is true of the other ? 

An enormous number of very familiar arguments 
have been used by various philosophers, which, if 
they were sound, would show that we can not 
Some of these arguments seem to me to be quite 
clearly not sound — all, for instance, which rest either 
on the assumption that this sense-datum can only 



2 4 o SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

exist so long as it is perceived, or on the assumption 
that it can only exist so long as it is perceived by 
me. Of others I suspect that they may have some 
force, though I am quite unable to see that they 
have any. Such, for instance, are all those which 
assume either that this sense-datum is a sensation 
or feeling of mine, in a sense which includes the 
assertion that it is dependent on my mind in the 
very same sense in which my perception of it 
obviously is so ; or that it is causally dependent on 
my body in the sense in which my perception of it 
admittedly is so. But others do seem to me to 
have great force. I will, however, confine myself 
to trying to state one, which seems to me to have 
as much as any. It will be found that this one 
involves an assumption, which does seem to me to 
have great force, but which yet seems to me to 
be doubtful. So far as I know, all good arguments 
against the view that this sense-datum really is 
identical with this part of the surface of the inkstand, 
do involve this same assumption, and have no more 
force than it has. But in this, of course, I may be 
wrong. Perhaps some one will be able to point out 
an argument, which is obviously quite independent 
of it, and which yet has force. 

The argument I mean involves considerations 
which are exceedingly familiar, so familiar that I am 
afraid every one may be sick of hearing them 
alluded to. But, in spite of this fact, it seems to me 
not quite easy to put it quite precisely, in a way 
which will distinguish it clearly from other arguments 
involving the same familiar considerations, but 
which do not seem to me to be equally cogent. I 
want, therefore, to try to put it with a degree of 
precision, which will prevent irrelevant objections 
from being made to it— objections which would, I 
think, be relevant against some of these other 
arguments, but are not, I think, relevant against it 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 241 

The fact is that we all, exceedingly commonly, 
when, at each of two times, separated by a longer 
or shorter interval, we see a part of the surface of a 
material thing, in the sense in which I am now 
seeing this part of the surface of this inkstand, or 
when at one time we see such a surface and at 
another perceive one by touch, make, on the second 
occasion, the judgment " This part of a surface is 
the same part of the surface of the same thing, as 
that which I was seeing (or perceiving by touch) 
just now." How commonly we all do this can 
scarcely be exaggerated. I look at this inkstand, 
and then I look again, and on the second occasion I 
judge "This part of the surface of this inkstand is 
the same as, or at least contains a part which is the 
same as a part of, the part of its surface which I 
was seeing just now." Or I look at this finger and 
then I touch it, and I judge, on the second occasion, 
11 This part of the surface of this finger is the same 
as one of those I was seeing just now." We all 
thus constantly identify a part of a surface of a 
material thing which we are perceiving at one 
time with a part which we were perceiving at 
another. 

Now, when we do this — when we judge " This is 
the same part of the same thing as 1 was seeing or 
touching just now," we, of course, do not mean to 
exclude the possibility that the part in question may 
have changed during the interval ; that it is really 
different, on the second occasion, either in shape or 
size or quality, or in all three, from what it was on 
the first. That is to say, the sense of sameness 
which we are here concerned with is one which 
clearly does not exclude change. We may even be 
prepared to assert, on general grounds, in all such 
cases, that the surface in question certainly must 
have changed. But nevertheless there is a great 
difference in one respect, between two kinds of such 




242 SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

cases, both of which occur exceedingly commonly. 
If I watch somebody blowing air into a child's 
balloon, it constantly happens, at certain stages in 
the process, that I judge with regard to the part of 
the surface which I am seeing at that stage, not 
only that it is larger than it was at an earlier stage, 
but that it is perceptibly larger. Or, if I pull die 
face of an india-rubber doll, I may judge at a certain 
stage in the process that the patch of red colour on 
its cheek not only is different in shape from what it 
was at the beginning, but is perceptibly so ; it may, 
for instance, be a perceptibly flatter ellipse than it 
was to start with. Or, if I watch a person blushing, 
I may judge at a certain stage that a certain part of 
the surface of his face not only is different in colour 
from what it was, when I saw it before he began to 
blush, but is perceptibly so — perceptibly redder. In 
enormous numbers of cases we do thus judge of a 
surface seen at a given time that it is thus perceptibly 
different in size, or in shape, or in colour, from what 
it was when we saw it before. But cases are at 
least equally numerous in which, though we might, 
on general grounds be prepared to assert that it 
must have changed in some respect, we should not 
be prepared to assert that it had, in any respect 
whatever, changed perceptibly. Of this part of this 
surface of this inkstand, for instance, I am certainly 
not prepared to assert that it is now perceptibly 
different in any respect from what it was when I 
saw it just now. And similar cases are so numerous 
that I need not give further instances. We can, 
therefore, divide cases, in which we judge, of a part 
of a surface which we are seeing, M This is the same 
part of the surface of the same material thing as the 
one I saw just now," into cases where we should 
also judge " But it is perceptibly different from 
what it was then," and cases in which, even though 
we might assert "It must be different," we are 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 243 

certainly not prepared to assert that it is perceptibly 
so. 

But now let us consider the cases in which we are 
not prepared to assert that the surface in question 
has changed perceptibly. The strange fact, from 
which the argument I mean is drawn, is that, in a 
very large number of such cases, it seems as if it 
were unmistakably true that the presented object, 
about which we are making our judgment when we 
talk of " This surface " at the later time, is percep- 
tibly different, from that about which we are making 
it when we talk of the surface I saw just now. If, 
at the later time, I am at a sufficiently greater 
distance from the surface, the presented object which 
corresponds to it at the time seems to be perceptibly 
smaller, than the one which corresponded to it 
before. If I am looking at it from a sufficiently 
oblique angle, the later presented object often seems 
to be perceptibly different in shape — a perceptibly 
flatter ellipse, for instance. If I am looking at it, 
with blue spectacles on, when formerly I had none, 
the later presented object seems to be perceptibly 
different in colour from the earlier one. If I am 
perceiving it by touch alone, whereas formerly I 
was perceiving it by sight alone, the later presented 
object seems to be perceptibly different from the 
earlier, in respect of the fact that it is not coloured 
at all, whereas the earlier was, and that, on the 
other hand, it has certain tactual qualities, which 
the earlier had not got. All this seems to be as 
plain as it can be, and yet it makes absolutely no 
difference to the fact that of the surface in question 
we are not prepared to judge that it is perceptibly 
different from what it was. Sometimes, of course, 
where there seems to be no doubt that the later 
presented object is perceptibly different from the 
earlier, we may not notice that it is so. But even 
where we do notice the apparent difference, we do 



244 SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

still continue to judge of the surface in question : 
This surface is not, so far as I can tell with certainty 
by perception, in any way different from what it 
was when I saw it or touched it just now ; I am not 
prepared to assert that it has changed perceptibly. 
It seems, therefore, to be absolutely impossible that 
the surface seen at the later time should be identical 
with the object presented then, and the surface seen 
at the earlier identical with the object presented 
then, for the simple reason that, whereas with regard 
to the later seen surface I am not prepared to judge 
that it is in any way perceptibly different from that 
seen earlier, it seems that with regard to the later 
sense-datum I cannot fail to judge that it is percep- 
tibly different from the earlier one : the fact that 
they are perceptibly different simply stares me in 
the face. It seems, in short, that when, in such a 
case, I judge : '• This surface is not, so far as I can 
tell, perceptibly different from the one I saw just 
now," I cannot possibly be judging of the presented 
object " This is not, so far as I can tell, perceptibly 
different from that object which was presented to 
me just now," for the simple reason that I can tell, 
as certainly, almost, as I can tell anything, that it 
is perceptibly different. 

That is the argument, as well as I can put it, for 
saying that this presented object, is not identical 
with this part of the surface of this inkstand ; and 
that, therefore, when I judge " This is part of the 
surface of an inkstand," I am not judging of this 
presented object, which nevertheless is the ultimate 
subject of my judgment, that it is part of the surface 
of an inkstand. And this argument does seem to 
me to be a very powerful one. 

But nevertheless it does not seem to me to be 
quite conclusive, because it rests on an assumption, 
which, though it seems to me to have great force, 
does not>seem to me quite certain. The assumption 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 245 

I mean is the assumption that, in such cases as those 
I have spoken of, the later presented object really 
is perceptibly different from the earlier. This 
assumption has, if I am not mistaken, seemed to 
many philosophers to be quite unquestionable ; they 
have never even thought of questioning it ; and 1 
own that it used to be so with me. And I am still 
not sure that I may not be talking sheer nonsense 
in suggesting that it can be questioned. But, if I 
am, I am no longer able to see that I am. What 
now seems to me to be possible is that the sense- 
datum which corresponds to a tree, which I am 
seeing, when I am a mile off, may not really be 
perceived to be smaller than the one, which corres- 
ponds to the same tree, when I see it from a distance 
of only a hundred yards, but that it is only perceived 
to seem smaller ; that the sense-datum which corres- 
ponds to a penny, which I am seeing obliquely, is 
not really perceived to be different in shape from 
that which corresponded to the penny, when I was 
straight in front of it, but is only perceived to seem 
different — that all that is perceived is that the one 
seems elliptical and the other circular; that the 
sense-datum presented to me when I have the blue 
spectacles on is not perceived to be different in 
colour from the one presented to me when I have 
not, but only to seem so ; and finally that the sense- 
datum presented when I touch this finger is not 
perceived to be different in any way from that 
presented to me when I see it, but only to seem so 
— that I do not perceive the one to be coloured and 
the other not to be so, but only that the one seems 
coloured and the other not If such a view is to be 
possible, we shall have, of course, to maintain that 
the kind of experience which I have expressed by 
saying one seems different from the other — u seems 
circular," "seems blue," "seems coloured," and so on 
— involves an ultimate, not further analysable, kind 



246 SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

of psychological relation, not to be identified either 
with that involved in being "perceived" to be so 
and so, or with that involved in being "judged" 
to be so and so ; since a presented object might, in 
this sense, seem to be elliptical, seem to be blue, etc., 
when it is neither perceived to be so, nor judged 
to be so. But there seems to me to be no reason 
why there should not be such an ultimate relation. 
The great objection to such a view seems to me to 
be the difficulty of believing that I don't actually 
perceive this sense-datum to be red, for instance, 
and that other to be elliptical ; that I only perceive, 
in many cases, that it seems so. I cannot, however, 
now persuade myself that it is quite clear that I do 
perceive it to be so. And, if I don't, then it seems 
really possible that this presented object really is 
identical with this part of the surface of this inkstand; 
since, when I judge, as in the cases supposed, that 
the surface in question is not, so far as I can tell, 
perceptibly different from what it was, I might really 
be judging of the two sense-data that they also were 
not, so far as I can tell, perceptibly different, the 
only difference between the two that is perceptible, 
being that the one seems to be of a certain size, shape 
or colour, and the other to be of a different and in- 
compatible size, shape or colour. Of course, in 
those cases, as in that of the balloon being blown up, 
where I " perceive " that the surface has changed, 
e.g. in size, it would have to be admitted that I do 
perceive of the two sense-data not merely that they 
seem different in size, but that they are so. But I 
think it would be possible to maintain that the sense 
in which, in these cases, I " perceive " them to be 
different, is a different one from that in which, both 
in these and in the others, I "perceive them to seem 
so. 

Possibly in making this suggestion that sense- 
data, in cases where most philosophers have 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 247 

assumed unhesitatingly that they are perceived to 
be different, are only really perceived to seem 
different, I am, as I said, talking sheer nonsense, 
though I cannot, at the moment, see that I am. 
And possibly, even if this suggestion itself is not 
nonsense, even if it is true, there may be other fatal 
objections to the view that this presented object 
really is identical with this part of the surface of 
this inkstand. But what seems to me certain is 
that, unless this suggestion is true, then this pre- 
sented object is certainly not identical with this part 
of the surface of this inkstand. And since it is 
doubtful whether it is not nonsense, and still more 
doubtful whether it is true, it must, I think, be 
admitted to be highly doubtful whether the two are 
identical. But, if they are not identical, then what 
I am judging with regard to this presented object, 
when I judge "This is an inkstand," is certainly 
not that it is itself part of the surface of an ink- 
stand ; and hence, it is worth while to inquire 
further, what, if I am not judging this, I can be 
judging with regard to it. 

And here, I think, the first natural suggestion to 
make is that just as, when I talk of " this inkstand," 
what I seem really to mean is "the inkstand of 
which this is part of the surface," so that the ink- 
stand is only known to me by description as the 
inkstand of which this material surface is part of 
the surface, so again when I talk of " this material 
surface," what I really mean is " the material surface 
to which this (presented object) has a certain 
relation," so that this surface is, in its turn, only 
known to me by description as the surface which 
has a certain relation to this presented object If 
that were so, then what I should be judging of this 
presented object, when I judge " This is part of the 
surface of an inkstand," would be not that it is itself 
such a part, but that the thing which stands to it 



248 SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

in a certain relation is such a part : in short, what 

I should be judging with regard to zt f would be 

II There's one thing and one only which stands to 
this in this relation, and the thing which does so is 
part of the surface of an inkstand." 

But if we are to adopt the view that something 
of this sort is what we are judging, there occurs at 
once the pressing question : What on earth can 
the relation be with regard to which we are judging, 
that one and only one thing stands in it to this 
presented object ? And this is a question to which, 
so far as I know, none of those philosophers, who 
both hold (as many do) that this presented object is 
not identical with this part of the surface of this 
inkstand, and also that there really is something of 
which it could be truly predicated that it is this 
part of the surface of this inkstand (that is to say, 
who reject all views of the Mill- Russell type), have 
given anything like a clear answer. It does not 
seem to have occurred to them that it requires an 
answer, chiefly, I think, because it has not occurred 
to them to ask what we can be judging when we 
make judgments of this sort There are only two 
answers, that I can think of, which might be 
suggested with any plausibility. 

Many philosophers, who take the view that the 
presented objects about which we make these judg- 
ments are sensations of ours, and some even who 
do not, are in the habit of talking of " the causes " 
of these objects as if we knew, in the case of each, 
that it had one and only one cause ; and many of 
them seem to think that this part of the surface of 
this inkstand could be correctly described as the 
cause of this presented object. They suggest, 
therefore, the view that what I am judging in this 
case might be : " This presented object has one 
and only one cause, and that cause is part of the 
surface of an inkstand" It seems to me quite 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 249 

obvious that this view, at all events, is utterly un- 
tenable. I do not believe for a moment, nor does 
any one, and certainly therefore do not judge, that 
this presented object has only one cause : I believe 
that it has a whole series of different causes. I do, 
in fact, believe that this part of the surface of this 
inkstand is one among the causes of my perception 
of this presented object : that seems to me to be a 
very well established scientific proposition. And 
I am prepared to admit that there may be good 
reasons for thinking that it is one among the causes 
of this presented object itself, though I cannot 
myself see that there are any. But that it is the 
only cause of this presented object I certainly do 
not believe, nor, I think, does anybody, and hence 
my judgment certainly cannot be " The cause of 
this is part of the surface of an inkstand." It might 
no doubt, be possible to define some kind of causal 
relation, such that it might be plausibly held that it 
and it alone causes this presented object in that 
particular way. But any such definition would, so 
far as I can see, be necessarily very complicated. 
And, even when we have got it, it seems to me it 
would be highly improbable we could truly say that 
what we are judging in these cases is : " This 
presented object has one and only one cause, of this 
special kind." Still, I do not wish to deny that 
some such view may possibly be true. 

The only other suggestion I can make is that 
there may be some ultimate, not further definable 
relation, which we might for instance, call the 
relation of "being a manifestation of," such that we 
might conceivably be judging : " There is one and 
only one thing of which this presented object is a 
manifestation, and that thing is part of the surface 
of an inkstand." And here again, it seems to me 
just possible that this may be a true account of what 
we are judging; only I cannot find the slightest 



250 SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

sign that I am in fact aware of any such 
relation. 

Possibly other suggestions could be made as to 
what the relation is, with regard to which it could 
be plausibly supposed that in all cases, where we 
make these judgments we are in fact judging of the 
presented object " There is one and only one thing 
which stands to this object in this relation." But it 
seems to me at least very doubtful whether there is 
any such relation at all ; whether, therefore, our 
judgment really is of this form, and whether therefore, 
this part of the surface of this inkstand really is known 
to me by description as the thing which stands in a 
certain relation to this presented object But if it 
isn't, and if, also, we cannot take the view that what 
I am judging is that this presented object itself is a 
part of the surface of an inkstand, there would seem 
to be no possible alternative but that we must take 
some view of what I have called the Mill- Russell 
type. Views of this type, if I understand them 
righdy, are distinguished from those which I have 
hitherto considered, by the fact that, according to 
them, there is nothing whatever in the Universe of 
which it could truly be predicated that it is this part 
of the surface of this inkstand, or indeed that it is a 
part of the surface of an inkstand, or an inkstand, at 
all. They hold, in short, that though there are 
plenty of material things in the Universe, there is 
nothing in it of which it could truly be asserted that 
it is a material thing : that, though, when I assert 
" This is an inkstand," my assertion is true, and is 
such that it follows from it that there is in the 
Universe at least one inkstand, and, therefore, at 
least one material thing, yet it does not follow from it 
that there is anything which is a material thing. 
When I judge " This is an inkstand," I am judging 
this presented object to possess a certain property, 
which is such that, if there are things, which possess 



SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 251 

that property, there are inkstands and material things, 
but which is such that nothing which possesses it is 
itself a material thing ; so that in judging that there 
are material things, we are really always judging of 
some other property, which is not that of being a 
material thing, that there are things which possess 
it. It seems to me quite possible, of course, that 
some view of this type is the true one. Indeed, 
this paper may be regarded, if you like, as an 
argument in favour of the proposition that some 
such view must be true. Certainly one of my main 
objects in writing it was to put as plainly as I can 
some grave difficulties which seem to me to stand 
in the way of any other view ; in the hope that 
some of those, who reject all views of the Mill- 
Russell type, may explain clearly which of the 
alternatives I have suggested they would adopt, or 
whether, perhaps, some other which has not occurred 
to me. It does not seem to me to be always 
sufficiently realised how difficult it is to find any 
answer to my question "What are we judging in 
these cases?" to which there are not very 
grave objections, unless we adopt an answer of the 
Mill-Russell type. That an answer of this type is 
the true one, I am not myself, in spite of these 
objections, by any means convinced. The truth is 
I am completely puzzled as to what the true answer 
can be. At the present moment, I am rather 
inclined to favour the view that what I am judging 
of this presented object is that it is itself a part of 
the surface of an inkstand — that, therefore, it really 
is identical with this part of the surface of this 
inkstand, in spite of the fact that this involves the 
view that, where, hitherto, I have always supposed 
myself to be perceiving of two presented objects 
that they really were different, I was, in fact, only 
perceiving that they seemed to be different. But, as 
I have said, it seems to me quite possible that this 



252 SOME JUDGMENTS OF PERCEPTION 

view is, as I have hitherto supposed, sheer nonsense ; 
and, in any case, there are, no doubt, other serious 
objections to the view that this presented object is 
this part of the surface of this inkstand. 



THE CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC 

VALUE 

My main object in this paper is to try to define 
more precisely the most important question, which, 
so far as I can see, is really at issue when it is 
disputed with regard to any predicate of value, 
whether it is or is not a "subjective" predicate. 
There are three chief cases in which this controversy 
is apt to arise. It arises, first, with regard to the 
conceptions of "right" and "wrong," and the 
closely allied conception of " duty ' or " what 
ought to be done." It arises, secondly, with regard 
to " good " and " evil," in some sense of those words 
in which the conceptions for which they stand are 
certainly quite distinct from the conceptions of 
" right " and " wrong," but in which nevertheless it 
is undeniable that ethics has to deal with them. 
And it arises, lastly, with regard to certain aesthetic 
conceptions, such as " beautiful " and "ugly;" or 
"good" and "bad," in the sense in which these 
words are applied to works of art, and in which, 
therefore, the question what is good and bad is a 
question not for ethics but for aesthetics. 

In all three cases there are people who maintain 
that the predicates in question are purely 
"subjective," in a sense which can, I think, be 
fairly easily defined. I am not here going to 
attempt a perfectly accurate definition of the sense 
in question; but, as the term "subjective" is so 
desperately ambiguous, I had better try to indicate 



254 CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 

roughly the sense I am thinking of. Take the 
word " beautiful " for example. There is a sense 
of the term "subjective," such that to say that 
" beautiful " stands for a subjective predicate, means, 
roughly, that any statement of the form " This is 
beautiful" merely expresses a psychological 
assertion to the effect that some particular individual 
or class of individuals either actually has, or would, 
under certain circumstances, have, a certain kind of 
mental attitude towards the thing in question. And 
what I mean by " having a mental attitude " towards 
a thing, can be best explained by saying that to 
desire a thing is to have one kind of mental attitude 
towards it, to be pleased with it is to have another, 
to will it is to have another ; and in short that to have 
any kind of feeling or emotion towards it is to 
have a certain mental attitude towards it— a different 
one in each case. Thus anyone who holds that 
when we say that a thing is beautiful, what we mean 
is merely that we ourselves or some particular class 
of people actually do, or would under certain 
circumstances, have, or permanently have, a certain 
feeling towards the thing in question, is taking a 
" subjective " view of beauty. 

But in all three cases there are also a good many 
people who hold that the predicates in question are 
not, in this sense "subjective"; and I think that 
those who hold this are apt to speak as if the view 
which they wish to maintain in opposition to it 
consisted simply and solely in holding its contra- 
dictory — in holding, that is, that the predicates in 
question are " objective," where "objective" simply 
means the same as " not subjective." But in fact I 
think this is hardly ever really the case. In the 
case of goodness and beauty, what such people are 
really anxious to maintain is by no means merely 
that these conceptions are "objective," but that, 
besides being "objective," they are also, in a sense 



CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 255 

which I shall try to explain, "intrinsic" kinds of 
value. It is this conviction — the conviction that 
goodness and beauty are intrinsic kinds of value, v 
which is, I think, the strongest ground of their 
objection to any subjective view. And indeed, 
when they speak of the " objectivity " of these 
conceptions, what they have in mind is, I believe, 
always a conception which has no proper right to be 
called " objectivity," since it includes as an essential 
part this other characteristic which I propose to call 
that of being an " intrinsic " kind of value. 

The truth is, I believe, that though, from the 
proposition that a particular kind of value is 
" intrinsic " it does follow that it must be " objective," 
the converse implication by no means holds, but on 
the contrary it is perfectly easy to conceive theories 
of eg. "goodness," according to which goodness 1 
would, in the strictest sense, be " objective," and yet 
would not be "intrinsic." There is, therefore, a 
very important difference between the conception of 
€i objectivity," and that which I will call '• internality ;" 
but yet, if I am not mistaken, when people talk 
about the " objectivity " of any kind of value, they 
almost always confuse the two, owing to the fact , 
that most of those who deny the u internality " of a 

fiven kind of value, also assert its "subjectivity." 
low great the difference is, and that it is a fact that 
those who maintain the " objectivity " of goodness 
do, as a rule, mean by this not mere " objectivity," 
but " internality," as well, can, I think, be best 
brought out by considering an instance of a theory, 
according to which goodness would be objective but 
would not be intrinsic. 

Let us suppose it to be held, for instance, that 
what is meant by saying that one type of human 
being A is " better " than another type B, is merely 
that the course of evolution tends to increase the 
numbers of type A and to decrease those of type 



256 CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 

B. Such a view has, in fact, been often suggested, 
even if it has not been held in this exact form ; it 
amounts merely to the familiar suggestion that 
"better" means " better fitted to survive." Ob- 
viously " better," on this interpretation of its mean- 
ing, is in no sense a " subjective " conception : the 
conception of belonging to a type which tends to 
be favoured by the struggle for existence more than 
another is as " objective " as any conception can be. 
But yet, if I am not mistaken, all those who object 
to a subjective view of "goodness," and insist upon its 
"objectivity," would object just as strongly to this 
interpretation of its meaning as to any " subjective " 
interpretation. Obviously, therefore, what they 
are really anxious to contend for is not merely 
that goodness is "objective," since they are here 
objecting to a theory which is "objective;" but 
something else. And this something else is, I 
think, certainly just that it is " intrinsic " — a 
character which is just as incompatible with this 
objective evolutionary interpretation as with any 
and every subjective interpretation. For if you 
say that to call type A " better " than type B means 
merely that it is more favoured in the struggle for 
existence, it follows that the being "better" is a 
predicate which does not depend merely on the 
intrinsic nature of A and B respectively. On the 
contrary, although here and now A may be more 
favoured than B, it is obvious that under other 
circumstances or with different natural laws the 
very same type B might be more favoured than A, 
so that the very same type which, under one set of 
circumstances, is better than B, would, under another 
set, be worse. Here, then, we have a case where 
an interpretation of "goodness," which does make 
it "objective," is incompatible with its being "in- 
trinsic." And it is just this same fact — the fact 
that, on any "subjective" interpretation, the very 



CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 257 

same kind of thing which, under some circumstances, 
is better than another, would, under others, be worse 
— which constitutes, so far as I can see, the funda- 
mental objection to all " subjective " interpretations. 
Obviously, therefore, to express this objection by 
saying that goodness is "objective" is very in- 
correct; since goodness might quite well be "ob- 
jective " and yet not possess the very characteristic 
which it is mainly wished to assert that it has. 

In the case, therefore, of ethical and aesthetic 
"goodness," I think that what those who contend 
for the "objectivity" of these conceptions really 
wish to contend for is not mere " objectivity " at all, 
but principally and essentially that they are intrinsic 
kinds of value. But in the case of "right" and 
"wrong" and "duty," the same cannot be said, 
because many of those who object to the view that 
these conceptions are " subjective," nevertheless do 
not hold that they are "intrinsic." We cannot, 
therefore, say that what those who contend for the 
"objectivity" of right and wrong really mean is 
always chiefly that those conceptions are intrinsic, 
but we can, I think, say that what they do mean 
is certainly not " objectivity " in this case any more 
than the other ; since here, just as there, it would 
be possible to find certain views, which are in 
every sense "objective," to which they would object 
just as strongly as to any subjective view. And 
though what is meant by " objectivity " in this case, 
is not that "right" and "wrong" are themselves 
"intrinsic," what is, I think, meant here too is that 
they have a fixed relation to a kind of value which 
is " intrinsic." It is this fixed relation to an intrinsic 
kind of value, so far as I can see, which gives to 
right and wrong that kind and degree of fixity and 
impartiality which they actually are felt to possess, 
and which is what people are thinking of when they 
talk of their "objectivity." Here, too, therefore, 

R 



258 CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 

to talk of the characteristic meant as " objectivity " 
is just as great a misnomer as in the other cases ; 
since though it is a characteristic which is incom- 
patible with any kind of "subjectivity," it is also 
incompatible, for the same reason, with many kinds 
of "objectivity." 

For these reasons I think that what those who 
contend for the "objectivity" of certain kinds of 
value, or for the "objectivity" of judgments of 
value, commonly have in mind is not really "ob- 
jectivity " at all, but either that the kinds of value in 
question are themselves " intrinsic," or else that they 
have a fixed relation to some kind that is so. The 
conception upon which they really wish to lay 
stress is not that of " objective value," but that of 
" intrinsic value," though they confuse the two. 
And I think this is the case to a considerable extent 
not only with the defenders of so-called "objectivity," 
but also with its opponents. Many of those who 
hold strongly (as many do) that all kinds of value 
are "subjective" certainly object to the so-called 
" objective " view, not so much because it is 
objective^ as because it is not naturalistic or positivistic 
— a characteristic which does naturally follow from 
the contention that value is "intrinsic," but does 
not follow from the mere contention that it is 
" objective." To a view which is at the same time 
both "naturalistic" or "positivistic" and also "ob- 
jective," such as the Evolutionary view which I 
sketched just now, they do not feel at all the same 
kind or degree of objection as to any so-called " ob- 
jective " view. With regard to so-called " objective " 
views they are apt to feel not only that they are false, 
but that they involve a particularly poisonous kind of 
falsehood — the erecting into a " metaphysical " entity 
of what is really susceptible of a simple naturalistic 
explanation. They feel that to hold such a view is 
not merely to make a mistake, but to make a super- 



CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 2*9 

stitious mistake. They feel the same kind of con- 
tempt for those who hold it, which we are apt to 
feel towards those whom we regard as grossly 
superstitious, and which is felt by certain persons 
for what they call "metaphysics." Obviously, 
therefore, what they really object to is not simply 
the view that these predicates are "objective/' but 
something else — something which does not at all 
follow from the contention that they are " objective, " 
but which does follow from the contention that they 
are " intrinsic." 

In disputes, therefore, as to whether particular 
kinds of value are or are not "subjective," I think 
that the issue which is really felt to be important, 
almost always by one side, and often by both, is not 
really the issue between "subjective" and "non- 
subjective," but between "intrinsic" and "non- 
intrinsic." And not only is this felt to be the more 
important issue ; I think it really is so. For the 
difference that must be made to our view of the 
Universe, according as we hold that some kinds of 
value are "intrinsic" or that none are, is much 
greater than any which follows from a mere difference 
of opinion as to whether some are "non-subjective," 
or all without exception " subjective." To hold that 
any kinds of value are " intrinsic " entails the re- 
cognition of a kind of predicate extremely different 
from any we should otherwise have to recognise and 
perhaps unique ; whereas it is in any case certain 
that there are "objective" predicates as well as 
11 subjective." 

But now what is this " internality " of which I 
have been speaking? What is meant by saying 
with regard to a kind of value that it is " intrinsic ? " 
To express roughly what is meant is, I think, 
simple enough ; and everybody will recognise it at 
once, as a notion which is constantly in people's 
heads ; but I want to dwell upon it at some length, 



26o CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 

because I know of no place where it is expressly 
explained and defined, and because, though it 
seems very simple and fundamental, the task of 
defining it precisely is by no means easy and 
involves some difficulties which I must confess that 
I do not know how to solve. 

I have already given incidentally the main idea 
in speaking of that evolutionary interpretation of 
"goodness," according to which, as I said, goodness 
would be "objective" but would not be "intrinsic." 
I there used as equivalent to the assertion that 
'better,' on that definition, would not be 'intrinsic/ 
the assertion that the question whether one type of 
being A was better than another B would not 
depend solely on the intrinsic natures of A and B, 
but on circumstances and the laws of nature. And 
I think that this phrase will in fact suggest to 
everybody just what I do mean by " intrinsic " 
value. We can, in fact, set up the following 
definition. To say that a kind of value is "in- 
trinsic " means merely that the question whether a 
thing possesses it, and in what degree it possesses it % 
depends solely on the intrinsic nature of the thing 
in question. 

But though this definition does, I think, convey 
exactly what I mean, I want to dwell upon its 
meaning, partly because the conception of ' differing 
in intrinsic nature ' which I believe to be of funda- 
mental importance, is liable to be confused with 
other conceptions, and partly because the definition 
involves notions, which I do not know how to 
define exactly. 

When I say, with regard to any particular kind 
of value, that the question whether and in what 
degree anything possesses it depends solely on the 
intrinsic nature of the thing in question, I mean 
to say two different things at the same time. I 
mean to say (i) that it is impossible for what is 



CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 261 

strictly one and the same thing to possess that kind 
of value at one time, or in one set of circumstances, 
and not to possess it at another ; and equally im- 
possible for it to possess it in one degree at one 
time, or in one set of circumstances, and to possess 
it in a different degree at another, or in a different 
set. This, I think, is obviously part of what is 
naturally conveyed by saying that the question 
whether and in what degree a thing possesses the 
kind of value in question always depends solely on 
the intrinsic nature of the thing. For if x and y 
have different intrinsic natures, it follows that x 
cannot be quite strictly one and the same thing as 
y; and hence if x and y can have a different in- 
trinsic value, only where their intrinsic natures are 
different, it follows that one and the same thing 
must always have the same intrinsic value. This, 
then, is part of what is meant ; and about this part 
I think I need say no more, except to call attention 
to the fact that it involves a conception, which as* 
we shall see is also involved in the other part, and 
which involves the same difficulty in both cases — I 
mean, the conception which is expressed by the 
word 'impossible/ (2) The second part of what is 
meant is that if a given thing possesses any kind of 
intrinsic value in a certain degree, then not only 
must that same thing possess it, under all circum- 
stances, in the same degree, but also any- 
thing exactly like it, must, under all circumstances, 
possess it in exactly the same degree. Or to put 
it in the corresponding negative form : It is im- 
possible that of two exactly similar things one should 
possess it and the other not, or that one should 
possess it in one degree, and the other in a different 
one. 

I think this second proposition also is naturally 
conveyed by saying that the kind of value in 
question depends solely on the intrinsic nature of 



262 CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 

what possesses it. For we should naturally say of 
two things which were exactly alike intrinsically, 
in spite of their being two, that they possessed the 
same intrinsic nature. But it is important to call 
attention expressly to the fact that what I mean by 
the expression ' having a different intrinsic nature ' 
is equivalent to ' not exactly alike ' because here 
there is real risk of confusion between this con- 
ception and a different one. This comes about as 
follows. It is natural to suppose that the phrase 
'having a different intrinsic nature' is equivalent 
to the phrase 'intrinsically different' or 'having 
different intrinsic properties.' But, if we do make 
this identification, there is a risk of confusion. 
Fdr it is obvious \ that there is a sense in which, 
when things are exactly like, they must be' intrinsi- 
cally different ' and have different intrinsic properties, 
merely because they are two. For instance, two 
patches of colour may be exactly alike, in spite of 
the fact that each possesses a constituent which the 
other does not possess, provided only that their two 
constituents are exactly alike. And yet, in a 
certain sense, it is obvious that the fact that each has 
a constituent, which the other has not got, does 
constitute an intrinsic difference between them, and 
implies that each has an intrinsic property which the 
other has not got. And even where the two things 
are simple the mere fact that they are numerically 
different does in a sense constitute an intrinsic 
difference between them, and each will have at least 
one intrinsic property which the other has not got 
— namely that of being identical with itself. It is 
obvious therefore that the phrases 'intrinsically 
different ' and ' having different intrinsic properties ' 
are ambiguous. They may be used in such a sense 
that to say of two things that they are intrinsically 
different or have different intrinsic properties does 
not imply that they are not exactly alike, but only 



CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 263 

that they are numerically different. Or they may 
be used in a sense in which two things can be said 
to be intrinsically different, and to have different 
intrinsic properties only when they are not exactly 
alike. It is, therefore, extremely important to insist 
that when I say : Two things can differ in intrinsic 
value, only when they have different intrinsic natures, 
I am using the expression ' having different intrinsic 
natures ' in the latter sense and not the former : — 
in a sense in which the mere fact that two things 
are two, or differ numerically, does not imply that 
they have different intrinsic natures, but in which 
they can be said to have different intrinsic natures, 
only where, besides differing numerically, they are 
also not exactly alike. 

But as soon as this is explained, another risk of 
confusion arises owing to the fact that when 
people contrast mere numerical difference with a 
kind of intrinsic difference, which is not merely 
numerical, they are apt to identify the latter with 
qualitative difference. It might, therefore, easily be 
thought that by 'difference in intrinsic nature' I 
mean 'difference in quality. 1 But this identification 
of difference in quality with difference in intrinsic 
nature would also be a mistake. It is true that 
what is commonly meant by difference of quality, in 
the strict sense, always is a difference of intrinsic 
nature : two things cannot differ in quality without 
differing in intrinsic nature ; and that fact is one of 
the most important facts about qualitative differ- 
ence. But the converse is by no means also true : 
although two things cannot differ in quality without 
differing in intrinsic nature, they can differ in 
intrinsic nature without differing in quality ; or, in 
other words, difference in quality is only one species 
of difference in intrinsic nature. That this is so 
follows from the fact that, as I explained, I am 
using the phrase 'different in intrinsic nature' as 



262 CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 

what possesses it. For we should naturally say of 
two things which were exactly alike intrinsically, 
in spite of their being two, that they possessed the 
same intrinsic nature. But it is important to call 
attention expressly to the fact that what I mean by 
the expression 'having a different intrinsic nature' 
is equivalent to ' not exactly alike ' because here 
there is real risk of confusion between this con- 
ception and a different one. This comes about as 
follows. It is natural to suppose that the phrase 
'having a different intrinsic nature' is equivalent 
to the phrase 'intrinsically different' or 'having 
different intrinsic properties.' But, if we do make 
this identification, there is a risk of confusion. 
Fdr it is obvious v that there is a sense in which, 
when things are exactly like, they must be' intrinsi- 
cally different ' and have different intrinsic properties, 
merely because they are two. For instance, two 
patches of colour may be exactly alike, in spite of 
the fact that each possesses a constituent which the 
other does not possess, provided only that their two 
constituents are exactly alike. And yet, in a 
certain sense, it is obvious that the fact that each has 
a constituent, which the other has not got, does 
constitute an intrinsic difference between them, and 
implies that each has an intrinsic property which the 
other has not got. And even where the two things 
are simple the mere fact that they are numerically 
different does in a sense constitute an intrinsic 
difference between them, and each will have at least 
one intrinsic property which the other has not got 
— namely that of being identical with itself. It is 
obvious therefore that the phrases 'intrinsically 
different ' and ' having different intrinsic properties ' 
are ambiguous. They may be used in such a sense 
that to say of two things that they are intrinsically 
different or have different intrinsic properties does 
not imply that they are not exactly alike, but only 



CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 263 

that they are numerically different. Or they may 
be used in a sense in which two things can be said 
to be intrinsically different, and to have different 
intrinsic properties only when they are not exactly 
alike. It is, therefore, extremely important to insist 
that when I say : Two things can differ in intrinsic 
value, only when they have different intrinsic natures, 
I am using the expression * having different intrinsic 
natures ' in the latter sense and not the former : — 
in a sense in which the mere fact that two things 
are two, or differ numerically, does not imply that 
they have different intrinsic natures, but in which 
they can be said to have different intrinsic natures, 
only where, besides differing numerically, they are 
also not exactly alike. 

But as soon as this is explained, another risk of 
confusion arises owing to the fact that when 
people contrast mere numerical difference with a 
kind of intrinsic difference, which is not merely 
numerical, they are apt to identify the latter with 
qualitative difference. It might, therefore, easily be 
thought that by 'difference in intrinsic nature 1 I 
mean 'difference in quality/ But this identification 
of difference in quality with difference in intrinsic 
nature would also be a mistake. It is true that 
what is commonly meant by difference of quality, in 
the strict sense, always is a difference of intrinsic 
nature : two things cannot differ in quality without 
differing in intrinsic nature ; and that fact is one of 
the most important facts about qualitative differ- 
ence. But the converse is by no means also true : 
although two things cannot differ in quality without 
differing in intrinsic nature, they can differ in 
intrinsic nature without differing in quality ; or, in 
other words, difference in quality is only one species 
of difference in intrinsic nature. That this is so 
follows from the fact that, as I explained, I am 
using the phrase 'different in intrinsic nature' as 



262 CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 

what possesses it. For we should naturally say of 
two things which were exactly alike intrinsically, 
in spite of their being two, that they possessed the 
same intrinsic nature. But it is important to call 
attention expressly to the fact that what I mean by 
the expression 'having a different intrinsic nature* 
is equivalent to ' not exactly alike ' because here 
there is real risk of confusion between this con- 
ception and a different one. This comes about as 
follows. It is natural to suppose that the phrase 
1 having a different intrinsic nature ' is equivalent 
to the phrase 'intrinsically different 1 or 'having 
different intrinsic properties.' But, if we do make 
this identification, there is a risk of confusion. 
Fdr it is obvious \ that there is a sense in which, 
when things are exactly like, they must be' intrinsi- 
cally different ' and have different intrinsic properties, 
merely because they are two. For instance, two 
patches of colour may be exactly alike, in spite of 
the fact that each possesses a constituent which the 
other does not possess, provided only that their two 
constituents are exactly alike. And yet, in a 
certain sense, it is obvious that the fact that each has 
a constituent, which the other has not got, does 
constitute an intrinsic difference between them, and 
implies that each has an intrinsic property which the 
other has not got. And even where the two things 
are simple the mere fact that they are numerically 
different does in a sense constitute an intrinsic 
difference between them, and each will have at least 
one intrinsic property which the other has not got 
— namely that of being identical with itself. It is 
obvious therefore that the phrases 'intrinsically 
different ' and ' having different intrinsic properties ' 
are ambiguous. They may be used in such a sense 
that to say of two things that they are intrinsically 
different or have different intrinsic properties does 
not imply that they are not exactly alike, but only 



CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 263 

that they are numerically different. Or they may 
be used in a sense in which two things can be said 
to be intrinsically different, and to have different 
intrinsic properties only when they are not exactly 
alike. It is, therefore, extremely important to insist 
that when I say : Two things can differ in intrinsic 
value, only when they have different intrinsic natures, 
I am using the expression * having different intrinsic 
natures ' in the latter sense and not the former : — 
in a sense in which the mere fact that two things 
are two, or differ numerically, does not imply that 
they have different intrinsic natures, but in which 
they can be said to have different intrinsic natures, 
only where, besides differing numerically, they are 
also not exactly alike. 

But as soon as this is explained, another risk of 
confusion arises owing to the fact that when 
people contrast mere numerical difference with a 
kind of intrinsic difference, which is not merely 
numerical, they are apt to identify the latter with 
qualitative difference. It might, therefore, easily be 
thought that by 'difference in intrinsic nature' I 
mean 'difference in quality.' But this identification 
of difference in quality with difference in intrinsic 
nature would also be a mistake. It is true that 
what is commonly meant by difference of quality, in 
the strict sense, always is a difference of intrinsic 
nature : two things cannot differ in quality without 
differing in intrinsic nature ; and that fact is one of 
the most important facts about qualitative differ- 
ence. But the converse is by no means also true : 
although two things cannot differ in quality without 
differing in intrinsic nature, they can differ in 
intrinsic nature without differing in quality ; or, in 
other words, difference in quality is only one species 
of difference in intrinsic nature. That this is so 
follows from the fact that, as I explained, I am 
using the phrase 'different in intrinsic nature* as 



268 CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 

again be by no means obvious, that purely sub- 
jective predicates might not satisfy our second 
condition. It may, for instance, for all I know, be 
true that there are causal laws which insure that in 
the case of everything that is * beautiful,' anything 
exactly like any of these things would, in this 
Universe, excite a particular kind of feeling in 
everybody to whom it were presented in a particular 
way : and if that were so, we should have a sub- 
jective predicate which satisfied the condition that, 
when a given thing possesses that predicate, it is 
impossible (in the causal sense) that any exactly 
similar thing should not also possess it. The kind 
of necessity I am talking of is not, therefore, mere 
causal necessity either. When I say that if a given 
thing possesses a certain degree of intrinsic value, 
anything precisely similar to it would necessarily 
have possessed that value in exactly the same 
degree, I mean that it would have done so, even if 
it had existed in a Universe in which the causal 
laws were quite different from what they are in this 
one. I mean, in short, that it is impossible for any 
precisely similar thing to possess a different value, 
in precisely such a sense as that, in which it is, I 
think, generally admitted that it is not impossible 
that causal laws should have been different from 
what they are — a sense of impossibility, therefore, 
which certainly does not depend merely on causal 
laws. 

That there is such a sense of necessity — a sense 
which entitles us to say that what has F would have 
G, even if causal laws were quite different from 
what they are — is, I think, quite clear from such 
instances as the following. Suppose you take a 
particular patch of colour, which is yellow. We can, 
I think, say with certainty that any patch exactly 
like that one, would be yellow, even if it existed in 
a Universe in which causal laws were quite different 



CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 269 

from what they are in this one. We can say that 
any such patch must be yellow, quite unconditionally, 
whatever the circumstances, and whatever the 
causal laws. And it is in a sense similar to this, in 
respect of the fact that it is neither empirical nor 
causal, that I mean the 'must' to be understood, 
when I say that if a kind of value is to be * intrinsic/ 
then, supposing a given thing possesses it in a 
certain degree, anything exactly like that thing 
must possess it in exactly the same degree. To 
say, of • beauty ' or • goodness ' that they are 
1 intrinsic ' is only, therefore, to say that this thing 
which is obviously true of 'yellowness* and ' blueness ' 
and 4 redness ' is true of them. And if we give this 
sense to ' must ' in our definition, then I think it is 
obvious that to say of a given kind of value that it 
is intrinsic is inconsistent with its being * subjective.' 
For there is, I think, pretty clearly no subjective 
predicate of which we can say thus unconditionally, 
that; if a given thing possesses it, then anything 
exactly like that thing, would, under any circum- 
stances, and under any causal laws, also possess it. 
For instance, whatever kind of feeling you take, it 
is plainly not true that supposing 1 have that feeling 
towards a given thing A, then / should necessarily 
under any circumstances have that feeling towards 
anything precisely similar to A : for the simple 
reason that a thing precisely similar to A might 
exist in a Universe in which I did not exist at all. 
And similarly it is not true of any feeling whatever, 
that if somebody has that feeling towards a given 
thing A, then, in any Universe, in which a thing 
precisely similar to A existed, somebody would have 
that feeling towards it Nor finally is it even true, 
that if it is true of a given thing A, that, under 
actual causal laws, any one to whom A were 
presented in a certain way would have a certain 
feeling towards it, then the same hypothetical 



270 CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 

predicate would, in any Universe, belong to any- 
thing precisely similar to A : in every case it seems 
to be possible that there might be a Universe, in 
which the causal laws were such that the proposition 
would not be true. 

It is, then, because in my definition of 'intrinsic* 
value the 'must 1 is to be understood in this un- 
conditional sense, that I think that the proposition 
that a kind of value is 'intrinsic 1 is inconsistent 
with its being subjective. But it should be 
observed that in holding that there is this incon- 
sistency, I am contradicting a doctrine which seems 
to be held by many philosophers. There are, as 
you probably know, some philosophers who insist 
strongly on a doctrine which they express by saying 
that no relations are purely external. And so far 
as I can make out one thing which they mean by 
this is just that, whenever x has any relation what- 
ever which y has not got, x and y cannot be exactly 
alike : That any difference in relation necessarily 
entails a difference in intrinsic nature. There is, I 
think, no doubt that when these philosophers say 
this, they mean by their 'cannot* and 'necessarily' 
an unconditional 'cannot ' and ' must.' And hence it 
follows they are holding that, if, for instance, a thing 
A pleases me now, then any other thing, B, precisely 
similar to A, must, under any circumstances, and 
in any Universe, please me also : since, if B did 
not please me, it would not possess a relation which 
A does possess, and therefore, by their principle, 
could not be precisely similar to A — must differ from 
it in intrinsic nature. But it seems to me to be 
obvious that this principle is false. If it were true, 
it would follow that I can know a priori such things 
as that no patch of colour which is seen by you and 
is not seen by me is ever exactly like any patch 
which is seen by me and is not seen by you ; or 
that no patch of colour which is surrounded by a 



CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 271 

red ring is ever exactly like one which is not so 
surrounded. But it is surely obvious, that, whether 
these things are true or not they are things which I 
cannot know a priori. It is simply not evident a 
priori that no patch of colour which is seen by A 
and not by B is ever exactly like one which is seen 
by B and not by A, and that no patch of colour 
which is surrounded by a red ring is ever exactly 
like one which is not. And this illustration serves 
to bring out very well both what is meant by saying 
of such a predicate as ' beautiful ' that it is 4 in- 
trinsic,' and why, if it is, it cannot be subjective. 
What is meant is just that if A is beautiful and B 
is not, you could know a priori that A and B are 
not exactly alike ; whereas, with any such subjective 
predicate, as that of exciting a particular feeling in 
me, or that of being a thing which would excite 
such a feeling in any spectator, you cannot tell a 
priori that a thing A which did possess such a 
predicate and a thing B which did not, could not be 
exactly alike. 

It seems to me, therefore, quite certain, in spite 
of the dogma that no relations are purely external, 
that there are many predicates, such for instance as 
most (if not all) subjective predicates or the ob- 
jective one of being surrounded by a red ring, 
which do not depend solely on the intrinsic nature 
of what possesses them : or, in other words, of 
which it is not true that if .r possesses them andj/ 
does not, x and y must differ in intrinsic nature. 
But what precisely is meant by this unconditional 
1 must/ 1 must confess I don't know. The obvious 
thing to suggest is that it is the logical 'must/ 
which certainly is unconditional in just this sense : 
the kind of necessity, which we assert to hold, for 
instance, when we say that whatever is a right- 
angled triangle must be a triangle, or that whatever 
is yellow must be either yellow or blue. But I must 



272 CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 

say I cannot see that all unconditional necessity is 
of this nature. I do not see how it can be deduced 
from any logical law that, if a given patch of colour 
be yellow, then any patch which were exactly like 
the first would be yellow too. And similarly in our 
case of 'intrinsic 1 value, though I think it is true that 
beauty, for instance, is 'intrinsic,' I do not see how 
it can be deduced from any logical law, that if A is 
beautiful, anything that were exactly like A would 
be beautiful too, in exactly the same degree. 

Moreover, though I do believe that both "yel- 
low" (in the sense in which it applies to sense- 
data) and " beautiful " are predicates which, in this 
unconditional sense, depend only on the intrinsic 
nature of what possesses them, there seems to me 
to be an extremely important difference between 
them which constitutes a further difficulty in the way 
of getting quite clear as to what this unconditional 
sense of "must" is. The difference I mean is 
one which I am inclined to express by saying 
that though both yellowness and beauty are 
predicates which depend only on the intrinsic 
nature of what possesses them, yet while yellow- 
ness is itself an intrinsic predicate, beauty is not 
Indeed it seems to me to be one of the most 
important truths about predicates of value, that 
though many of them are intrinsic kinds of value, 
in the sense I have defined, yet none of them 
are intrinsic properties, in the sense in which such 
properties as " yellow " or the property of " being a 
state of pleasure " or " being a state of things which 
contains a balance of pleasure " are intrinsic 
properties. It is obvious, for instance, that, if we 
are to reject all naturalistic theories of value, we 
must not only reject those theories, according to 
which no kind of value would be intrinsic, but must 
also reject such theories as those which assert, 
for instance, that to say that a state of mind is good 



CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 273 

is to say that it is a state of being pleased ; or that 
to say that a state of things is good is to say that it 
contains a balance of pleasure over pain. There 
are, in short, two entirely different types of 
naturalistic theory, the difference between which 
may be illustrated by the difference between the 
assertion, "A is good" means "A is pleasant" and 
the assertion " A is good " means " A is a state of 
pleasure." Theories of the former type imply that 
goodness is not an intrinsic kind of value, whereas 
theories of the latter type imply equally emphati- 
cally that it is : since obviously such predicates as 
that " of being a state of pleasure," or " containing a 
balance of pleasure," are predicates like "yellow" 
in respect of the fact that if a given thing possesses 
them, anything exactly like the thing in question 
must possess them. It seems to me equally obvious 
that both types of theory are false : but I do not 
know how to exclude them both except by saying 
that two different propositions are both true of 
goodness, namely : ( 1 ) that it does depend only on 
the intrinsic nature of what possesses it — which 
excludes theories of the first type and (2) that, 
though this is so, it is yet not itself an intrinsic 
property — which excludes those of the second. It 
was for this reason that I said above that, if there 
are any intrinsic kinds of value, they would 
constitute a class of predicates which is, perhaps, 
unique ; for I cannot think of any other predicate 
which resembles them in respect of the fact, that 
though not itself intrinsic, it yet shares with intrinsic 
properties the characteristics of depending solely on 
the intrinsic nature of what possesses it. So far as 
I know, certain predicates of value are the only 
non-intrinsic properties which share with intrinsic 
properties this characteristic of depending only on 
the intrinsic nature of what possesses them. 

If, however, we are thus to say that predicates of 
s 



274 CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 

value, though dependent 'solely on intrinsic 
properties, are not themselves intrinsic properties, 
there must be some characteristic belonging to 
intrinsic properties which predicates of value never 
possess. And it seems to me quite obvious that 
there is ; only I can't see what it is. It seems to 
me quite obvious that if you assert of a given state 
of things that it contains a balance of pleasure over 
pain, you are asserting of it not only a different 
predicate, from what you would be asserting of it if 
you said it was " good " — but a predicate which is 
of quite a different kind\ and in the same way that 
when you assert of a patch of colour that it is 
"yellow," the predicate you assert is not only 
different from " beautiful," but of quite a different 
kind, in the same way as before. And of course 
the mere fact that many people have thought that 
goodness and beauty were subjective is evidence 
that there is some great difference of kind between 
them and such predicates as being yellow or 
containing a balance of pleasure. But what the 
difference is, if we suppose, as I suppose, that 
goodness and beauty are not subjective, and that 
they do share with "yellowness" and " containing 
pleasure," the property of depending solely on the 
intrinsic nature of what possesses them, I confess I 
cannot say. I can only vaguely express the kind of 
difference I feel there to be by saying that intrinsic 
properties seem to describe the intrinsic nature of 
what possesses them in a sense in which predicates 
of value never do. If you could enumerate all the 
intrinsic properties a given thing possessed, you 
would have given a complete description of it, and 
would not need to mention any predicates of value 
it possessed ; whereas no description of a given 
thing could be complete which omitted any intrinsic 
property. But, in any case, owing to the fact that 
predicates of intrinsic value are not themselves 



CONCEPTION OF INTRINSIC VALUE 275 

intrinsic properties, you cannot define " intrinsic 
property, " in the way which at first sight seems 
obviously the right one. You cannot say that an 
intrinsic property is a property such that, if one 
thing possesses it and another does not, the 
intrinsic nature of the two things must be different. 
For this is the very thing which we are maintaining 
to be true of predicates of intrinsic value, while at 
the same time we say that they are not intrinsic pro- 
perties. Such a definition of "intrinsic property" 
would therefore only be possible if, we could say that 
the necessity there is that, if x andjy possess different 
intrinsic properties, their nature must be different, 
is a necessity of a different kind from the necessity 
there is that, if x and y are of different intrinsic 
values, their nature must be different, although both 
necessities are unconditional. And it seems to me 
possible that this is the true explanation. But, if 
so, it obviously adds to the difficulty of explaining 
the meaning of the unconditional " must," since, in 
this case, there would be two different meanings of 
"must," both unconditional, and yet neither, 
apparently, identical with the logical " must." 



EXTERNAL AND INTERNAL 

RELATIONS 

In the index to Appearance and Reality (First 
Edition) Mr. Bradley declares that all relations are 
" intrinsical " ; and the following are some of the 
phrases by means of which he tries to explain what 
he means by this assertion. "A relation must at 
both ends affect, and pass into, the being of its 
terms " (p. 364). " Every relation essentially 
penetrates the being of its terms, and is, in this 
sense, intrinsical " (p. 392). "To stand in a 
relation and not to be relative, to support it and yet 
not to be infected and undermined by it, seems out 
of the question " (p. 142). And a good many other 
philosophers seem inclined to take the same view 
about relations which Mr. Bradley is here trying to 
express. Other phrases which seem to be 
sometimes used to express it, or a part of it, are 
these : " No relations are purely external " ; " All 
relations qualify or modify or make a difference to 
the terms between which they hold " ; " No terms 
are independent of any of the relations in which 
they stand to other terms." (See e.g n Joachim, The 
Nature of Truth, pp. 11, 12, 46). 

It is, I think, by no means easy to make out 
exactly what these philosophers mean by these 
assertions. And the main object of this paper is to 
try to define clearly one proposition, which, even if 
it does not give the whole of what they mean, 
seems to me to be always implied by what they 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 277 

mean, and to be certainly false. I shall try to make 
clear the exact meaning of this proposition, to point 
out some of its most important consequences, and 
to distinguish it clearly from certain other propositions 
which are, I think, more or less liable to be confused 
with it. And I shall maintain that, if we give to 
the assertion that a relation is " internal " the 
meaning which this proposition would give to it, 
then, though, in that sense, some relations are 
" internal," others, no less certainly, are not, but are 
"purely external." 

To begin with, we may, I think, clear the ground, 
by putting on one side two propositions about 
relations, which, though they seem sometimes to be 
confused with the view we are discussing, do, I 
think, quite certainly not give the whole meaning 
of that view. 

The first is a proposition which is quite certainly 
and obviously true of all relations, without exception, 
and which, though it raises points of great 
difficulty, can, I think, be clearly enough stated for 
its truth to be obvious. It is the proposition that, 
in the case of any relation whatever, the kind of 
fact which we express by saying that a given term 
A has that relation to another term B, or to a pair 
of terms B and C, or to three terms B, C, and D, 
and so on, in no case simply consists in the terms 
in question together with the relation. Thus the 
fact which we express by saying that Edward VII 
was father of George V, obviously does not simply 
consist in Edward, George, and the relation of 
fatherhood. In order that the fact may be, it is 
obviously not sufficient that there should merely be 
George and Edward and the relation of fatherhood ; 
it is further necessary that the relation should 
relate Edward to George, and not only so, but also 
that it should relate them in the particular way 
which we express by saying that Edward was 



278 EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

father of George, and not merely in the way which 
we should express by saying that George was father 
of Edward. This proposition is, I think, obviously 
true of all relations without exception : and the only 
reason why I have mentioned it is because, in an 
article in which Mr. Bradley criticises Mr. Russell 
{Mind, 1910, p. 179), he seems to suggest that it is 
inconsistent with the proposition that any relations 
are merely external, and because, so far as I can 
make out, some other people who maintain that all 
relations are internal seem sometimes to think that 
their contention follows from this proposition. The 
way in which Mr. Bradley puts it is that such facts 
are unities which are not completely analysable ; and 
this is, of course, true, if it means merely that in 
the case of no such fact is there any set of 
constituents of which we can truly say : This fact 
is identical with these constituents. But whether 
from this it follows that all relations are internal 
must of course depend upon what is meant by the 
latter statement. If it be merely used to express 
this proposition itself, or anything which follows 
from it, then, of course, there can be no doubt that 
all relations are internal. But I think there is no 
doubt that those who say this do not mean by their 
words merely this obvious proposition itself; and I 
am going to point out something which I think they 
always imply, and which certainly does not follow 
from it. 

The second proposition which, I think, may be 
put aside at once as certainly not giving the whole 
of what is meant, is the proposition which is, I 
think, the natural meaning of the phrases "All 
relations modify or affect their terms" or "All 
relations make a difference to their terms." There 
is one perfectly natural and intelligible sense in 
which a given relation may be said to modify a term 
which stands in that relation, namely, the sense in 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 279 

which we should say that, if, by putting a stick of 
sealing-wax into a flame, we make the sealing-wax 
melt, its relationship to the flame has modified the 
sealing-wax. This is a sense of the word " modify " 
in which part of what is meant by saying of any 
term that it is modified, is that it has actually 
undergone a change : and I think it is clear that 
a sense in which this is part of its meaning is the 
only one in which the word " modify " can properly 
be used. If, however, those who say that all 
relations modify their terms were using the word in 
this, its proper, sense, part of what would be meant 
by this assertion would be that all terms which have 
relations at all actually undergo changes. Such an 
assertion would be obviously false, for the simple 
reason that there are terms which have relations 
and which yet never change at all. And I think it 
is quite clear that those who assert that all relations 
are internal, in the sense we are concerned with, 
mean by this something which could be consistently 
asserted to be true of all relations without exception, 
even if it were admitted that some terms which 
have relations do not change. When, therefore, 
they use the phrase that all relations " modify " their 
terms as equivalent to "all relations are internal," 
they must be using " modify " in some meta- 
phorical sense other than its natural one. I think, 
indeed, that most of them would be inclined to 
assert that in every case in which a term A comes 
to have to another term B a relation, which it did 
not have to B in some immediately preceding 
interval, its having of that relation to that term 
causes it to undergo some change, which it would 
not have undergone if it had not stood in precisely 
hat relation to B and I think perhaps they would 
hink that this proposition follows from some 
proposition which is true of all relations, without 
exception, and which is what they mean by saying 



28o EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

that all relations are internal. The question 
whether the coming into a new relation does thus 
always cause some modification in the term which 
comes into it is one which is often discussed, as if it 
had something to do with the question whether all 
relations are internal ; as when, for instance, it is 
discussed whether knowledge of a thing alters the 
thing known. And for my part I should maintain 
that this proposition is certainly not true. But 
what I am concerned with now is not the question 
whether it is true, but simply to point out that, so 
far as I can see, it can have nothing to do with the 
question whether all relations are internal, for the 
simple reason that it cannot possibly follow from 
any proposition with regard to all relations without 
exception. It asserts with regard to all relational 
properties of a certain kind, that they have a certain 
kind o{ejffect ; and no proposition of this sort can, I 
think follow from any universal proposition with 
regard to all relations. 

We have, therefore, rejected as certainly not 
giving the whole meaning of the dogma that all 
relations are internal : ( i ) the obviously true 
proposition that no relational facts are completely 
anaJysable, in the precise sense which I gave to that 
assertion ; and (2) the obviously false proposition 
that all relations modify their terms, in the natural 
sense of the term "modify," in which it always has 
as part of its meaning "cause to undergo a 
change." And we have also seen that this false 
proposition that any relation which a term comes 
to have always causes it to undergo a change is 
wholly irrelevant to the question whether all 
relations are internal or not. We have seen finally 
that if the assertion that all relations modify their 
terms is to be understood as equivalent to the 
assertion that all are internal, "modify" must be 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 281 

understood in some metaphorical sense. The 
question is: What is this metaphorical sense? 

And one point is, I think, pretty clear to begin 
with. It is obvious that, in the case of some 
relations, a given term A may have the relation in 
question, not only to one other term, but to several 
different terms. If, for instance, we consider the 
relation of fatherhood, it is obvious that a man may 
be father, not only of one, but of several different 
children. And those who say that all relations 
modify their terms always mean, I think, not 
merely that every different relation which a term has 
modifies it ; but also that, where the relation is one 
which the term has to several different other terms, 
then, in the case of each of these terms, it is modified 
by the fact that it has the relation in question to 
that particular term. If, for instance, A is father of 
three children, B, C, and D, they mean to assert 
that he is modified, not merely by being a father, 
but by being the father of B, also by being the 
father of C, and also by being the father of D. The 
mere assertion that all relations modify their terms 
does not, of course, make it quite clear that this is 
what is meant ; but I think there is no doubt that it 
is always meant ; and I think we can express it 
more clearly by using a term, which I have already 
introduced, and saying the doctrine is that all 
relational properties modify their terms, in a sense 
which remains to be defined. I think there is no 
difficulty in understanding what I mean by a 
relational property. If A is father of B, then what 
you assert of A when you say that he is so is a 
relational property — namely the property of being 
father of B ; and it is quite clear that this property 
is not itself a relation, in the same fundamental 
sense in which the relation of fatherhood is so ; and 
also that, if C is a different child from B, then the 
property of being father of C is a different relational 



282 EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

property from that of being father of B, although 
there is only one relation, that of fatherhood, from 
which both are derived. So far as I can make out, 
those philosophers who talk of all relations being 
internal, often actually mean by " relations " 
" relational properties " ; when they talk of all 
the "relations" of a given term, they mean all its 
relational properties, and not merely all the different 
relations, of each of which it is true that the term 
has that relation to something. It will, I think, 
conduce to clearness to use a different word for 
these two entirely different uses of the term 
" relation " to call " fatherhood " a relation, and 
44 fatherhood of B " a " relational property." And 
the fundamental proposition, which is meant by the 
assertion that all relations are internal, is, I think, a 
proposition with regard to relational properties, and 
not with regard to relations properly so-called. There 
is no doubt that those who maintain this dogma mean 
to maintain that all relational properties are related in 
a peculiar way to the terms which possess them — 
that they modify or are internal to them, in some 
metaphorical sense. And once we have defined 
what this sense is in which a relational property can 
be said to be internal to a term which possesses it, 
we can easily derive from it a corresponding sense 
in which the relations^ strictly so called, from which 
relational properties are derived, can be said to be 
internal. 

Our question is then : What is the metaphorical 
sense of " modify " in which the proposition that 
all relations are internal is equivalent to the pro- 
position that all relational properties "modify " the 
terms which possess them ? I think it is clear that 
the term " modify " would never have been used at 
all to express the relation meant, unless there had 
been some analogy between this relation and that 
which we have seen is the proper sense of "modify," 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 283 

namely, causes to change. And I think we can see 
where the analogy comes in by considering the 
statement, with regard to any particular term A 
and any relational property P which belongs to it, 
that A would have been different from what it is if 
it had not had P : the statement, for instance, that 
Edward VII would have been different if he had 
not been father of George V. This is a thing 
which we can obviously truly say of A and P, in 
some sense, whenever it is true of P that it modified 
A in the proper sense of the word : if the being 
held in the flame causes the sealing-wax to melt, 
we can truly say (in some sense) that the sealing- 
wax would not have been in a melted state if it 
had not been in the flame. But it seems as if it 
were a thing which might also be true of A and P, 
where it is not true that the possession of P caused 
A to change ; since the mere assertion that A 
would have been different, if it had not had P, does 
not necessarily imply that the possession of P 
caused A to have any property which it would not 
have had otherwise. And those who say that all 
relations are internal do sometimes tend to speak 
as if what they meant could be put in the form : 
In the case of every relational property which a 
thing has, it is always true that the thing which has 
it would have been different if it had not had that 
property ; they sometimes say even : If P be a 
relational property and A a term which has it, then 
it is - always true that A would not have been A if 
it had not had P. This is, I think, obviously a 
clumsy way of expressing anything which could 
possibly be true, since, taken strictly, it implies 
the self-contradictory proposition that if A had not 
had P, it would not have been true that A did not 
have P. But it is nevertheless a more or less 
natural way of expressing a proposition which 
might quite well be true, namely, that, supposing 



284 EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

A has P, then anything which had not had P would 
necessarily have been different from A. This is 
the proposition which I wish to suggest as giving 
the metaphorical meaning of " P modifies A," of which 
we are in search. It is a proposition to which I 
think a perfectly precise meaning can be given, 
and one which does not at all imply that the 
possession of P caused any change in A, but which 
might conceivably be true of all terms and all the 
relational properties they have, without exception. 
And it seems to me that it is not unnatural that the 

Eroposition that this is true of P and A, should 
ave been expressed in the form, " P modifies A," 
since it can be more or less naturally expressed in 
the perverted form, " If A had not had P it would 
have been different," — a form of words, which, as 
we saw, can also be used whenever P does, in the 
proper sense, modify A. 

I want to suggest, then, that one thing which is 
always implied by the dogma that, "All relations 
are internal," is that, in the case of every relational 
property, it can always be truly asserted of any 
term A which has that property, that any term 
which had not had it would necessarily have been 
different from A. 

This is the proposition to which I want to direct 
attention. And there are two phrases in it, which 
require some further explanation. 

The first is the phrase " would necessarily have 
been." And the meaning of this can be explained, 
in a preliminary way, as follows : — To say of a pair 
of properties P and Q, that any term which had 
had P would necessarily have had Q, is equivalent 
to saying that, in every case, from the proposition 
with regard to any given term that it has P, it 
follows that that term has Q : follows being under- 
stood in the sense in which from the proposition 
with regard to any term, that it is a right angle, it 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 285 

follows that it is an angle, and in which from the 
proposition with regard to any term that it is red it 
follows that it is coloured. There is obviously 
some very important sense in which from the 
proposition that a thing is a right angle, it does 
follow that it is an angle, and from the proposition 
that a thing is red it does follow that it is coloured. 
And what I am maintaining is that the meta- 
phorical sense of "modify," in which it is main- 
tained that all relational properties modify the 
subjects which possess them, can be defined by 
reference to this sense of " follows." The definition 
is : To say of a given relational property P that 
it modifies or is internal to a given term A which 
possesses it, is to say that from the proposition that 
a thing has not got P it follows that that thing is 
different from A. In other words, it is to say that 
the property of not possessing P, and the property 
of being different from A are related to one another 
in the peculiar way in which the property of being 
a right-angled triangle is related to that of being a 
triangle, or that of being red to that of being 
coloured. 

To complete the definition it is necessary, how- 
ever, to define the sense in which "different from A" 
is to be understood. There are two different senses 
which the statement that A is different from B may 
bear. It may be meant merely that A is numeric- 
ally different from B, other than B, not identical 
with B. Or it may be meant that not only is this 
the case, but also that A is related to B in a way 
which can be roughly expressed by saying that A 
is qualitatively different from B. And of these 
two meanings, those who say "All relations make 
a difference to their terms," always, I think, mean 
difference in the latter sense and not merely in the 
former. That is to say, they mean, that if P be a 
relational property which belongs to A, then the 



286 EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

absence of P entails not only numerical difference 
from A, but qualitative difference. But, in fact, 
from the proposition that a thing is qualitatively 
different from A, it does follow that it is also 
numerically different. And hence they are main- 
taining that every relational property is " internal 
to " its terms in both of two different senses at the 
same time. They are maintaining that, if P be a 
relational property which belongs to A, then P is 
internal to A both in the sense ( i ) that the absence 
of P entails qualitative difference from A ; and (2) 
that the absence of P entails numerical difference 
from A. It seems to me that neither of these 
propositions is true ; and I will say something 
about each in turn. 

As for the first, I said before that I think some 
relational properties really are "internal to" their 
terms, though by no means all are. But, if we 
understand "internal to" in this first sense, I am 
not really sure that any are. In order to get an 
example of one which was, we should have, I think, 
to say that any two different qualities are always 
qualitatively different from one another: that, for 
instance, it is not only the case that anything which 
is pure red is qualitatively different from anything 
which is pure blue, but that the quality " pure red " 
itself is qualitatively different from the quality 
" pure blue." I am not quite sure that we can say 
this, but I think we can ; and if so, it is easy to get 
an example of a relational property which is internal 
in our first sense. The quality " orange " is inter- 
mediate in shade between the qualities yellow and 
red. This is a relational property, and it is quite 
clear that, on our assumption, it is an internal one. 
Since it is quite clear that any quality which were 
not intermediate between yellow and red, would 
necessarily be other than orange ; and if any quality 
other than orange must be qualitatively different 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 287 

from orange, then it follows that "intermediate be- 
tween yellow and red" is internal to "orange." That 
is to say, the absence of the relational property " in- 
termediate between yellow and red," entails the 
property "different in quality from orange." 

There is then, I think, a difficulty in being sure 
that any relational properties are internal in this 
first sense. But, if what we want to do is to show 
that some are not, and that therefore the dogma 
that all relations are internal is false, I think the 
most conclusive reason for saying this is that if all 
were internal in this first sense, all would necessarily 
be internal in the second, and that this is plainly 
false. I think, in fact, the most important conse- 
quence of the dogma that all relations are internal, 
is that it follows from it that all relational properties 
are internal in this second sense. I propose, there- 
fore, at once to consider this proposition, with a 
view to bringing out quite clearly what it means 
and involves, and what are the main reasons for 
saying that it is false. 

The proposition in question is that, if P be a 
relational property and A a term to which it does in 
fact belong, then, no matter what P and A may be, 
it may always be truly asserted of them, that any 
term which had not possessed P would necessarily 
have been other than — numerically different from — 
A : or in other words, that A would necessarily, in 
all conceivable circumstances, have possessed P. 
And with this sense of "internal," as distinguished 
from that which says qualitatively different, it is 
quite easy to point out some relational properties 
which certainly are internal in this sense. Let us 
take as an example the relational property which 
we assert to belong to a visual sense-datum when 
we say of it that it has another visual sense-datum 
as a spatial part : the assertion, for instance, with 
regard to a coloured patch half of which is red and 



288 EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

half yellow: "This whole patch contains this patch' 
(where "this patch" is a proper name for the red 
half). It is here, I think, quite plain that, in a 
perfectly clear and intelligible sense, we can say 
that any whole, which had not contained that red 
patch, could not have been identical with the whole 
in question : that from the proposition with regard 
to any term whatever that it does not contain that 
particular patch it follows that that term is other 
than the whole in question — though not necessarily 
that it is qualitatively different from it. That par- 
ticular whole could not have existed without having 
that particular patch for a part. But it seems no 
less clear, at first sight, that there are many other 
relational properties of which this is not true. In 
order to get an example, we have only to consider 
the relation which the red patch has to the whole 
patch, instead of considering as before that which 
the whole has to it. It seems quite clear that, 
though the whole could not have existed without 
having the red patch for a part, the red patch might 
perfectly well nave existed without being part of 
that particular whole. In other words, though 
every relational property of the form " having this 
for a spatial part" is "internal" in our sense, it 
seems equally clear that every property of the form 
" is a spatial part of this whole " is not internal, but 
purely external. Yet this last, according to me, is 
one of the things which the dogma of internal 
relations denies. It implies that it is just as 
necessary that anything, which is in fact a part of a 
particular whole, should be a part of that whole, as 
that any whole, which has a particular thing for a 
part, should have that thing for a part. It implies, 
in fact, quite generally, that any term which does in 
fact have a particular relational property, could not 
have existed without having that property. And in 
saying this it obviously flies in the face of common 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 289 

sense. It seems quite obvious that in the case of 
many relational properties which things have, the 
fact that they have them is a mere matter of fact : 
that the things in question might have existed with- 
out having them. That this, which seems obvious, is 
true, seems to me to be the most important thing 
that can be meant by saying that some relations are 
purely external And the difficulty is to see how 
any philosopher could have supposed that it was 
not true : that, for instance, the relation of part to 
whole is no more external than that of whole to 
part. I will give at once one main reason which 
seems to me to have led to the view, that all 
relational properties are internal in this sense. 

What I am maintaining is the common-sense 
view, which seems obviously true, that it may be 
true that A has in fact got P and yet also true that 
A might have existed without having P. And I 
say that this is equivalent to saying that it may be 
true that A has P, and yet not true that from the 
proposition that a thing has not got P it follows that 
that thing is other than A — numerically different 
from it. And one reason why this is disputed is, I 
think, simply because it is in fact true that if A has 
P, and x has not, it does follow that x is other than 
A. These two propositions, the one which I admit 
to be true (1) that if A has P, and x has not, it does 
follow that x is other than A, and the one which I 
maintain to be false (2) that if A has P, then from 
the proposition with regard to any term x that it 
has not got P, it follows that x is other than A, are, 
I think, easily confused with one another. And it 
is in fact the case that if they are not different, or if 
(2) follows from (i), then no relational properties 
are external. For (1) is certainly true, and (2) is 
certainly equivalent to asserting fhat none are. 
It is therefore absolutely essential, if we are to 
maintain external relations, to maintain that (2) 
T 



290 EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

does not follow from (i). These two propositions 
(i) and (2), with regard to which I maintain that (1) 
is true, and (2) is false, can be put in another way, 
as follows : ( 1 ) asserts that if A has P, then any 
term which has not, must be other than A. (2) 
asserts that if A has P, then any term which had 
not, would necessarily be other than A. And when 
they are put in this form, it is, I think, easy to see 
why they should be confused : you have only to 
confuse "must*' or "is necessarily" with "would 
necessarily be." And their connexion with the 
question of external relations can be brought out as 
follows : To maintain external relations you have to 
maintain such things as that, though Edward VII 
was in fact father of George V, he might have 
existed without being father of George V. But to 
maintain this, you have to maintain that it is not 
true that a person who was not father of George 
would necessarily have been other than Edward 
Yet it is, in fact, the case, that any person who was 
not the father of George, must have been other than 
Edward. Unless, therefore, you can maintain that 
from this true proposition it does not follow that any 
person who was not father of George would neces- 
sarily have been other than Edward, you will have 
to give up the view that Edward might have existed 
without being father of George. 

By far the most important point in connexion 
with the dogma of internal relations seems to me to 
be simply to see clearly the difference between these 
two propositions (1) and (2), and that (2) does not 
follow from (1). If this is not understood, nothing 
in connexion with the dogma, can, I think, be 
understood. And perhaps the difference may seem 
so clear, that no more need be said about it. But I 
cannot help thinking it is not clear to everybody, 
and that it does involve the rejection of certain 
views, which are sometimes held as to the meaning 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 291 

of "follows." So I will try to put the point again 
in a perfectly strict form. 

Let P be a relational property, and A a term to 
which it does in fact belong. I propose to define 
what is meant by saying that P is internal to A (in 
the sense we are now concerned with) as meaning 
that from the proposition that a thing has not got P, 
it " follows " that it is other than A. 

That is to say, this proposition asserts that 
between the two properties " not having P " and 
"other than A," there holds that relation which 
holds between the property "being a right angle" 
and the property " being an angle, ' or between the 
property "red" and the property "coloured," and 
which we express by saying that, in the case of any 
thing whatever, from the proposition that that thing 
is a right angle it follows, or is deducible, that it is 
an angle. 

Let us now adopt certain conventions for express- 
ing this proposition. 

We require, first of all, some term to express the 
converse of that relation which we assert to hold 
between a particular proposition q and a particular 
proposition/, when we assert that q follows from or 
is deducible from p . Let us use the term "entails" 
to express the converse of this relation. We shall 
then be able to say truly that "/ entails q" when 
and only when we are able to say truly that "q 
follows from /" or "is deducible from/," in the 
sense in which the conclusion of a syllogism in 
Barbara follows from the two premisses, taken as 
one conjunctive proposition ; or in which the pro- 
position " This is coloured " follows from " This is 
red" "/ entails q" will be related to "q follows 
from / " in the same way in which " A is greater 
than B " is related to " B is less than A." 

We require, next, some short and clear method 
of expressing the proposition, with regard to two 
properties P and Q, that any proposition which 



*9* EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

asserts of a given thing that it has the property P 
entails the proposition that the thing in question 
also has the property Q. Let us express this 
proposition in the form 

x? entails xQ 
That is to say "xP entails xQ " is to mean the same 
as " Each one of all the various propositions, which 
are alike in respect of the fact that each asserts with 
regard to some given thing that that thing has P, 
entails that one among the various propositions, 
alike in respect of the fact that each asserts with 
regard to some given thing that that thing has Q, 
which makes this assertion with regard to the 
same things with regard to which the proposition of 
the first class asserts that it has P." In other words 
"xP entails xQ " is to be true, if and only if the 
proposition " AP entails AQ " is true, and if also all 
propositions which resemble this, in the way in 
which " BP entails BQ " resembles it, are true also ; 
where "AP" means the same as "A has P," " AQ" 
the same as " A has Q " etc., etc 

We require, next, some way of expressing the 
proposition, with regard to two properties P and Q t 
that any proposition which denies of a given thing 
that it has P entails the proposition, with regard to 
the thing in question, that it has Q. 

Let us, in the case of any proposition, /, express 
the contradictory of that proposition by p. The 
proposition " It is not the case that A has P" will 
then be expressed by AP ; and it will then be 
natural, in accordance with the last convention to 
express the proposition that any proposition which 
denies of a given thing that it has P entails the 
proposition, with regard to the thing in question, 

that it has Q, by 

xP entails xQ. 

And we require, finally, some short way of 
expressing the proposition, with regard to two 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS $93 

things B and A, that B is other than (or not 
identical with) A. Let us express " B is identical 
with A" by M B-A "; and it will then be natural, 
according to the last convention, to express " B is 
not identical with A " by 

B = A. 

We have now got everything which is required 
for expressing, in a short symbolic form, the 
proposition, with regard to a given thing A and a 
given relational property P, which A in fact 
possessess, that P is internal to A. The required 
expression is 

x? entails (x - A) 
which is to mean the same as " Every proposition 
which asserts of any given thing that it has not got 
P entails the proposition, with regard to the thing 
in question, that it is other than A." And this 
proposition is, of course, logically equivalent to 

(x - A) entails x P 
where we are using " logically equivalent," in such 
a sense that to say of any proposition / that it is 
logically equivalent to another proposition q is to 
say that both p entails q and q entails p. This last 
proposition again, is, so far as I can see, either 
identical with or logically equivalent to the 
propositions expressed by "anything which were 
identical with A would, in any conceivable universe, 
necessarily have P " or by " A could not have 
existed in any possible world without having P " ; 
just as the proposition expressed by "In any 
possible world a right angle must be an angle" is, I 
take it, either identical with or logically equivalent 
to the proposition " (x is a right angle) entails {x 
is an angle)." 

We have now, therefore, got a short means of 
symbolising, with regard to any particular thing A 
and any particular property P, the proposition that P 
is internal to A in the second of the two senses 



294 EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

distinguished on p. 286. But we still require a means 
of symbolising the general proposition that every 
relational property is internal to any term which 
possesses it — the proposition, namely, which was 
referred to on p. 287, as the most important 
consequence of the dogma of internal relations, and 
which was called (2) on p. 289. 

In order to get this, let us first get a means of 
expressing with regard to some one particular 
relational property P, the proposition that P is 
internal to any term which possesses it This is a 
proposition which takes the form of asserting with 
regard to one particular property, namely P, that 
any term which possesses that property also 
possesses another — namely the one expressed by 
saying that P is internal to it. It is, that is to say, 
an ordinary universal proposition, like " All men 
are mortal.' 1 But such a form of words is, as has 
often been pointed out, ambiguous. It may stand 
for either of two different propositions. It may 
stand merely for the proposition " There is nothing, 
which both is a man, and is not mortal " — a 
proposition which may also be expressed by " If 
anything is a man, that thing is mortal," and which 
is distinguished by the fact that it makes no 
assertion as to whether there are any men or not ; 
or it may stand for the conjunctive proposition " If 
anything is a man, that thing is mortal, and thete 
are men" It will be sufficient for our purposes to 
deal with propositions of the first kind — those 
namely, which assert with regard to some two 
properties, say Q and R, that there is nothing which 
both does possess Q and does not possess R, 
without asserting that anything does possess Q. 
Such a proposition is obviously equivalent to the 
assertion that any pair of propositions which 
resembles the pair "AQ" and "AR," in respect 
of the fact that one of them asserts of some particular 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 295 

thing that it has Q and the other, of the same thing, 
that it has R, stand to one another in a certain 
relation : the relation, namely, which, in the case of 
" AQ " and " AR," can be expressed by saying 
that " It is not the case both that A has Q and that 
A has not got R." When we say "There is 
nothing which does possess Q and does not possess 
R" we are obviously saying something which is 
either identical with or logically equivalent to the 
proposition "In the case of every such pair of 
propositions it is not the case both that the one 
which asserts a particular thing to have Q is true, 
and that the one which asserts it to have R is false." 
We require, therefore, a short way of expressing 
the relation between two propositions p and q, which 
can be expressed by " It is not the case that / is 
true and q false." And I am going, quite arbitrarily 
to express this relation by writing 

for " It is not the case that/ is true and q false." 

The relation in question is one which logicians 
have sometimes expressed by "/ implies q. u It is, 
for instance, the one which Mr. Russell in the 
Trinciples of Mathematics calls "material im- 
plication," and which he and Dr. Whitehead in 
Princtpia Mat hematic a call simply "implication." 
And if we do use " implication " to stand for this 
relation, we, of course, got the apparently paradoxical 
results that every false proposition implies every 
other proposition, both true and false, and that every 
true proposition implies every other true proposition : 
since it is quite clear that if p is false then, whatever 
q may be, " it is not the case that / is true and q 
false," and quite clear also, that if/ and q are both 
true, then also " it is not the case that/ is true and 
q false." And these results, it seems to me, appear 
to be paradoxical, solely because, if we use " implies " 
in any ordinary sense, they are quite certainly false. 



296 EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

Why logicians should have thus chosen to use the 
word " implies " as a name for a relation, for which 
it never is used by any one else, I do not know. It 
is partly, no doubt, because the relation for which 
they do use it — that expressed by saying " It is not 
the case that / is true and q false " — is one for 
which it is very important that they should have a 
short name, because it is a relation which is 'very 
fundamental and about which they need constantly 
to talk, while (so far as I can discover) it simply 
has no short name in ordinary life. And it is 
partly, perhaps, for a reason which leads us back to 
our present reason for giving some name to this 
relation. It is, in fact, natural to use "p implies 
q" to mean the same as " If p, then q." And 
though " Up then q" is hardly ever, if ever, used 
to mean the same as " It is not the case that/ is true 
and q false " ; yet the expression "If anything has 
Q, it has R" may, I think, be naturally used to 
express the proposition that, in the case of every 
pair of propositions which resembles the pair A Q 
and A R in respect of the fact that the first of the 
pair asserts of some particular thing that it has Q 
and the second, of the same thing, that it has R, it 
is not the case that the first is true and the second 
false. That is to say, if (as I propose to do) we 
express "It is not the case both that AQ is true 
and AR false " by 

AQ * AR, 
and if, further (on the analogy of the similar case 
with regard to "entails)," we express the proposition 
that of every pair of propositions which resemble 
A Q and A R in the respect just mentioned, it is 
true that the first has the relation * to the second by 

xQ * xR 
then, it is natural to express xQ # xR t by " If any- 
thing has Q, then that thing has R." And logicians 
may, I think, have falsely inferred that since it is 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 197 

natural to express "xQ *xR" by "If anything has 
Q, then that thing has R," it must be natural to 
express "AQ»AR" by "If AQ, then AR," 
and therefore also by " AQ implies AR." If this 
has been their reason for expressing "p * q" by "/ 
implies q " then obviously their reason is a fallacy. 
And, whatever the reason may have been, it seems 
to me quite certain that "AQ#AR" cannot be 
properly expressed either by " AQ implies AR " 
or by "If AQ, then AR," although "rQ#*R" 
can be properly expressed by " If anything has Q, 
then that thing has R." 

I am going, then, to express the universal pro- 
position, with regard to two particular properties Q 
and R, which asserts that " Whatever has Q, has 
R" or "If anything has Q, it has R," without 
asserting that anything has Q, by 

*Q»*R 

—a means of expressing it, which since we have 
adopted the convention that " p * q " is to mean the 
same as "It is not the case that/ is true and q false," 
brings out the important fact that this proposition is 
either identical with or logically equivalent to the 
proposition that of every such pair of propositions as 
AQ and AR, it is true that it is not the case that 
the first is true and the second false. And having 
adopted this convention, we can now see how, in 
accordance with it, the proposition, with regard to a 
particular property P, that P is internal to everything 
which possesses it, is to be expressed. We saw 
that P is internal to A is to be expressed by 

xP entails {x = A) 

or by the logically equivalent proposition 

(x == A) entails xl? 

And we have now only to express the proposition 
that anything that has P, has also the property that 
P is internal to it. The required expression is 



298 EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

obviously as follows. Just as "Anything that has 
Q, has R " is to be expressed by 

xQ *xR 
so " Anything that has P, has also the property that 
P is internal to it " will be expressed by 

xP ♦ {yP entails (y = x)} 
or by 

xl* * {(y = x) entails ^/P}. 

We have thus got, in the case of any particular 
property P, a means of expressing the proposition 
that it is internal to every term that possesses it, 
which is both short and brings out clearly the 
notions that are involved in it. And we do not 
need, I think, any further special convention for 
symbolising the proposition that every relational 
property is internal to any term which possesses it 
— the proposition, namely, which I called (2) above 
(pp. 289, 290), and which on p. 287, I called the most 
important consequence of the dogma of internal 
relations. We can express it simply enough as 
follows : — 

(2) = " What we assert of P when we say 

x? ♦ {yP entails (y=x)) 
can be truly asserted of every relational property." 

And now, for the purpose of comparing (2) with 
(1), and seeing exactly what is involved in my 
assertion that (2) does not follow from (1), let us try 
to express (1) by means of the same conventions. 

Let us first take the assertion with regard to a 
particular thing A and a particular relational property 
P that, from the proposition that A has P it follows 
that nothing which has not got P is identical with 
A. This is an assertion which is quite certainly 
true ; since, if anything which had not got P were 

identical with A, it would follow that AP ; and 
from the proposition AP, it certainly follows that 

AP is false, and therefore also that "Something 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 299 

which has not got P is identical with A " is false, or 
that " Nothing which has not got P is identical with 
A " is true. And this assertion, in accordance with 
the conventions we have adopted, will be expressed 

ty _ 

AP entails {xY *(x=A)} 
We want, next, in order to express (1), a means 
of expressing with regard to a particular relational 
property P, the assertion that, from the proposition, 
with regard to anything whatever, that that thing 
has got P, it follows that nothing which has not got 
P is identical with the thing in question. This also 
is an assertion which is quite certainly true ; since 
it merely asserts (what is obvio usly tr ue) that what 

AP entails {xY ♦ (x^K)} 
asserts of A, can be truly asserted of anything 
whatever. And this assertion, in accordance with the 
conventions we have adopted, will b e expressed by 

xY entails {yY * (y = x)}* 
The proposition, which I meant to call (1), but 
which I expressed before rather clumsily, can now 
be expressed by 

(1) = " What we assert of P, when we say, 

x? entails {yY * (y=x)} 
can be truly asserted of every relational property." 

This is a proposition which is again quite certainly 
true ; and, in order to compare it with (2), there is, 
I think, no need to adopt any further convention for 
expressing it, since the questions whether it is or 
is not different from (2), and whether (2) does or 
does not follow from it, will obviously depend on 
the same questions with regard to the two pro- 
positions, with regard to the particular relational 
property, P, 

x? entails {yY ♦ (y = x)} 
and 

xY * {yY entails (j — x)} 



300 EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

Now what I maintain with regard to (i) and (2) 
is that, whereas (1) is true, (2) is false. I maintain, 
that is to say, that the proposition " What we 
assert of P, when we say 

xP * {yP entails {y = x)}- 
is true of every relational property " is false, thougli 
I admit that what we here assert of P is true of 
some relational properties. Those of which it is 
true, I propose to call internal relational properties, 
those of which it is false external relational properties. 
The dogma of internal relations, on the other hand, 
implies that (2) is true ; that is to say, that every 
relational property is internal, and that there are no 
external relational properties. And what 1 suggest 
is that the dogma of internal relations has been held 
only because (2) has been falsely thought to follow 
from (1). 

And that (2) does not follow from (1), can, I 
think, be easily seen as follows. It can follow from 
(1) only if from any proposition of the form 

p entails (q * r) 
there follows the corresponding proposition of the 
form 

p * (q entails r) t 
And that this is not the case can, I think, be easily 
seen by considering the following three propositions. 
Let / = " All the books on this shelf are blue," 
let q = " My copy of the Principles of Mathematics 
is a book on this shelf," and let r=" My copy of 
the Principles of Mathematics is blue." Now / 
here does absolutely entail (q * r). That is to say, 
it absolutely follows from / that " My copy of the 
Principles is on this shelf," and "My copy of the 
Principles is not blue," are not, as a matter of fact, 
both true. But it by no means follows from this 
that P * (q entails r). For what this latter pro- 
position means is "It is not the case both that/ 
is true and that (q entails r) is false." And, as a 



and. 



t"v: 



I Ul 



I* 

1> » 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 301 

matter of fact, (q entails r) is quite certainly false ; 
for from the proposition " My copy of the Principles 
is on this shelf" the proposition " My copy of the 
Principles is blue " does not follow. It is simply 
not the case that the second of these two 
propositions can be deduced from the first by itself: 
it is simply not the case that it stands to it in the 
relation in which it does stand to the conjunctive 
proposition " All the books on this shelf are blue 
and my copy of the Principles is on this shelf." 
This conjunctive proposition really does entail 
11 My copy of the Principles is blue." But " My 
copy of the Principles is on this shelf," by itself, 

?uite certainly does not entail "My copy of the 
Principles is blue." It is simply not the case that 
my copy of the Principles couldn't have been on this 
shelf without being blue, (q entails r) is, therefore, 
false. And hence "ft ♦ (q entails r)" can only 
follow from "p entails (q * r)" if from this latter 
proposition ft follows. But q quite certainly does 
not follow from this proposition : from the fact that 
(q * r) is deducible from/, it does not in the least 
follow that / is true. It is, therefore, clearly not 
the case that every proposition of the form 

/ entails (q * r) 
entails the corresponding proposition of the form 1 

ft * (q entails r), 
since we have found one particular proposition of 
the first form which does not entail the corres- 
ponding proposition of the second. 

To maintain, therefore, that (2) follows from (1) 
is mere confusion. And one source of the confusion 
is, I think, pretty plain. (1) does allow you to 
assert that, if A P is true, then the proposition 
"y? * {(y= A)}" must be true. What the 
" must " here expresses is merely that this pro- 
position follows from AP, not that it is in itself a 
uecessary proposition. But it is supposed, through 



302 EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

confusion, that what is asserted is that it is not 
t he ca se both that AP is true and that "yP * 
(y = A) M is not, in itself, a necessary proposition ; 
that is to say, it is su pposed that what is asserted 
is " AP ♦ (yP entails (y = A)} " ; since to say that 
"yP ♦ (y = A) " is, in itself, a necessary proposition 
i s the same thing as to say that u yP entails 
(y = A)" is also true. In fact it seems to me 
pretty plain that what is meant by saying of 
propositions of the form tt xP*xQ it that they 
are necessary (or " apodeictic '*) propositions, is 
merely that the corresponding proposition of the 
form "xP entails xQ " is also true. " xP entails 
xQ " is not itself a necessary proposition ; but, if 
"xP entails xQ" is true, then "xP»xQ" is a 
necessary proposition — and a necessary truth, since 
no false propositions are necessary in themselves. 
Thus what is meant by saying that " Whatever is 
a right angle, is also an angle " is a necessary trnth, 
is, so far as I can see, simply that the proposition 
M (x is a right angle) entails (x is an angle) " is also 
true. This seems to me to give what has, in fact, 
been generally meant in philosophy by " necessary 
truths," e.g. by Leibniz ; and to point out the 
distinction between them and those true universal 
propositions which are u mere matters of fact" 
And if we want to extend the meaning of the 
name " necessary truth " in such a way that some 
singular propositions may also be said to be 
11 necessary truths, 1 ' we can, I think, easily do it 
as follows. We can say that AP is itself a 
necessary truth, if and only if the universal pro- 
position " (x= A) * xP " (which, as we have seen, 
follows from AP) is a necessary truth : that is to 
say, if and only if (x = A) entails xP. With this 
definition, what the dogma of internal relations 
asserts is that in every case in which a given thing 
actually has a given relational property, the fact 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 303 

that it has that property is a necessary truth ; 
whereas what I am asserting is that, if the property 
in question is an " internal " property, then the fact 
in question will be a necessary truth, whereas if the 
property in question is "external," then the fact in 
question will be a mere " matter of fact." 

So much for the distinction between (1) which is 
true, and (2), or the dogma of internal relations, 
which I hold to be false. But I said above, in 
passing; that my contention that (2) does not follow 
from (1), involves the rejection of certain views 
that have sometimes been held as to the meaning 
of " follows M ; and I think it is worth while to say 
something about this. 

It is obvious that the possibility of maintaining 
that (2) does not follow from (1), depends upon its 
being true that from "xP *xQ" the proposition 
"xP entails xQ" does not follow. And this 
has sometimes been disputed, and is, I think, often 
not clearly seen. 

To begin with, Mr. Russell, in the Principles of 
Mathematics (p. 34), treats the phrase "q can be 
deduced from / " as if it meant exactly the same 
thing as "/*?" or "/ materially implies q" ; 
and has repeated the same error elsewhere, e.g %% 
in Philosophical Essays (p. 166), where he is 
discussing what he calls the axiom of internal 
relations. And I am afraid a good many people 
have heen led to suppose that, since Mr. Russell 
has said this, it must be true. If it were true, then, 
of course, it would be impossible to distinguish 
between (1) and (2), and it would follow that, 
since (1) certainly is true, what I am calling the 
dogma of internal relations is true too. But I 
imagine that Mr. Russell himself would now be 
willing to admit that, so far from being true, the 
statement that " q can be deduced from p " means 
the same as "/ * q" is simply an enormous 



30 4 EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

" howler " ; and I do not think I need spend 
any time in trying to show that it is so. 

But it may be held that, though "p entails q u 
does not mean the same as "p * q" yet never- 
theless from "xP*xQ" the proposition "xP 
entails xQ " does follow, for a somewhat more 
subtle reason ; and, if this were so, it would again 
follow that what I am calling the dogma of internal 
relations must be true. It may be held, namely, 
that though "AP entails AQ" does not mean 
simply " AP • AQ " yet what it does mean is 
simply the conjunction "AP ♦ AQ and this 
proposition is an instance of a true formal implica- 
tion" (the phrase "formal implication" being 
understood in Mr. Russell's sense, in which 
"xP * xQ" asserts a formal implication). This 
view as to what " AP entails AQ " means, has. 
for instance, if I understand him rightly, been 
asserted by Mr. O. Strachey in Mind, N.S., 93. 
And the same view has been frequently suggested 
(though I do not know that he has actually asserted 
it) by Mr. Russell himself {e.g., Principia Mat he* 
matica, p. 21). If this view were true, then, 
though " xP entails xQ" would not be identical 
in meaning with "xP*xQ," yet it would follow 
from it ; since, if 

*P**Q 
were true, then every particular assertion of the 
form AP * AQ, would not only be true, but would 
be an instance of a true formal implication (namely 
<€ ^P*^Q") and this, according to the proposed 
definition, is all that "xP entails xQ" asserts. 
If, therefore, it were true, it would again follow 
that all relational properties must be internal 
But that this view also is untrue appears to me 
perfectly obvious. The proposition that I am in 
this room does "materially imply" that I am 
more than five years old, since both are true; 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 305 

and the assertion that it does is also an instance 
of a true formal implication, since it is in fact 
true that all the persons in this room are more than 
five years old ; but nothing appears to me more 
obvious than that the second of these two pro- 
positions can not be deduced from the first — that 
the kind of relation which holds between the 
premisses and conclusion of a syllogism in 
Barbara does not hold between them. To put 
it in another way : it seems to me quite obvious 
that the properties "being a person in this room" 
and "being more than five years old" are not 
related in the kind of way in which "being a 
right angle" is related to "being an angle," and 
which we express by saying that, in the case of 
every term, the proposition that that term is an 
angle can be deduced from the proposition that 
it is a right angle. 

These are the only two suggestions as to the 
meaning of "/ entails q" known to me, which, 
if true, would yield the result that (2) does follow 
from ( 1 ), and that therefore all relational properties 
are internal ; and both of these, it seems to me, 
are obviously false. All other suggested meanings, 
so far as I know, would leave it true that (2) does 
not follow from (1), and therefore that I may 
possibly be right in maintaining that some re- 
lational properties are external. It might, for 
instance, be suggested that the last proposed 
definition should be amended as follows — that 
we should say : "/ entails q " means "p * q and 
this proposition is an instance of a formal implica- 
tion, which is not merely true but self-evident, like 
the laws of Formal Logic." This proposed 
definition would avoid the paradoxes involved in 
Mr. Strachey's definition, since such true formal 
implications as "all the persons in this room are 
more than five years old" are certainly not self- 
u 



306 EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

evident ; and, so far as I can see, it may state 
something which is in fact true of / and q % 
whenever and only when p entails g. I do not 
myself think that it gives the meaning of "/ entails 
f" since the kind of relation which I see to hold 
between the premisses and conclusion of a 
syllogism seems to me to be one which is purely 
11 objective " in the sense that no psychological 
term, such as is involved in the meaning of " self- 
evident," is involved in its definition (if it has one). 
I am not, however, concerned to dispute that some 
such definition of "p entails y" as this may be 
true. Since it is evident that, even if it were, my 
proposition that " xP entails xQ " does not follow 
from "xP * xQ" would still be true; and hence 
also my contention that (2) does not follow 
from (1). 

So much by way of arguing that we are not 
bound to hold that all relational properties are 
internal in the particular sense, with which we are 
now concerned, in which to say that they are means 
that in every case in which a thing A has a relational 
property, it follows from the proposition that a term 
has not got that property that the term in question 
is other than A. But I have gone further and 
asserted that some relational properties certainly 
are not internal. And in defence of this proposition 
I do not know that I have anything to say but that 
it seems to me evident in many cases that a term 
which has a certain relational property might quite 
well not have had it : that, for instance, from the 
mere proposition that this is this, it by no means 
follows that this has to other things all the relations 
which it in fact has. Everybody, of course, must 
admit that if all the propositions which assert of it 
that it has these properties, do in fact follow from 
the proposition that this is this, we cannot see that 
they do. And so far as I can see, there is no 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 307 

reason of any kind for asserting that they do, 
except the confusion which I have exposed. But 
it seems to me further that we can see in many 
cases that the proposition that this has that relation 
does not follow from the fact that it is this : that, for 
instance, the proposition that Edward VII was father 
of George V is a mere matter of fact 

I want now to return for a moment to that other 
meaning of M internal," (p. 286) in which to say that P 
is internal to A means not merely that anything which 
had not P would necessarily be other than A, but 
that it would necessarily be qualitatively different. 
I said that this was the meaning of " internal " in 
which the dogma of internal relations holds that all 
relational properties are " internal " ; and that one 
of the most important consequences which followed 
from it, was that all relational properties are 
" internal " in the less extreme sense that we have 
just been considering. But, if I am not mistaken, 
there is another important consequence which also 
follows from it, namely, the Identity of Indiscernibles. 
For if it be true, in the case of every relational 
property, that any term which had not that property 
would necessarily be qualitatively different from any 
which had, it follows of course that, in the case of 
two terms one of which hasa relational property, which 
the other has not the two are qualitatively different. 
But, from the proposition that.*: is other than^y, it 
does follow that x has some relational property which 
y has not ; and hence, if the dogma of internal 
relations be true, it will follow that if x is other than 
y, x is always also qualitatively different from y t 
which is the principle of Identity of Indiscernibles. 
This is, of course, a further objection to the dogma 
of internal relations, since I think it is obvious that 
the principle of Identity of Indiscernibles is not true. 
Indeed, so far as I can see, the dogma of internal 
relations essentially consists in the joint assertion of 



308 EXTERNAL RELATIONS 

two indefensible propositions : (i) the proposition 
that in the case of no relational property is it true 
of any term which has got that property, that it might 
not have had it and (2) the Identity of Indis- 
cernibles. 

I want, finally, to say something about the phrase 
which Mr. Russell uses in the Philosophical Essays 
to express the dogma of internal relations. He 
says it may be expressed in the form " Every 
relation is grounded in the natures of the related 
terms" (p. 160). And it can be easily seen, if the 
account which I have given be true, in what precise 
sense it does hold this. Mr. Russell is uncertain as 
to whether by "the nature" of a term is to be under- 
stood the term itself or something else. For my 
part it seems to me that by a terms nature is meant, 
not the term itself, but what may roughly be called 
all its qualities as distinguished from its relational 
properties. But whichever meaning we take, it 
will follow from what I have said, that the dogma 
of internal relations does imply that every relational 
property which a term has is, in a perfectly precise 
sense, grounded in its nature. It will follow that 
every such property is grounded in the term, in the 
sense that, in the case of every such property, it 
follows from the mere proposition that that term is 
that term that it has the property in question. And 
it will also follow that any such property is grounded 
in the qualities which the term has, in the sense, 
that if you take all the qualities which the term has, 
it will again follow in the case of each relational 
property, from the proposition that the term has all 
those qualities that it has the relational property in 
question ; since this is implied by the proposition 
that in the case of any such property, any term 
which had not had it would necessarily have been 
different in quality from the term in question* In 
both of these two senses, then, the dogma of 



EXTERNAL RELATIONS 309 

internal relations does, I think, imply that every 
relational property is grounded in the nature of 
every term which possesses it ; and in this sense 
that proposition is false. Yet it is worth noting, I 
think, that there is another sense of " grounded " in 
which it may quite well be true that every relational 
property is grounded in the nature of any term 
which possesses it. Namely that, in the case of 
every such property, the term in question has some 
quality without which it could not have had the 
property. In other words that the relational 
property entails some quality in the term, though 
no quality in the term entails the relational 
property. 



THE NATURE OF MORAL 
PHILOSOPHY 

I should like, if I can, to interest you to-night in 
one particular question about Moral Philosophy. It 
is a question which resembles most philosophical 
questions, in respect of the fact that philosophers 
are by no means agreed as to what is the right 
answer to it : some seem to be very strongly 
convinced that one answer is correct, while others 
are equally strongly convinced of the opposite. For 
my own part I do feel some doubt as to which 
answer is the right one, although, as you will see, I 
incline rather strongly to one of the two alternatives. 
I should like very much, if I could, to find some 
considerations which seemed to me absolutely con- 
vincing on the one side or the other ; for the 
question seems to me in itself to be an exceedingly 
interesting one. 

I have said that the question is a question about 
Moral Philosophy ; and it seems to me in fact to be 
a very large and general question which affects the 
whole of Moral Philosophy. In asking it, we are 
doing no less than asking what it is that people are 
doing when they study Moral Philosophy at all : we 
are asking what sort of questions it is which it is the 
business of Moral Philosophy to discuss and try to 
find the right answer to. But I intend, for the sake 
of simplicity, to confine myself to asking it in two 
particular instances. Moral Philosophy has, in fact, 



NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 311 

to discuss a good many different ideas ; and though 
I think this same question may be raised with 
regard to them all, I intend to pick out two, which 
seem to me particularly fundamental, and to ask it 
with regard to them only. 

My first business must be to explain what these 
two ideas are. 

The name Moral Philosophy naturally suggests 
that what is meant is a department of philosophy 
which has something to do with morality. And we 
all understand roughly what is meant oy morality. 
We are accustomed to the distinction between 
moral good and evil, on the one hand, and what is 
sometimes called physical good and evil on the 
other. We all make the distinction between a 
man's moral character, on the one hand, and his 
agreeableness or intellectual endowments, on the 
other. We feel that to accuse a man of immoral 
conduct is quite a different thing from accusing him 
merely of bad taste or bad manners, or from 
accusing him merely of stupidity or ignorance. 
And no less clearly we distinguish between the idea 
of being under a moral obligation to do a thing, and 
the idea of being merely under a legal obligation to 
do it It is a common-place that the sphere of 
morality is much wider than the sphere of law : that 
we are morally bound to do and avoid many things, 
which are not enjoined or forbidden by the laws of 
our country ; and it is also sometimes held that, if a 
particular law is unjust or immoral, it may even be 
a moral duty to disobey it— that is to say that there 
may be a positive conflict between moral and legal 
obligation ; and the mere fact that this is held, 
whether truly or falsely, shows, at all events, that 
the one idea is quite distinct from the other. 

The name Moral Philosophy, then, naturally 
suggess that it is a department of philosophy 
concerned with morality in this common sense. 



312 NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 

And it is, in fact, true that one large department of 
Moral Philosophy is so concerned. But it would be 
a mistake to think that the whole subject is only 
concerned with morality. Another important 
department of it is, as I shall try to show, concerned 
with ideas which are not moral ideas, in this 
ordinary sense, though, no doubt, they may have 
something to do with them. And of the two 
ideas which I propose to pick out for discussion, 
while one of them is a moral idea, the other belongs 
to that department of Moral Philosophy, which is not 
concerned solely with morality, and is not, I think, 
properly speaking, a moral idea at all. 

Let us begin with the one of the two, which is a 
moral idea. 

The particular moral idea which I propose to 
pick out for discussion is the one which I have 
called above the idea of moral obligation — the idea 
of being morally bound to act in a particular way 
on a particular occasion. But what is, so far as I 
can see, precisely the same idea is also called by 
several other names. To say that I am under a 
moral obligation todoa certain thing is, I think, clearly 
to say the same thing as what we commonly express 
by saying that I ought to do it, or that it is my duty 
to do it. That is to say, the idea of moral obligation 
is identical with the idea of the moral " ought " and 
with the idea of duty. And it also seems at first 
sight as if we might make yet another identification. 

The assertion that I ought to do a certain thing 
seems as if it meant much the same as the assertion 
that it would be wrong of me not to do the thing 
in question : at all events it is quite clear that, 
whenever it is my duty to do anything, it would be 
wrong of me not to do it, and that whenever it 
would be wrong of me to do anything, then it is my 
duty to refrain from doing it. in the case of these 
two ideas, the idea of what is wrong, and the idea 
of what is my duty or what I ought to do, different 



NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 313 

views may be taken as to whether the one is more 
fundamental than the other, or whether both are 
equally so ; and on the question : If one of 
the two is more fundamdntal than the other, which 
of the two is so? Thus some people would say, 
that the idea of " wrong " is the more fundamental, 
and that the idea of " duty " is to be defined in 
terms of it : that, in fact, the statement "It is my 
duty to keep that promise" merely means "It 
would be wrong of me not to keep it " ; and the 
statement " It is my duty not to tell a lie " merely 
means " It would be wrong of me to tell one." 
Others again would apparently say just the opposite : 
that duty is the more fundamental notion, and 
"wrong" is to be defined in terms of it. While others 
perhaps would hold that neither is more fundamental 
than the other ; that both are equally fundamental, 
and that the statement "it would be wrong to do 
so and so" is only equivalent to, not identical in 
meaning with, " I ought not to do it." But whichever 
of these three views be the true one, there is, I 
think, no doubt whatever about the equivalence 
notion of the two ideas ; and no doubt, therefore, that 
whatever answer be given to the question I am 
going to raise about the one, the same answer must 
be given to the corresponding question about the 
other. 

The moral idea, then, which I propose to discuss, 
is the idea of duty or moral obligation, or, what 
comes to the same thing, the idea of what is 
wrong — morally wrong. Everybody would agree 
that this idea — or, to speak more accurately, one or 
both of these two ideas — is among the most 
fundamental of our moral ideas, whether or not they 
would admit that all others, for example the ideas 
of moral goodness, involve a reference to this one in 
their definition, or would hold that we have some 
others which are independent of it, and equally 
fundamental with it. 



314 NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 

But there is a good deal of difficulty in getting* 
clear as to what this idea of moral obligation itself 
is. Is there in fact only one idea which we call by 
this name ? Or is it possible that on some occasions 
when we say that so and so is a duty, we mean 
something different by this expression from what 
we do on others ? And that similarly when we say 
that so and so is morally wrong, we sometimes use 
this name " morally wrong " for one idea and some- 
times for another ; so that one and the same thing' 
may be " morally wrong " in one sense of the word, 
and yet not morally wrong in another ? I think, in 
fact, there are two different senses in which we use 
tnese terms ; and to point out the difference between 
them, will help to bring out clearly more the nature 
of each. And I think perhaps the difference can 
be brought out most clearly by considering the 
sort of moral rules with which we are all of u9 
familiar. 

Everybody knows that moral teachers are largely 
concerned in laying down moral rules, and in 
disputing the truth of rules which have been 
previously accepted. And moral rules seem to 
consist, to a very large extent, in assertions to 
the effect that it is always wrong to do certain 
actions or to refrain from doing certain others ; or 
(what comes to the same thing) that it is always 
your duty to refrain from certain actions, and 
positively to do certain others. The Ten Com- 
mandments for example, are instances of moral 
rules ; and most of them are examples of what are 
called negative rules — that is to say rules which 
assert merely that it is wrong to do certain positive 
actions, and therefore our duty to refrain from 
these actions ; instead of rules which assert of 
certain positive actions, that it is our duty to do 
them and therefore wrong to refrain from doing them. 
The fifth commandment, which tells us to honour 



NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 315 

our father and mother, is apparently an exception ; 
it seems to be a positive rule. It is not, like the 
others, expressed in the negative form " Thou shalt 
not do so and so," and it is apparently really meant 
to assert that we ought to do certain positive 
actions, not merely that there are some positive 
action from which we ought to refrain. The 
difference between this one and the rest will thus 
serve as an example of the difference between 
positive and negative moral rules, a difference 
which is sometimes treated as if it were of great 
importance. And I do not wish to deny that there 
may be some important difference between seeing 
only that certain positive actions are wrong, and 
seeing also that, in certain cases, to refrain from 
doing certain actions is just as wrong as positively 
to do certain others. But this distinction between 
positive and negative rules is certainly of much less 
importance than another which is, I think, liable 
to be confused with it. So far as this distinction 
goes it is only a distinction between an assertion 
that it is wrong to do a positive action and an 
assertion that it is wrong to refrain from doing one : 
and each of these assertions is equivalent to * one 
which asserts a duty — the first with an assertion 
that it is a duty to refrain, the second with an 
assertion that a positive action is a duty. But 
there is another distinction between some moral 
rules and others, which is of much greater import- 
ance than this one, and which does, I think, give 
a reason for thinking that the term " moral obliga- 
tion " is actually used in different senses on different 
occasions. 

I have said that moral rules seem to consist, to a 
large extent, in assertions to the effect that it is 
always wrong to do certain actions or to refrain 
from doing certain others, or the equivalent 
assertions in terms of duty. But there is a large 



316 NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 

class of moral rules, with which we are all of us 
very familiar, which do not come under this 
definition. They are rules which are concerned 
not with our actions, in the natural sense of the 
word, but with our feelings, thoughts and desires. 
An illustration of this kind of rule can again be 
given from the Ten Commandments. Most of 
the ten, as we all know, are concerned merely with 
actions/ but the tenth at least is clearly an ex- 
ception. The tenth says " Thou shalt not covet 
thy neighbour's house, nor his wife, nor his servant, 
nor his ox, nor his ass, nor anything that is his/' 
and, unless " covet " is merely a mistranslation of 
a word which stands for some kind of action, we 
plainly have here a rule which is concerned with 
our feelings and not with our actions. And one 
reason which makes the distinction between rules 
of this kind and rules concerned with actions 
important, is that our feelings are not, as a rule, 
directly within the control of our will in the sense 
in which many of our actions are. I cannot, for 
instance, by any single act of will directly 
prevent from arising in my mind a desire for 
something that belongs to some one else, even if, 
when once the desire has arrived, I can by my will 
prevent its continuance ; and even this last I can 
hardly do directly but only by forcing myself to 
attend to other considerations which may extinguish 
the desire. But though I thus cannot prevent myself 
altogether from coveting my neighbour's possessions, 
I can altogether prevent myself from stealing them. 
The action of stealing, and the feeling of covetous- 
ness, are clearly on a very different level in this 
respect. The action is directly within the control 
of my will, whereas the feeling is not. If I will 
not to take the thing (though of course some people 
may find a great difficulty in willing this) it does in 
general follow directly that I do not take it; 



NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 317 

whereas, if I will not to desire it, it emphatically 
does not, even in general, follow directly that no 
desire for it will be there. This distinction between 
the way in which our feelings and our actions are 
under the control of our wills is, I think, a very real 
one indeed ; we cannot help constantly recognising 
that it exists. And it has an important bearing on 
the distinction between those moral rules which 
deal with actions and those which deal with 
feelings, for the following reason. The philosopher 
Kant laid down a well-known proposition to the 
effect that " ought " implies " can " : that is to say, 
that it cannot be true that you " ought " to do a 
thing, unless it is true that you could do it, if "you 
chose. And as regards one of the senses in which 
we commonly use the words " ought " and " duty," 
I think this rule is plainly true. When we say 
absolutely of ourselves or others, " I ought to do 
so and so " or " you ought to," we imply, I think, 
very often that the thing in question is a thing 
which we could do, i/vfe chose ; though of course 
it may often be a thing which it is very difficult to 
choose to do. Thus it is clear that I cannot truly 
say of anyone that he ought to do a certain thing, 
if it is a thing which it is physically impossible for 
him to do, however desirable it may be that the 
thing should be done. And in this sense it is clear 
that it cannot be truly said of me that I ought not 
to have a certain feeling, or that I ought not to have 
had it, if it is a feeling which I could not, by any 
effort of my will, prevent myself from having. The 
having or the prevention of a certain feeling is not, 
of course, strictly ever a physical impossibility, but 
it is very often impossible, in exactly the same 
sense, in which actions are physically impossible — 
that is to say that I could not possibly get it or 
prevent it, even if I would. But this being so, it 
is plain that such a moral rule as that I ought not 



3 i8 NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 

to covet my neighbour's possessions is, if it means 
to assert that I ought not, in that sense in which 
"ought" implies " can," a rule which cannot 
possibly be true. What it appears to assert is, 
absolutely universally, of every feeling of covetous- 
ness, that the feeling in question is one which the 
person who felt it ought not to have felt. But in fact 
a very large proportion of such feelings (I am inclined 
to say the vast majority) are feelings which the 
person who felt them could not have prevented 
feeling, if he would : they were beyond the control 
of his will. And hence it is quite emphatically not 
true that none of these feelings ought to have been 
felt, if we are using " ought " in the sense which 
implies that the person who felt them could have 
avoided them. So far from its being true that 
absolutely none of them ought to have been felt, 
this is only true of those among them, probably a 
small minority, which the person who felt them 
could have avoided feeling. If, therefore, moral 
rules with regard to feelings are to have a chance of 
being nearly true, we must understand the " ought " 
which occurs in them in some other sense. But 
with moral rules that refer to actions the case is 
very different Take stealing for example. Here 
again what the Eighth Commandment appears to 
imply is that absolutely every theft which has ever 
occurred was an act which the agent ought not to 
have done ; and, if the " ought " is the one which 
implies " can," it implies, therefore, that every 
theft was an act which the agent, if he had chosen, 
could have avoided. And this statement that every 
theft which has been committed was an act which 
the thief, if he had so willed, could have avoided, 
though it may be doubted if it is absolutely 
universally true, is not a statement which is clearly 
absurd, like the statement that every covetous 
desire could have been avoided by the will of the 



NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 319 

person who felt it. It is probable that the vast 
majority of acts of theft have been acts which it 
was in the power of the thief to avoid, if he had 
willed to do so ; whereas this is clearly not true of 
the vast majority of covetous desires. It is, there- 
fore, quite possible that those who believe we ought 
never to steal, are using " ought " in a sense which 
implies that stealing always could have been 
avoided ; whereas it is I think quite certain that 
many of those who believe that we ought to avoid 
all covetous desires, do not believe for a moment 
that every covetous desire that has ever been felt 
was a desire which the person who felt it could have 
avoided feeling, if he had chosen. And yet they 
certainly do believe, in some sense or other, that no 
covetous desire ought ever to have been felt. The 
conclusion is, therefore, it seems to me, unavoidable 
that we do use " ough t," the moral "ought," in 
two different sensesf/the one a sense in which to 
say that I ought to have done so and so doss really 
imply that I could have done it, if I had chosen, 
and the other a sense in which it carries with it no 
such implication. I think perhaps the difference 
between the two can be expressed in this way. If 
we express the meaning of the first "ought," the 
one which does imply "can," by saying that "I 
ought to have done so and so" means " It actually 
was my duty to do it " ; we can express the meaning 
of the second by saying that e.g. " I ought not to 
have felt so and so " means not " it was my duty to 
avoid that feeling," but "it wou/d\i3.vt been my duty 
to avoid it, if I had been able." And corresponding 
to these two meanings of " ought " we should, I 
think, probably distinguish two different sorts of 
moral rules, which though expressed in the same 
language, do in fact mean very different things. 
The one is a set of rules which assert (whether truly 
or falsely) that it always actually is a duty to do or 



320 NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 

to refrain from certain actions, and assert therefore 
that it always is in the power of the agent's will to 
do or to refrain from them ; whereas the other sort 
only assert that so and so would be a duty, if it 
were within our power, without at all asserting that 
it always is within our power. 

We may, perhaps, give a name to the distinction 

I mean, by calling the first kind of rules — those 
which do assert that something actually is a duty — 
" rules of duty," and by calling the second kind — 
th ose which T e commend or condemn something not 
in the control of our wills — " ideal rules " : choosing 
this latter name because they can be said to in- 
culcate a moral " ideal " — something the attainment 
of which is not directly within the power of our 
wills. As a further example of the difference between 
ideal rules and rules of duty we may take the famous 
passage from the New Testament (Luke 6, 27) 

II Love your enemies, do good to them that hate 
you, bless them that curse you, pray for them that 
despitefully use you." Of these four rules, the three 
last may be rules of duty, because they refer to 
things which are plainly, as a rule, at least, in the 
power of your will; but the first, if "love" be 
understood in its natural sense as referring to your 
feelings, is plainly only an " ideal " rule, since such 
feelings are obviously not directly under our own 
control, in the same way in which such actions as 
doing good to, blessing or praying for a person are so. 
To love certain people, or to feel no anger against 
them, is a thing which it is quite impossible to 
attain directly by will, or perhaps ever to attain 
completely at all. Whereas your behaviour towards 
them is a matter within your own control : even if 
you hate a person, or feel angry with him, you can 
so control yourself as not to do him harm, and 
even to confer benefits upon him. To do good to 
your enemies may, then, really be your duty ; but it 



NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 321 

cannot, in the strict sense, be your duty not to have 
evil feelings towards them : all that can possibly be 
true is that it would be your duty if you were able. 
Yet I think there can be no doubt that what Christ 
meant to condemn was the occurrence of such 
feelings altogether ; and since, if what he meant to 
assert about them in condemning them, would have 
been certainly false, if he had meant to say that you 
could avoid ever feeling them, I think it is clear that 
what he meant to assert was not this, or not this 
only, but something else, which may quite possibly 
be true. That is to say, he was asserting an ideal 
rule, not merely a rule of duty. 

It will be seen that this distinction which I am 
making coincides, roughly at all events, with the 
distinction which is often expressed as the dis- 
tinction between rules which tell you what you 
ought to be and rules which tell you merely what 
you ought to do ; or as the distinction between rules 
which are concerned with your inner life — with your 
thoughts and feelings— and those which are con- 
cerned only with your external actions. The rules 
which are concerned with what you ought to be or 
with your inner life are, for the most part at all 
events, " ideal " rules ; while those which are con- 
cerned with what ybu ought to do or your external 
actions are very often, at least, rules of duty. And 
it is often said that one great difference between the 
New Testament and the Old is its comparatively 
greater insistence on " ideal " rules — upon a change 
of heart— as opposed to mere rules of duty. And 
that there is a comparatively greater insistence on 
ideal rules I do not wish to deny. But that there 
are plenty of ideal rules in the Old Testament too 
must not be forgotten. I have already given an 
example from the Ten Commandments : namely the 
rule which says you ought not to covet anything 
which belongs to your neighbour. And another is 



3 22 NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 

supplied by the Old Testament commandment, 
" Love thy neighbour as thyself," if by "love" is 
here meant a feeling which is not within our own 
control, and not merely that the Jew is to help other 
Jews by his external actions. Indeed, however 
great may be the difference between the Old Testa- 
ment and the New in respect of comparative in- 
sistence on ideal rules rather than rules of duty, I 
am inclined to think that there is at least as great a 
difference, illustrated by this very rule, in another, 
quite different, respect — namely in the kind of rules, 
both ideal and of duty, which are insisted on. For 
whereas by "thy neighbour" in the Old Testament 
there is plainly meant only other Jews, and it is not 
conceived either that it is the duty of a Jew to help 
foreigners in general, or an ideal for him to love 
them ; in the New Testament, where the same 
words are used, " my neighbour " plainly is meant 
to include all mankind. And this distinction be- 
tween the view that beneficent action and benevo- 
lent feelings should be confined to those of our own 
nation, and the view that both should be extended 
equally to all mankind, — a distinction which has 
nothing to do with the distinction between being 
and doing, between inner and outer, but affects 
both equally — is, I am inclined to think, at least as 
important a difference between New Testament and 
Old, as the comparatively greater insistence on 
"ideal" rules. However, the point upon which I 
. want at present to insist is the distinction between 
"^ ideal rules and rules of duty. Both kinds are 
commonly included among moral rules, and, as my 
examples have shown, are often mentioned together 
as if no great difference were seen between them. 
What I want to insist on is that there is a great 
difference between them : that whereas rules of duty 
do directly assert of the idea of duty, in the sense 
in which to say that something is your duty implies 



NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 323 

that you can do it, that certain things are duties, 
the " ideal " rules do not assert this, but something 
different. Yet the " ideal " rules certainly do, in a 
sense, assert a " moral obligation." And hence we 
have to recognise that the phrase lt moral obli- 
gation " is not merely a name for one idea only, but 
for two very different ideas ; and the same will, of 
course, be true of the corresponding phrase "morally 
wrong." 

When, therefore, I say that the idea of " moral 
obligation " is one of the fundamental ideas with 
which Moral Philosophy is concerned, I think we 
must admit that this one name really stands for two 
different ideas. But it does not matter for my 
purpose which of the two you take. Each of them 
is undoubtedly a moral idea, and whatever answer 
be given to the question we are going to raise 
about the one, will also certainly apply to the other. 

But it is now time to turn to the other idea, withf 
which I said that Moral Philosophy has been largely 
concerned, though it is not, strictly speaking, a 
moral idea, at all. 

And I think, perhaps, a good way of bringing out 
what this idea is, is to refer to the Ethics of 
Aristotle. Everybody would admit that the funda- 
mental idea, with; which Aristotle's Ethics is con- 
cerned, is an idea which it is the business of Moral 
Philosophy to discuss ; and yet I think it is quite 
plain that this idea is not a moral idea at all. 
Aristotle does not set out from the idea of moral 
obligation or duty (indeed throughout his treatise he 
only mentions this idea quite incidentally) ; nor even 
from the idea of moral goodness or moral excellence, 
though he has a good deal more to say about that ; 
but from the idea of what he calls "the human good," 
or "good for man." He starts by raising the question 
what the good for man is, and his whole book is 
arranged in the form of giving a detailed answer to 



324 NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 

that question. And I think we can gather pretty 
well what the idea is, which he calls by this name, 
by considering what he says about it There are 
two points, in particular, which he insists upon from 
the outset : first, that nothing can be good, in the 
sense he means, unless it is something which is 
worth having for its own sake, and not merely for 
the sake of something else ; it must be good in 
itself \ it must not, like wealth (to use one example 
which he gives) be worth having merely for the 
sake of what you can do with it ; it must be a thing 
which' is worth having even if nothing further comes 
of it. And secondly (what partly covers the former, 
but also, I think, says something more) it must, he 
says, be something that is "self-sufficient" : something 
which, even if you had nothing else would make your 
life worth having. And further light is thrown upon 
his meaning when he comes to tell you what he thinks 
the good for man is : the good, he says, is " mental 
activity — where such activity is of an excellent kind, 
or, if there are several different kinds of excellent 
mental activity, that which has the best and most 
perfect kind of excellence ; and also " (he significantly 
adds) " mental activity which lasts through a 
sufficiently long life." The word which I have 
here translated "excellence" is what is commonly 
translated " virtue " ; but it does not mean quite the 
same as we mean by "virtue," and that in a very 
important respect. "Virtue" has come to mean 
exclusively moral excellence ; and if that were all 
Aristotle meant, you might think that what he 
means by "good" came very near being a moral 
idea. But it turns out that he includes among 
"excellences," intellectual excellence, and even that 
he thinks that the best and most perfect excellence 
of which he speaks is a particular kind of intellectual 
excellence, which no one would think of calling a 
moral quality, namely, the sort of excellence which 



NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 325 

makes a man a good philosopher. And as for the 
word which I have translated " activity, " the mean- 
ing of this can be best brought out by mentioning 
the reason which Aristotle himself gives for saying 
that mere excellence itself is not (as some of the 
Greeks had said) the good for man. He says, truly 
enough, that a man may possess the greatest 
excellence — he may be a very excellent man — even 
when be is asleep, or is doing nothing ; and he 
points out that the possession of excellence when 
you are asleep is not a thing that is desirable for its 
own sake — obviously only for the sake of the effects it 
may produce when you wake up. It is not there- 
fore, he thinks, mere mental excellence, but the 
active exercise of mental excellence — the state of a 
man's mind, when he not only possesses excellent 
faculties, moral or intellectual, but is actively 
engaged in using them, which really constitutes the 
human good. 

Now, when Aristotle talks of " the good for man," 
there is, I think, as my quotation is sufficient to 
show, a certain confusion in his mind between 
what is good for man and what is best for man. 
What he really holds is that any mental activity 
which exhibits excellence and is pleasurable is a 
good ; and when he adds that, if there are many 
excellences, the good must be mental activity which 
exhibits the best of them, and that it must last 
through- a sufficiently long life, he only means that 
this is necessary if a man is to get the best he can 
get, not that this is the only good he can get. And 
the idea which I wish to insist on is not, therefore, 
the idea of "the human good," but the more 
fundamental idea of " good " ; the idea, with regard 
to which he holds that the working of our minds in 
some excellent fashion is the only good thing that 
any of us can possess ; and the idea of which "better" 
is the comparative, when he says that mental activity 



326 NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 

which exhibits some sorts of excellence is better than 
mental activity which exhibits others, though both 
are good, and that excellent mental activity con- 
tinued over a longer time is better than the same 
continued for a shorter. This idea of what is 
"good," in the sense in which Aristotle uses it in 
these cases, is an idea which we all of us constantly 
use, and which is certainly an idea which it is the 
business of Moral Philosophy to discuss, though it 
is not a moral idea. The main difficulty with 
regard to it is to distinguish it clearly from other 
senses in which we use the same word. For, when 
we say that a thing is "good," or one thing 
"better" than another, we by no means always 
mean that it is better in this sense. Often, when 
we call a thing good we are not attributing to it any 
characteristic which it would possess if it existed 
quite alone, and if nothing further were to come of 
it ; but are merely saying of it that it is a sort of 
thing from which other good things do in fact come, 
or which is such that, when accompanied by other 
things, the whole thus formed is "good" in 
Aristotle's sense, although, by itself, it is not 
Thus a man may be "good," and his character may 
be "good," and yet neither are "good" in this 
fundamental sense, in which goodness is a charac- 
teristic which a thing would possess, if it existed 
quite alone. For, as Aristotle says, a good man 
may exist, and may have a good character, even 
when he is fast asleep ; and yet if there were 
nothing in the Universe but good men, with good 
characters, all fast asleep, there would be nothing in 
it which was " good " in the fundamental sense with 
which we are concerned. Thus " moral goodness," 
in the sense of good character, as distinguished from 
the actual working of a good character in various 
forms of mental activity, is certainly not "good" in 
the sense in which good means "good for its own 



NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 327 

sake." And even with regard to the actual exercise 
of certain forms of moral excellence, it seems to me 
that in estimating the value of such exercise 
relatively to other things, we are apt to take into 
account, not merely its intrinsic value — the sort of 
value which it would possess, if it existed quite 
alone — but also its effects : we rate it higher than 
we should do if we were considering only its 
intrinsic value, because we take into account the 
other good things which we know are apt to flow 
from it. Certain things which have intrinsic value 
are distinguished from others, by the fact that 
more good consequences are apt to flow from them ; 
and where this is the case, we are apt, I think, quite 
unjustly, to think that their intrinsic value must be 
higher too. One thing, I think, is clear about 
intrinsic value — goodness in Aristotle's sense — 
namely that it is only actual occurrences, actual 
states of things over a certain period of time — not 
such things as men, or characters, or material 
things, that can have any intrinsic value at all. 
But even this is not sufficient to distinguish intrinsic 
value clearly from other sorts of goodness : since 
even in the case of actual occurrences, we often call 
them good or bad for the sake of their effects or their 
promise of effects. Thus we all hope that the state 
of things in England, as a whole, will really be 
better some day than it has been in the past — that 
there will be progress and improvement : we hope, 
for instance, that, if we consider the whole of the 
lives lived in England during some year in the next 
century, it may turn out that the state of things, as 
a whole, during that year will be really better than 
it ever has been in any past year. And when we 
use "better" in this way — in the sense in which 
progress or improvement means a change to a 
better state of things — we are certainly thinking 
partly of a state of things which has a greater 



328 NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 

intrinsic value. And we certainly do not mean by 
improvement merely moral improvement An 
improvement in moral conditions, other things being 
equal, may no doubt be a gain in intrinsic value ; 
but we should certainly hold that, moral conditions 
being equal, there is yet room for improvement in 
other ways — in the diminution of misery and purely 
physical evils, for example. But in considering the 
degree of a real change for the better in intrinsic 
value, there is certainly danger of confusion between 
the degree in which the actual lives lived are really 
intrinsically better, and the degree in which there is 
improvement merely in the means for living a good 
life. If we want to estimate rightly what would 
constitute an intrinsic improvement in the state of 
things in our imagined year next century, and 
whether it would on the whole be really "good " at 
all, we have to consider what value it would have if 
it were to be the last year of life upon this planet ; if 
the world were going to come to an end, as soon as 
it was over; and therefore to discount entirely all 
the promises it might contain of future goods. This 
criterion for distinguishing whether the kind of 
goodness which we are attributing to anything is 
really intrinsic value or not, the criterion which 
consists in considering whether it is a characteristic 
which the thing would possess, if it were to have 
absolutely no further consequences or accompani- 
ments, seems to me to be one which it is very 
necessary to apply if we wish to distinguish clearly 
between different meanings of the word "good." 
And it is only the idea of what is good, where by 
"good" is meant a characteristic which has this 
mark, that I want now to consider. 

The two ideas, then, with regard to which I want 
to raise a question, are first the moral idea of 
"moral obligation" or "duty," and secondly the 
non-moral idea of "good " in this special sense. 



NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 329 

And the question with regard to them, which I 
want to raise, is this. With regard to both ideas 
many philosophers have thought and still think — 
not only think, but seem to be absolutely convinced, 
that when we apply them to anything — when we 
assert of any action that it ought not to have been 
done, or of any state of things that it was or would 
be good or better than another, then it must be the 
case that all that we are asserting of the thing or 
things in question is simply and solely that some 
person or set of persons actually does have, or has a 
tendency to have a certain sort of feeling towards 
the thing or things in question : that there is 
absolutely no more in it than this. While others 
seem to be convinced, no less strongly, that there is 
more in it than this : that when we judge that an 
action is a duty or is really wrong, we are not merely 
making a judgment to the effect that some person 
or set of persons, have, or tend to have a certain 
sort of feeling, when they witness or think of such 
actions, and that similarly when we judge that a 
certain state of things was or would be better than 
another, we are not merely making a judgment 
about the feelings which some person or set of 
persons would have, in witnessing or thinking of the 
two states of things, or in comparing them together. 
The question at issue between these two views is 
often expressed in other less clear forms. It is 
often expressed as the question whether the ideas of 
duty and of good or value, are or are not, "objective" 
ideas : as the problem as to the " objectivity " of 
duty and intrinsic value. The first set of philoso- 
phers would maintain that the notion of the 
•'objectivity " of duty and of value is a mere 
chimera; while the second would maintain that 
these ideas really are "objective." And others 
express it as the question whether the ideas of duty 
and of good are " absolute " or purely "relative:' 



330 NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 

whether there is any such thing as an absolute duty 
or an absolute good, or whether good and duty are 
purely relative to human feelings and desires. But 
both these ways of expressing it are, I think, apt to 
lead to confusion. And another even less clear way 
in which it is put is by asking the question : Is the 
assertion that such and such a thing is a duty, or 
has intrinsic value, ever a dictate of reason ? But so 
far as I can gather, the question really at issue, and 
expressed in these obscure ways, is the one which 
I have tried to state. It is the question whether 
when we judge (whether truly or falsely) that an 
action is a duty or a state of things good, all that 
we are thinking about the action or the state of 
things in question, is simply and solely that we our- 
selves or others have or tend to have a certain 
feeling towards it when we contemplate or think of 
it. And the question seems to me to be of great 
interest, because, if this is all, then it is evident that 
all the ideas with which Moral Philosophy is con- 
cerned are merely psychological ideas ; and all 
moral rules, and statements as to what is intrinsically 
valuable, merely true or false psychological state- 
ments ; so that the whole of Moral Philosophy and 
Ethics will be merely departments of Psychology. 
Whereas, if the contrary is the case, then these two 
ideas of moral obligation and intrinsic value, will be 
no more purely psychological ideas than are the 
ideas of shape or size or number; and Moral 
Philosophy will be concerned with characteristics of 
actions and feelings and states of affairs, which these 
actions and feelings and states of affairs would or 
might have possessed, even if human psychology 
had been quite different from what it is. 

Which, then, of these two views is the true one ? 
Are these two ideas merely psychological ideas in 
the sense which I have tried to explain, or are they 
/lot? 



NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 331 

As I have said, I feel some doubts myself whether 
they are or not : it does not seem to me to be a 
matter to dogmatize upon. But I am strongly 
inclined to think that they are not merely psycholo- 
gical ; that Moral Philosophy and Ethics are not 
mere departments of Psychology. In favour of the 
view that the two ideas in question are merely 
psychological, there is, so far as I am aware, 
nothing whatever to be said, except that so many 
philosophers have been absolutely convinced that 
they are. None of them seem to me to have 
succeeded in bringing forward a single argument in 
favour of their view. And against the view that 
they are, there seem to me to be some quite definite 
arguments, though I am not satisfied that any of 
these arguments are absolutely conclusive. I will 
try to state briefly and clearly what seem to me the 
main arguments against the view that these are 
merely psychological ideas ; although, in doing so, I 
am faced with a certain difficulty. For though, as I 
have said, many philosophers are absolutely con- 
vinced, that " duty" and "good" do merely stand 
for psychological ideas, they are by no means agreed 
what the psychological ideas are for which they 
stand. Different philosophers have hit on very 
different ideas as being the ideas for which they 
stand ; and this very fact that, if they are psychological 
ideas at all, it is so difficult to agree as to whdt 
ideas they are, seems to me in itself to be an argu- 
ment against the view that they are so. 

Let me take each of the two ideas separately, and 
try to exhibit the sort of objection there seems 
to be to the view that it is merely a psychological 
idea. 

Take first the idea of moral obligation. What 
purely psychological assertion can \ be making 
about an action, when I assert that it was " wrong, ' 
that it ought not to have been done ? 



332 NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 

In this case, one view, which is in some ways the 
most plausible that can be taken, is that in every 
case I am merely making an assertion about my 
own psychology. But what assertion about my 
own psychology can I be making ? Let us take as 
an example, the view of Prof. Westermarck, which is 
as plausible a view of this type as any that I know 
of. He holds that what I am judging when I 
judge an action to be wrong, is merely that it is of 
a sort which tends to excite in me a peculiar kind of 
feeling — the feeling of moral indignation or dis- 
approval. He does not say that what I am 
judging is that the action in question is actually 
exciting this feeling in me. For it is obviously not 
true that, when I judge an action to be much more 
wrong than another, I am always actually feeling 
much indignation at the thought of either, or much 
more indignation at the thought of the one than at 
that of the other ; and it is inconceivable that I should 
constantly be making so great a mistake as to my 
own psychology, as to think that I am actually 
feeling great indignation when I am not. But he 
thinks it is plausible to say that I am making a 
judgment as to the tendency of such actions to 
excite indignation in me ; that, for instance, when I 
judge that one is much more wrong than the other, 
I am merely asserting the fact, taught me by my 
past experience, that, if I were to witness the two 
actions, under similar circumstances, I should feel a 
much more intense indignation at the one than at 
the other. l 

A £ Westermarck, The Origin and Development of Moral Ideas, 
Vol. I, pp. 4, 13, 17-18, 1 00-101. On p. 105, however, Westermarck 
suggests a view inconsistent with this one : namely that, when I 
judge an action to be wrong, I am not merely asserting that it has a 
tendency to excite moral indignation in me, but am also asserting 
that other people would be convinced that it has a tendency to 
excite moral indignation in them, if they " knew the act and all its 
attendant circumstances as well as [I do], and if, at the same time 
their emotions were as refined as [mine]." 



NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 333 

But there is one very serious objection to such a 
view, which I think that those who take it are apt 
not fully to realise. If this view be true, then 
when I judge an action to be wrong, I am merely 
making a judgment about my own feelings towards it; 
and when you judge it to be wrong, you are merely 
making a judgment about yours. And hence the 
word "wrong" in my mouth, means something 
entirely different from what it does in yours ; just 
as the word " I " in my mouth stands for an entirely 
different person from what it does in yours — in mine 
it stands for me, in yours it stands for you. That 
is to say when I judge of a given action that it was 
wrong, and you perhaps of the very same action 
that it was not, we are not in fact differing in 
opinion about it at all ; any more than we are 
differing in opinion if I make the judgment " I 
came from Cambridge to-day " and you make the 
judgment "/did not come from Cambridge to-day." 
When / say " That was wrong " I am merely saying 
"That sort of action excites indignation in me, 
when I see it " ; and when you say " No ; it was not 
wrong " you are merely saying " It does not excite 
indignation in me, when / see it." And obviously 
both judgments may perfectly well be true together ; 
just as my judgment that I did come from Cambridge 
to-day and yours that you did not, may perfectly 
well be true together. In other words, and this 
is what I want to insist on, if this view be true, 
then there is absolutely no such thing as a difference 
of opinion upon moral questions. If two persons 
think they differ in opinion on a moral question 
(and it certainly seems as if they sometimes think 
so), they are always, on this view, making a mistake, 
and a mistake so gross that it seems hardly possible 
that they should make it : a mistake as gross as that 
which would be involved in thinking that when you 
say " I did not come from Cambridge to-day " you 



334 NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 

are denying what I say when I say " I did." And 
this seems to me to be a very serious objection to 
the view. Don't people, in fact, sometimes really 
differ in opinion on a moral question ? Certainly 
all appearances are in favour of the view that they 
do : and yet, if they do, that can only be if when I 
think a thing to be wrong, and you think it not to 
be wrong, I mean by "wrong" the very same 
characteristic which you mean, and am thinking 
that the action possesses this characteristic while 
you are thinking it does not. It must be the very 
same characteristic which we both mean ; it cannot 
be, as this view says it is, merely that I am thinking 
that it has to my feelings the very same relation, 
which you are thinking that it has not got to yours ; 
since, if this were all, then there would be no 
difference of opinion between us. 

And this view that when we talk of wrong or 
duty, we are not merely, each of us, making a state- 
ment about the relation of the thing in question to 
our own feelings, may be reinforced by another 
consideration. It is commonly believed that some 
moral rules exhibit a higher morality than others : 
that, for instance a person who believes that it is 
our duty to do good to our enemies, has a higher 
moral belief, than one who believes that he has no 
such duty, but only a duty to do good to his friends 
or fellow-countrymen. And Westermarck himself 
believes that, some moral beliefs, " mark a stage of 
higher refinement in the evolution of the moral 
consciousness."* But what, on his view can be meant 
by saying that one moral belief is higher than 
another ? If A believes that it is his duty to do 
good to his enemies and B believes that it is not, 
in what sense can A's belief be higher than B's? 
Not, on this view, in the sense that what A believes 
is true, and what B believes is not ; for what A is 
believing is merely that the idea of not doing good 

* Ibid. p. 89. 



NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 335 

to your enemies tends to excite in him a feeling of 
moral indignation, and what B believes is merely 
that it does not tend to excite this feeling in him : 
and both beliefs may perfectly well be true ; it may 
really be true that the same actions do excite the 
feeling in A, and that they don't in B. What then, 
could Westermarck mean by saying that A's 
morality is higher than B's ? So far as I can see, 
what, on his own views, he would have to mean is 
merely that he himself, Westermarck, shares A's 
morality and does not share B's : that it is true of 
him, as of A, that neglecting to do good to enemies 
excites his feelings of moral indignation and not true 
of him as it is of B, that it does not excite such 
feelings in him. In short he would have to say 
that what he means by calling A's morality the higher 
ismerely "A s morality is wy morality, and B's is not. " 
But it seems to me quite clear that when we say one 
morality is higher than another, we do not merely 
mean that it is our own. We are not merely asserting 
that it has a certain relation toour own feelings, but are 
asserting, if I may say so, that the person who has it has 
a better moral taste than the person who has not And 
whether or not this means merely, as I think, that 
what the one believes is true, and what the other 
believes is false, it is at all events inconsistent with 
the view that in all cases we are merely making a 
statement about our own feelings. 

For these reasons it seems to me extremely 
difficult to believe that when we judge things to be 
wrong, each of us is merely making a judgment 
about his awn psychology. But if not about our 
own, then about whose ? I have already said that 
the view that, if the judgment is merely a psycho- 
logical one at all, it is a judgment about our own 
psychology, is in some ways more plausible than 
any other view. And I think we can now see that 
any other view is not plausible. The alternatives 



336 NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 

are that I should be making a judgment about the 
psychology of all mankind, or about that of some 
particular section of it. 1 And that the first alter- 
native is not true, is, I think, evident from the fact 
that, when I judge an action to be wrong, I may 
emphatically not believe that it is true of all man- 
kind that they would regard it with feelings of 
moral disapproval. I may know perfectly well that 
some would not. Most philosophers, therefore, 
have not ventured to say that this is the judgment 
I am making ; they say, for instance, that I am 
making a judgment about the feelings of the particular 
society to which I belong — about, for instance, the 
feelings of an impartial spectator in that society. 
But, if this view be taken, it is open to the same 
objections as the view that I am merely making a 
judgment about my own feelings. If we could say 
that every man, when he judges a thing to be 
wrong, was making a statement about the feelings 
of all mankind, then when A says "This is wrong " 
and B says " No, it isn't," they would really be 
differing in opinion, since A would be saying that 
all mankind feel in a certain way towards the action, 
and B would be saying that they don't But if A 
is referring merely to his society and B to his, and 
their societies are different, then obviously they 
are not differing in opinion at all : it may perfectly 
well be true both that an impartial spectator in As 
society does have a certain sort of feeling towards 
actions of the sort in question, and that an impartial 
spectator in Bs does not This view, therefore, 
implies that it is impossible for two men belonging 
to different societies ever to differ in opinion on a 
moral question. And this is a view which I find it 
almost as hard to accept as the view that no two 
men ever differ in opinion on one. 

For these reasons I think there are serious 



NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 337 

objections to the view that the idea of moral obliga- 
tion is merely a psychological idea. 

But now let us briefly consider the idea of 
"good," in Aristotle's sense, or intrinsic value. 

As regards this idea, there is again a difference 
of opinion among those who hold that it is a 
psychological idea, as to what idea it is. The 
majority seem to hold that it is to be defined, 
somehow, in terms of desire; while others have 
held that what we are judging when we judge that 
one state of things is or would be intrinsically 
better than another, is rather that the belief that 
the one was going to be realized would, under 
certain circumstances, give more pleasure to some 
man or set of men, than the belief that the other 
was. But the same objections seem to me to apply 
whichever of these two views be taken. 

Let us take desire. About whose desires am I 
making a judgment, when I judge that one state of 
things would be better than another ? 

Here again, it may be said, first of all, that I am 
merely making a judgment about my own. But in 
this case the view that my judgment is merely 
about my own psychology is, I think, exposed to 
an obvious objection to which Westermarck's view 
that my judgments of moral obligation are about 
my own psychology was not exposed. The obvious 
objection is that it is evidently not true that I do 
in fact always desire more, what I judge to be 
better : I may judge one state of things to be better 
than another, even when I know perfectly well not 
only that I don't desire it more, but that I have no 
tendency to do so. It is a notorious fact that men's 
strongest desires are, as a rule, for things in which 
they themselves have some personal concern ; and 
yet the fact that this is so, and that they know it to 
be so, does not prevent them from judging that 
changes, which would not affect them personally, 



338 NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 

would constitute a very much greater improvement 
in the worlds condition, than changes which would. 
For this reason alone the view that when I judge 
one state of things to be better than another I 
am merely making a judgment about my own 
psychology, must, I think, be given up : it is 
incredible that we should all be making such 
mistakes about our feelings, as, on this view, we 
should constantly be doing. And there is, of 
course, besides, the same objection, as applied in 
the case of moral obligation : namely that, if this 
view were true, no two men could ever differ in 
opinion as to which of two states was the better, 
whereas it appears that they certainly sometimes 
do differ in opinion on such an issue. 

My judgment, then, is not merely a judgment 
about my own psychology : but, if so, about whose 
psychology is it a judgment? It cannot be a judg- 
ment that all men desire the one state more than 
the other ; because that would include the judgment 
that I myself do so, which, as we have seen, I often 
know to be false, even while I judge that the one 
state really is better. And it cannot, I think, be a 
judgment merely about the feelings or desires of 
an impartial spectator in my own society ; since 
that would involve the paradox that men belonging 
to different societies could never differ in opinion 
as to what was better. But we have here to 
consider an alternative, which did not arise in the 
case of moral obligation. It is a notorious fact that 
the satisfaction of some of our desires is incompat- 
ible with the satisfaction of others, and the satisfac- 
tion of those of some men with the satisfaction of 
those of others. And this fact has suggested to 
some philosophers that what we mean by saying 
that one state of things would be better than 
another, is merely that it is a state in which more 
of the desires, of those who were in it, would be 



NATURE OF MORAL PHILOSOPHY 339 

satisfied at once, than would be the case with the 
other. But to this view the fundamental objection 
seems to me to be that whether the one state was 
better than the other would depend not merely 
upon the number of desires that were simultane- 
ously satisfied in it, but upon what the desires were 
desires for. I can imagine a state of things in 
which all desires were satisfied, and yet can judge 
of it that it would not be so good as another in 
which some were left unsatisfied. And for this 
reason I cannot assent to the view that my judg- 
ment, that one state of things is better than another 
is merely a judgment about the psychology of the 
people concerned in it. 

This is why I find it hard to believe that either 
the idea of moral obligation or the idea of intrinsic 
value is merely a psychological idea. It seems to 
me that Moral Philosophy cannot be merely a 
department of Psychology. But no doubt there 
may be arguments on the other side to which I 
have not done justice. 



The End 



INDEX 



Abstractions, "illegitimate" 15 
Agnosticism, 5, 30, 151 
" Analytic " truths, 30-1 
Apprehension, direct, 173-4, 176 
Aristotle's Ethics, 323-6 
Attention, 176 
Awareness, 25-6, 29 

•'Being" and "Reality" 199-201, 

2x4-18 
Berkeley, 19, 30, 58, 73 
Bradley, F. H., 197-218, 276, 278 

Causal connection, 154*6, 161-3 

necessity, 267-8 
Consciousness, 17-18, 20-21, 23-25 
"Content" 21-4, 26 

Deduction, 40, 291, 303 
Difference, 
numerical and qualitative, 262-3 

285-7, 307-8 
intrinsic, 261-5 
Direct apprehension I73'4» 176 
observation, 148 
perception, 67-71 
Duty and Wrong, 312-3 

■• objectivity T ' of, 257-8, 332-7 

Entails, 291 

and " implies" 300-I, 303-6 

Essi and perciM^ 7-12, 72-7, 180-1 

Existence, 72-8 

and " reality," 199-201, 214-8 
of physical objects, 190-1 

"Experience," ambiguity of, 177, 
179-80. 

External objects and facts, 152-4 
relations, 270-2, 276-309 

Fact, matters of, 148, 302-3 
"Follows," 40, 284-5, a 9l» 3 00 - 1 
303-6 



" Given," ambiguity of, 174 
" Good," ambiguity of, 253, 326 

objectivity of 255-7, 337-9 

" for man," 323-5 
Hegel, 16 
Hume, 53, 58, I47-I67 



" I," 174-5. 333 
Idealism, 1-3 

Ideas, 20-6 

Identity of Indiscernibles, 307-8 

" Implication," 295-7 

Indiscernibles, Identity of, 307-8 

Induction, 

conditions necessary for, 61-7 
Internal relations, 
dogma of, 270-2, 284-6, 286-9, 
288, 290, 303, 307-9 
two senses of, 206 
Intrinsic difference, 261-5 
nature, 260-5 
predicates, 272-5 
value, 259-60, 327-8, 337-9 



Tames, William, 97-146 
Joachim, H. II. , 276 



Kant, 12, 30, 317 
Knowledge, 24 30 

and belief 33-4 

by description, 234, 247 

Leibniz, 302 

" Manifestation of," 249-50 
Material objects or things, 30, 89-90, 

153, 221-5, 228, 250-2 
Mill, J. S., 19. 224, 250-2 
Minds, -in our," 176-7 
" Modify," 278-80, 282-4 
Moral rules, two kinds of, 320-2 



34* 



Index 



Necessary troths, 12, 302-3 
Necessity, three senses of, 265-70 
logical, 27 1>2, 275 
unconditional, 271-2, 274-5 



it 



Objectivity," ambiguity of, 255-9 
of kinds of value, 329-39 
Objects, 
external, 152-3 

material, 30, 89-90, 221-3, 250-2 
physical, and sensible*, 185-96, 
221-3 
Observation, 53 4, 67.71, 148 
Organic unities, 15 
" Ought," two meanings of, 319 
objectivity of, 332-7 
and "wrong" 312-3 

Part, physical, 237-9 

and whole, 288-9 
Perception," ambiguity of, 174, 

2258 

direct, 67-71 
Percipi and esse, 7-12, 72-7, 180-1 
Physical objects and sensibles, 185- 

196, 221-3 
Pickwickian senses, 190, 193, 194 
" Possible," three senses of, 265-70 
Pragmatist theory of truth, 143-6 
" Presented," ambiguity of, 174 

Reality, 72-8, 199-201, 21 1-8 

Reason, " dictates of," 330 

Reasons, 35-41 

Reid, T.,57, 59,86,89 

Relational properties, 281 -2 

Relations, 

dogma of internal, 270-2, 284-6, 

288, 290, 303, 307-9 



external, 270-2, 276-309 

internal, 286-9 
Right, objectivity of, 257, 332-7 
Russell, B., 224, 234, 250-2, 278 

3<>3. 304. 308 



" See," ambiguity of, 187-8 
•* Seems," 245-6 
Sensations, 17-26, 231-2 

proper, 168 
Sense-data, 168-171, 231-2 
Sensibles, 168-171 
Solipsism, 29 
Spiritual, 1-2 
Strachey, O., 304 
" Subjective," 253-4 
" Synthetic " truths, 12-13 

Taylor, A. E., 8 
" Time," 209*11 
Truth, 

and mutability 129-138 

pragmatist theory of, 143-6 

and utility, 108-129 

and verification, 100-107 

of words, 134-6 
Truths, "analytic "and «• synthetic w 

12-13 

" man-made M 138-43 
necessary 12, 302-3 

Value, intrinsic, 259-60, 327-8, 337-9 
objectivity of, 255-9, 329-39 

Westermarck, E., 332, 334-5 
" Wrong," objectivity of, 332-7 
and " ought," 312-3 



PRINTED IN GBEAT BRITAIN BY W. JOLLY AND SONS, LTD., 
, ABERDEEN, SCOTLAND. 



iu'-ii 



11 




3 2044 020 889 556 



r 



mm 



>! 



